LIVE AND LET LIVE;
OR,
DOMESTIC SERVICE ILLUSTRATED
CHAPTER I.
SIN THE PARENT OF WANT.
It
was one of the coldest days felt in New-York,
during the winter of 182-, that a baker's cart made
its accustomed halt before a door in Church-street.
It was driven by Charles Lovett, the baker's son,
whose ruddy cheeks, quick movement, and
beaming
eye bespoke health, industry, and a happy
temper. This latter attribute seemed somewhat
too severely tested by the tardiness of his
customer
,
for in vain had he whistled, clapped his
hands, stamped, and repeated his usual cry of
Hurry! hurry! He at last leaped from his cart
on to the broken step of the wretched dwelling,
when the upper half of the door was slowly opened,
and a thinly-clad girl appeared, who, in answer to
his prepared question, Why, what ails you? are
you all asleep? replied, Mother does not wish
any bread this morning.
Don't wish any! then she's easily served;
and, thus huffily answering, he was turning away,
when another look at the girl touched his kind
heart. Tell me honestly, he added, what is
the reason your mother don't wish the bread.
The little girl's voice was choked, and the tears
gushed from her eyes as she answered, She has
not a shilling to pay for it.
That's blamed hard this cold morning, besides
being toughbut take the loafwe can trust you.
Nomother had rather notfather is sick, and
it takes all she can earn, every penny, to buy
things for him and
Jemmie
.
Well, take it for a gift, then, said the boy;
I'll speak to my father about it; and, thrusting
the loaf into her hands, he jumped into his cart and
rattled off. For a month after Charles Lovett
called daily at that house of want, and left a
shilling
loaf. This is no fiction, but one of those
beautiful
facts that deserve to be rescued from
obscurity
.
The little girl ran up to her mother's apartment,
a back-room on the second floor. Lucy, my
child! exclaimed her mother, reprovingly, on
seeing
the loaf of bread. Lucy explained in a low
voice, to avoid her father overhearing her, who
was lying ill in his bed. Mrs. Lee brushed
away a tear. Did not I always tell you so,
mother? asked Lucy.
Tell me what?
I mean, did not I tell you that boy always looked
so kind, and spoke so civil! I knew he was
good. Children have an instinct as infallible as
a chymical test in detecting the presence of certain
qualities.
Mrs. Lee prepared some toast and tea for her
husband and a little deformed boy in the cradle,
and then sat down with her three girls to a
breakfast
on rye-mush.
The parents of Lucy Lee, our humble heroine,
were married some fifteen years before our story
begins. Richard Lee was then a young lawyer in
a country town in New England. His wife had
no near kindred, but she had been kindly cared for,
and well nurtured in the family of a distant relation;
and having a small fortune and a good education,
in the best sense of the word, that is, having had
her faculties well developed and prepared for the
uses of life, she had a rational prospect of
prosperity
and happiness. Her husband was an only
son, who had talents, ardent feelings, amiable
manners
,
and a small but sufficient fortune to begin
life upon in a country where the current sets to
prosperity. Such a beginning would have secured
pecuniary independence, unless singular misfortune
had intervened, or vice had appeared to counteract
and destroy the operation of the laws of Providence.
Vice it was. Six months after her marriage, Mrs.
Lee discovered that her husband was in the habit
of intemperate drinking. How the seeds of this
habit were sown in his childhood, by his parents'
foolish indulgence of the cravings of his appetite
for whatever tasted goodhow appetite, combining
with the selfishness that is nurtured by low animal
gratifications, obtained so early the mastery over
his better nature, it is not our purpose to describe.
We would only add this to the thousand examples
before the eyes of parents, to admonish them that
to secure to the future man temperance and health,
the child's appetites must be subdued to obedience.
When Mrs. Lee discovered her husband's
weakness
,
she was inexperienced and hopeful. She
remonstrated
and supplicated, he promised and she
believed. For years they went on, he sinning
and she sheltering him and enduring in silence.
But love and fidelity have no shelter broad enough
to conceal such habitsthey betray themselves
Richard Lee forfeited the confidence of the
community
.
He lost his business, and his property
melted away. He moved from place to place, and
finally went to the city of New-York, where, during
one of those episodical reforms that occur in every
drunkard's life, he resolved to turn over a new leaf.
He obtained copying from a prosperous lawyer
who had been a college contemporary. For a while
the stimulus of a new position operated favourably,
and the wants of his family were supplied by his
labour. But excess soon followed abstinence.
Returning home late in a cold evening from a
grogshop
,
he fell on the ice, broke his leg, and lay
exposed
to the inclemency of the weather till rescued
and conveyed to his home by a watchman. A
long and fatal illness followed.
B
CHAPTER II.
THE LEAST OF TWO EVILS.
It
was a few days previous to the timely
benefaction
of the baker's son that Lee broke his leg.
After he was disabled, his family subsisted on the
avails of work which his wife obtained from a
slop-shop
.
Her time was nearly consumed in
attendance
on her exacting husband. She had no friends
in the citynot an acquaintance even, excepting
her husband's employer, and he was not of a
character
to overcome her natural reluctance to make
known the extreme degradation of her condition.
Wantstarvationstared her in the face; still she
would not incur a debt, even for a loaf of bread,
that she saw no possibility of paying. Lucy,
she had said to her child, we can beg if we must,
but we will not take bread that we cannot pay for.
The poorest, even, have some means of education
when they can give such a practical lesson in
integrity
.
It had now become necessary to take some
measures
to obtain subsistence. Mrs. Lee was not the
woman to sit with her hands folded, and repeat
that bitter and perplexed `what shall I do!'
She applied at a Venetian blind-factory, and obtained
for her two youngest girls, the one eleven, the other
nine, the sewing of the worsted stays to the blinds,
by which they earned $1 50 per week; and this
in the intervals of their daily school. She had a
plan for Lucy, but this she would not put into
execution
without her father's concurrence, which she
foresaw it would be no easy matter to obtain.
Lucy had always been his darling. She was his
first-born. She was pretty; and having in his more
fortunate days given her some advantages of
education
,
he looked forward to a time when she might,
by that prize which is always in a pretty woman's
lottery, a fortunate marriage, regain the place in
society forfeited by his misconduct.
The children were asleep. Lee, wretched and
restless, was tossing on his bed, calling at every
moment his patient wife from the garment which
she was making by a dim light to earn one shilling.
The air of the room was scarcely tempered by the
single stick of wood in the stove, and all this misery
was the consequence of a base indulgence in a low
appetite. But the poor man paid the severest
penalty in his own person. Who that looked upon
his grisled hair, his bloated face, his bloodshot
eyes, and his stiffened and trembling limbs, could
have recognised him who, fifteen years before, was
one of the most promising young lawyers of
Massachusetts
?
After expressing a wish for this and that, and
complaining of the cold, What in Heaven's name
are we to do? he said. Has Barton never sent
to inquire after me?
Nohe probably does not know where we
live.
It would be easy finding outbut people don't
take pains to look up
poor
acquaintances. Barton
is no worse than the rest of the world. Lord help
us! we may as well come to it first as last. We
shall starve or freeze to death here. Won't you
stop that sewing? Every stitch of your needle goes
through my nerves. You can't earn enough to
save us from starvation. Send me to the
almshouse
it
makes little difference where one dies;
and when I am gone you can manage to scramble
on with the rest.
No, Richardnowe have gone through many
a dark day together, and we will not separate till
it pleases God to part us. Lee drew the sheet
over his face. We have a hard winter before
us, and we must take measures accordingly. The
first step should be to reduce the family. I am
thinking of getting a place for Lucy.
A
place!
what sort of a place?
A service-place.
Good Heavens! you are not in earnest?
I am; and, if you will hear me patiently, you
may think me right.
Never, neverall the talking in the world
won't persuade me to degrade Lucy to a servant.
Mrs. Lee thought of the degradation to which
her husband's vice had reduced them, and she
resolutely
proceeded.
We must have relief, and that immediately. I
will not subject my children to being depraved by
dependance on charity while they have the means
of exertionhonest labour is never degrading.
Certainly not to those who are used to it.
Nor to those that need it, dear husband, as we
do. It does not startle or frighten me in the least.
I have been through all gradations from perfect
competency to our present suffering state, and each
degreeeven ourshas its peculiar advantages
and temptations, and its happiness too.
Happiness! echoed Lee.
His wife proceeded: I can't but hope Lucy will
find hers in a faithful performance of her duties.
I can truly say I have often envied servants when
I have heard the merry peals of laughter in the
kitchen, and known what anxious hearts there were
in the parlour.
But what is all this to the purpose! Lucy
shall never live in anybody's kitchen.
It is much to the purpose, replied Mrs. Lee,
judiciously answering to the first clause of his
sentence, to settle it in our minds that Lucy may
be good and happy in any position.
But, wife, considerrecollect how you and I
were brought up.
That is what I try to forget!
But you ought not voluntarily to put Lucy out
to service!
Richard, you know I do not mean to reproach
you; but I must say, that in our situation we have
lost the power of voluntary actionwe are under the
stern coercion of necessity. Mrs. Lee now laid
aside her work, and spoke, though with a tremulous
voice, in a tone of decision she seldom assumed.
For the last week Lucy and I have lived on
rye-mush
.
The bread you and the other children have
eaten was given to us by the baker. I will not
continue to subsist on his bounty while we have
unemployed means of feeding ourselves. Lucy is
nearly fourteen, old enough to get a place and earn
wages. There will be one less to eat, and some
help through this hard winter from her earnings.
B 2
But how can you bear to think of making a
mere servant-girl of Lucy?
The condition of servant-girls is no longer what
it once was. They are not servants in the old sense
of the word. Their relation to their employers
is one of mutual advantage and mutual
dependance
.
In a well-ordered family, a girl is fitting
herself for the duties that belong to her sex. She
is learning to fill honourably the station of a wife,
mistress, and mother of a family.
Oh, I grant you, in a well-ordered family! but
where will you find such? and pray, how are you
to know anything of the family you put her in
you have not an acquaintance in the city.
No, not oneand this it is that perplexes and
distresses me. It seems to me we never know the
wants of a condition till we are placed in it
ourselves
.
I remember joining in a laugh at the
presumption
of a servant, who, when asked for her
references
,
asked them in return of the employer.
Yet surely the knowledge should be mutual in such
a contract.
You are always refining, wifewhat should
be and what
is
in this world are wide apart, and
you must submit to what is. I see, he added,
after a pause and a groan, what we are coming
toI never realized it before!
Shameshame to thee, Lee! This from a man
conscious of having lived for fifteen years in the
violation of the laws of temperance, to which are
affixed such rewards and such dreadful penalties;
who had broken his marriage vows, involving in
mortification, hardship, and bitter sorrow her whom
he had sworn to cherish and protect; who had not
only neglected the duties of a Christian father, but
foregone the instincts of a brute parent, and,
depriving
his children of their birthright in a
prosperous
land, had reduced them to the privations
and slavery of extreme poverty. Yet this weak
man revolted from putting his child to domestic
service as the severest trial of his condition!
This was doubtless an extreme case of Lee.
But was not his feeling a part of a very general
false estimate of life, its positions, its trials, and
its duties?
CHAPTER III.
LOOKING FOR A PLACE.
Mrs. Lee
having made up her mind that Lucy
must go to service, tried to look upon the bright
side of the necessity, and to present the brightest
to her husband, but in her own secret heart she
had bitter conflicts. She had, as we have said, no
acquaintance in the city; she wanted not only a
place for this pure, good little girl, who had never
left the shelter of her mother's wing, but a good
place, where the weaknesses of childhood would
be considered; where its faults would be patiently
borne with, forgiven, and corrected; where its
ignorance
would be instructed; where the employer
would feel the responsibility, and the privilege, we
may add, of training a young creature in virtue
and religion, of converting a domestic to a friend.
Do these palpable duties enter into the calculations
of a majority of employers?
At the end of the week Mrs. Lee had saved two
shillings; and having provided for her husband's
comfort in her absence, placed her little lame boy
within reach of his books and playthings, and given
all necessary charges to the little girls, she set off
with Lucy at twelve o'clock on her pilgrimage for
a place. She entered a decent intelligence-office,
paid the fee, and obtained a reference to Mrs.
Oatley's
,
as a consequential man informed her, one of
the most
fashionablest
houses in Broadway.
Can you tell me nothing else of the family?
inquired Mrs. Lee.
Not I, womanwhat else can you want to
know?
If the place does not suit me, you will give me
other references?
Certainlywe'll suit your slip of a girl to a
placethere's no mistake about that.
Mrs. Lee sighed, left the office, and proceeded to
the place. The house verified her informer's
promise; everything in it and about it had a
fashionable
aspect. She was shown into Mrs. Oatley's
bedroom, where that lady was sitting with a
grownup
daughter. Both ladies, on learning their errand,
surveyed the humble strangers from head to foot.
Mrs. Lee the while, pale and exhausted with her
long walk, was left standing as if in royal presence
and this in a land where we vaunt our equality
and democratic institutions!
Do you think she will answer our purpose,
Anne? asked the mother of the daughter.
Nicely, mamma; and then, in a lower but still
audible tone, she is a tidy lassie, and pretty too
just the thing to tend the door.
She looks pale, I hope she is not sickly? I
can't undertake a sickly child, said Mrs. Oatley,
inquiringly.
She is not in the least sickly, ma'amshe is
paler than is natural to her just now.
How does that happen? It would have been
a long and sad story to explain how that happened,
and a hard one for Mrs. Lee to tell; she therefore
evaded the question, You will find her strong
enough, ma'am, to perform any service you will
require
.
Then followed the customary questions,
to which Mrs. Lee replied, as she had
predetermined
,
simply that she was a stranger in the city,
and that she was compelled, by the wants
consequent
on her husband's protracted illness, to seek
a place for her child.
It's much the best thing for your child, good
woman.
That depends! thought poor Mrs. Lee. She
ventured to ask what service would be required of
Lucy.
Oh, the work I want her for is just nothing at
allmerely to tend the door, bring up messages,
and occasionally to run of errandsyou could not
find a better place for herI'll give her four dollars
a month.
And if she is civil, &c., &c., &c., said Miss
Oatley, she'll get plenty of presents.
The wages are very liberal, ma'am, said Mrs.
Lee, after a little hesitation, but
Oh, if you object, it is not worth talking about
it is a place very easy to supply.
The only objection I have to make, ma'am,
you will not perhaps think a very unreasonable one.
My child must be qualifying herself for the future,
and I fear the very light work she has here would
rather unfit than fit her for the future.
Oh, very wellas you pleasea droll
objection
thoughhey, Mary? There is no end to the
whims and demands of servants nowadays
always
something new! but it really is a little too
much to expect to turn a gentleman's house into a
school!
Mrs. Lee felt her heart rising, but she struggled
to keep it down, and asked, with the humility
necessary
to her forlorn condition, if she might take
till Monday to consider.
Noon the whole, I don't think your girl would
suit mechildren that have never lived out are
very apt to have their heads full of whims.
Do let's go, mother, whispered Lucy. And
they went without one kind word that would
intimate
they were beings of the same human family
with the mistress of the mansion.
What a goose the woman is! said Mrs.
Oatley
,
as the door closed upon the disappointed
applicants
.
Yet Mrs. Oatley was not a hard-hearted
woman; she
only
had never considered the feelings
and rights of her inferiors in position. Strange
reverses and revelations would there be to the
more favoured classes if an intrinsic graduating
scale could be applied.
Mrs. Lee retraced her way to the
intelligence-office
.
The man was civil, and looked over his
list. Mrs. Timson, Greenwich-street,
boarding-house
,
wants a girl from twelve to fifteenthe very
thing, ma'am.
No, sir. I cannot put my child into a
boarding-house
.
Pshaw! must not be more nice than wise. If
she's clever and handylooks so, winking at
Lucy, she'll pick up plenty of presents.
Please to give me another reference.
Here's one in Grand-street and two in
Bleeker-street
.
If one shoe pinches, another may fit.
There's Mrs. Tom Clark, a lawyer's ladythere's
her number, Grand-street. There's Mrs. Aaron
Sadwell, her husband made a fortune last summer;
and there's Mrs. Kidder, a fashionable shoemaker's
wifeso there's a choice for you. To Mrs. Tom
Clark's they first went. Mrs. Clark, after a long
interrogation, dismissed them, saying, she made it
a rule never to take girls that had not lived out
they required too much teaching!
Mrs. Sadwell inquired if the child knew how to
work, and Mrs. Lee, warned by her last experience,
replied that she had herself taken great pains to
teach her.
Ah, well, then, said Mrs. Sadwell, she'll
not do. I shall have to unlearn her the ways of
such sort of people as you, my good woman, and
those of a gentleman's family are so different!
As they went down Mrs. Sadwell's steps, Mrs.
Lee, struggling to hide her emotions from her child,
said, in a cheerful voice, Well, Lucy, dear, we'll
go next to Mrs. Kidder's; those who know what
work is ought to have most consideration for their
servant. And to Mrs. Kidder's, a full mile from
the office, they went. The door was opened by
a rude, dirty boy (Mrs. Kidder's eldest hope), who,
running to the landing-places on the stairs, shouted,
MaI say, can't you come downhere's
somebody
after a place.
Tell 'em to come up here, Lorenzo.
Follow your nose, ma'am, called out the boy,
and go to where you hear the tum-tumin.
Mrs. Lee obeyed the direction; and passing an
open parlour door, she saw two communicating
apartments gaudily furnished. Lucy followed her
mother, and, as she reached the bottom of the stairs,
Mr. Lorenzo came sliding down on the baluster,
and, as he landed beside her, he threw his arm
round her neck, kissed her cheek, and ran shouting
out of the house. Lucy, confounded, called,
Mother
,
mother! and would have implored her to turn
back; but Mrs. Lee was already at the turn of the
stairs, where she had been met by a slatternly Irish
girl, who had spilled half a basin of dirty water at
her feet. Not being in the least aware of the
impertinence
offered to her child, she had sprung
forward
to avoid the inundation, and was already in
the presence of Mrs. Kidder, who sat before the
open door of the room whence proceeded the
tum-tuminthat is to say, the notes of a cracked
piano, whereon one of the Misses Kidder was
thrumming. You come from the
intelligence-office
,
I take it?
Before Mrs. Lee could reply, one of the half
dozen children in the room shouted out, Ma,
mayn't Matilda give me my horse?
No, I say I won't, 'cause he snatched my slate
yesterday.
Come to me, Orlandoyou're as dirty as a pig
here, blow your nose, taking his apron for the
office. Matilda, stop your noise, and go and
comb out your hairit looks like a hurra's nest
you're wanting a place for your girl, I suppose?
Not here! thought poor Mrs. Lee; but she
merely replied, I am looking for one.
Can she do all kinds of work? Before Mrs.
Lee could reply there was another outbreak from
Orlando, who was now indeed Furioso, Ma, shan't
Anna Maria be still? she is putting pepper-corns
into my ear.
Come to me, Anna Maria. Anna Maria
received
a cuff from her mother, and went bawling
back to her place. The young practitioner at the
piano meanwhile proceeded. Is your girl handy
at work in general? resumed Mrs. Kidder.
She understands work, and is as capable as
most girls of her age. She has always lived at
home, and has been my only assistant.
Well, you both look neat and clean, and that is
a very good symptom.
A competent judge! thought Mrs. Lee, as
she looked at the carpet saturated with grease, the
defaced furniture, and the filthy persons of the
uncombed
,
unwashed mother and children.
I want, continued Mrs. Kidder, a girl that's
handy in assisting about cookingthat can make
up beds, and sweep out rooms, and set tables, and
wait and tend when the girls have company, and
understands washing dishes, and cleaning knives,
and is handy at ironing, and helping the girls
clearstarch
;
washing I calculate to hire; but I have
concluded
not to keep any steady help but a young
C
girlyou can't depend on them Irish, and husband
thinks, and so do I, the wages is too much.
Mrs. Lee saw Lucy's eye turning with most
earnest appeal to her, and she was thinking how
civilly to break off a treaty to which she was from
the first determined not to accede, when they were
again interrupted, this time by the entrance of the
eldest Miss Kidder, followed by a milliner's girl
with a bandbox, which was immediately opened,
and two hats displayed for the mother's inspection.
Oh, ma, do say I may have this one, said the
young lady; it's only seven dollars and a half;
Madame l'Epine asked ten at first, but she said it
was so becoming to me it was a pity I should not
have it! Oh, is not it a love? Madame says it's
just like Mrs. , mentioning a name well
known in the fashionable world and the milliner's
world, and thence handed down to the humblest
devotee to feathers and flowers in the city. Do
say yes, ma.
The hat was tried on, and gave the daughter to
the mother's eye so decidedly the air of bon ton,
that the desired Yes was promptly spoken.
This matter settled, Mrs. Kidder turned to Lucy.
Well, child, if you are a mind to come and do
your best, I'll give you three dollars a month, and
that is more than such a child as you can possibly
earn.
My child cannot undertake the work you
expect
from her for any wages, said Mrs. Lee.
Oh, very well! very well! there are enough
that will. Mrs. Lee was scarcely out of the room
before the mother and young ladies vituperated
the whole race of servants, who, they said, expected
to do nothing and be paid for it; and Mrs. Kidder
finished by saying she thought three dollars
generous
wages; at any rate, she could not afford to pay
more. And she could not, and pay seven dollars
and a half for a dress hat. Alas! the justice that
is concerned in giving a fair and adequate reward
to labour, is incompatible with the expensive
gratification
of vanity.
Mrs. Lee was not encouraged by the result of
her inquiries thus far; but long trials had taught
her patience; and when Lucy said, as they left the
Kidders' door, Oh, mother, let me go home and
starve with you! she replied in a cheerful tone,
One swallow does not make a summer, Lucy,
nor one frost a winter.
But, mother, you will be so tired!and it's so
dreadful to you to be talked to so by people that
don't know you!
I am a little tired, Lucy, but that a night's rest
will cure. And as to being talked to, as you call it,
in this way, there are good uses in it. It gives
me a realizing sense of some of the trials endured
by those whose lot is a menial condition that I
never had before. It is good for us, for a little
while at least, to take the place of our
fellow-creatures
,
and feel the weight of their burdens. And
after all, my child, it is quite as well to be the
humble, disdained, and questioned place-seeker, as
those who so thoughtlessly pain us. Oh, what
opportunities are lost for want of a little
consideration
!
If these women had known what a
comfort
a kind word, fitly spoken, would have been to
us, they would not have treated us in a way to
shock you. We must try not to think too
harshly
,
Lucy, of our fellow-creatures when they do
wrong.
Well, I shall
try
, motherbut I
feel
first, and
afterward you make me
think
what shall I do
when I am away from you?
Again our poor pilgrims retraced their way to
the office, and received from the man, who seemed
no way surprised at these repeated demands, three
more references. One to Mrs. Louis, in
Barclay-street
,
and that being nearest, thither Mrs. Lee
went. Mrs. Louis's establishment indicated the
wealth of the proprietor. A servant announced
Mrs. Lee to her lady. Do, Ellen, said Mrs.
Louis, looking up from the last new novel, and
addressing her seamstress, go down and speak
to herI can't be bothered.
Ellen returned with a most favourable report, to
which her mistress, as she did not lift her eyes
from her book, could have given but half an ear.
When Ellen stopped talking, she said, She'll do,
no doubt, but I can't speak to her nowtell her to
call again in an hour or two.
She looks very tired, ma'am. Mrs. Louis
neither
heeded nor heard. The child is a pretty child
and they have had a tedious long walk, Mrs. Louis
and if you would please to speak to them now?
Do, Ellen, hush! said her mistress, looking
up from the tale of fictitious distress that was
drenching her face with tears. If the woman is
tired, tell her to call Monday.
You engaged to go out early Monday morning,
Mrs. Louis.
How you interrupt me, Ellen! If I am out,
can't she call again?
I would not advise you to come, if you have
another place in view, added Ellen, kindly, after
delivering Mrs. Louis's message; Mrs. Louis has
an engagement out, and you don't look able to take
a long walk for nothing.
Mrs. Louis was not naturally more selfish than
others. The sensibility that was poured out over
a novel, or exhausted upon herself, if directed into
proper channels, would have made her estimate
rightly the value of time, the expense of labour,
and the pain of hope deferred to a poor woman;
would, in short, have given her that lively sense of
the rights and wants of others that is manifest in
justice and kindness.
The next lady to whom her references admitted
her was a Mrs. Ardley, a good-humoured,
self-indulgent
,
easy-tempered woman. She asked few
questions, and was satisfied with the answers
given. All I want, she said, is a civil,
obliging
child, that is handy and willingwho will be
ready to do a turn for the waiter, run out for the
seamstress, help the cook, run up and down for
the nurseodds and ends, you know. If my people
are satisfied, I shall be.
Mrs. Lee hesitated. These multiplied employers
seemed to her like a many-headed monster; but
the hope of anything better was fast fading away.
While she hesitated, the cook sent up to know if
Mrs. Ardley would lend her a certain dress-cap for
a pattern.
[1]
[1]
This may seem an extravagant case, but we have heard
from a lady that her cooka
coloured
womanoffered to lend
her her own new
blonde
cap for a model!
I have done with the cap, said Mrs. Ardley,
rolling up her eyes, laughing, and tossing from out
her wardrobe a soiled cap, decked with bows and
flowers; tell Ferris she's welcome to it. She
was evidently pleased with her own generosity, as
well as amused at her woman's enterprising vanity.
Well, we seem to be agreed, she said to Mrs.
Lee; let your child come on Monday.
There is one favour I would ask before
concluding
,
ma'amcan my child have a room or a
bed to herself?
Oh, nothere is no one, I believe, more
indulgent
than I am to my peoplebut this is a
stretch a little beyond mepray, does
miss
have a
room to herself at home?
No, ma'am, I have but one room for my
husband
,
myself, and my four children.
I beg your pardon, ma'am! said Mrs. Ardley,
almost involuntarily. There was a gentle dignity
in Mrs. Lee's manner, that made her feel for a
moment, in spite of their apparent relative stations,
as if she were in the presence of a superior.
Sophy, she said, turning to her maid, you
know better than Ican you make up a separate
bed for this little girl?
No, ma'amnot a comfortable onethere is
not a mattress, nor even a blanket out of use.
Why, Sophy, you make us out rather
poverty-stricken
.
Oh, no, Mrs. Ardley! you know I did not mean
thatthere's piles of bedding in the trunk-room
it's only the servants' that is scanty!
Oh, ho! then we are not quite paupers yet?
Mrs. Ardley!
You see how it is, resumed Mrs. Ardley to
Mrs. Lee. I should like to gratify you. I know
a mother has peculiar feelings, let her situation in
life be what it will; but your child will do very
well with the cookhey, Sophy?
I don't know, Mrs. Ardleyyou remember
Mary Orme?
Oh, it was that drunken wretch, Morris, that
Mary Orme objected to sleeping with.
Yes, Mrs. Ardleybut
But what, Sophy? you are always making
mountains of molehills.
Mrs. Lee waited anxiously for the explanation
of Sophy's but. Sophy, however, though
sympathizing
with Mrs. Lee's scruples, did not like to
risk offending Mrs. Ardley by telling the truth,
that Ferris, the present cook, was strongly
suspected
of her predecessor's infirmity.
At any rate, said Mrs. Ardley, let your
little
girl come and try. I take a fancy to her.
This first expression of good-will that she had
heard that day brought Mrs. Lee almost to a
conclusion
;
but still she shrunk from exposing Lucy
to such contact with a stranger, of whose good
character neither mistress nor maid ventured to
give an assurance, and it was finally settled that if.
Mrs. Lee did not find a place to suit her better,
Lucy should come on Monday morning. And at
any rate, if she does, let her call and let me know,
said Mrs. Ardley.
How silly it is in the woman to strain so at a
gnat! said Mrs. Ardley, after Mrs. Lee's
departure
;
when, by her own account, they live in such
a mess at home.
Yes, ma'ambut I suspect she has seen better
days.
She never hinted at any such thing.
No, ma'ambut I somehow feel as if she had;
and to them that has, Mrs. Ardley, it must be
pretty hard to put up with what we have to gulp
down, and say nothing about it.
How ridiculous, Sophy! when everybody says
servants have it all their own way nowadays.
Do
servants
say so, Mrs. Ardley?
I am sure I don't know what they say:
Sophy was not addicted to the classics, or she
might have aptly reminded Mrs. Ardley of the lion's
comment on the sculptor's giving the victory to man
over him.
I do remember, resumed Mrs. Ardley,
recuring
to the applicants, thinking once while they
were here that that poor body had something
superior
to her condition. If so, it must be shocking
for her to go about so among strangers, looking up
a place for that nice little girlif she calls
Monday
morning, I will try and keep her, even if she
has engaged a place. Mrs. Ardley felt a
sympathy
for a fallen
possible
lady, that she never
would have dreamed of for a
mere poor woman
.
When Mrs. Lee and Lucy again went on their
way the lamps were lighting. There was still
one application to be made, and, both wearied in
body and spirit, they proceeded to the upper end of
Greenwich-street, to a Mrs. Broadson's.
Mrs. Broadson asked innumerable questions,
relevant
and irrelevant. Where Mrs. Lee was born;
where she came from when she came to the city;
how long she had lived in New-York; how many
children she had; what was her business; what
was her husband's. Strange, she said, that
when your husband was able to earn a living by
writing, he should be so very pooris he a sober
man?
Mrs. Lee's faded cheek glowed as she replied,
He could scarcely be otherwise in his present
condition.
Is he kind to you?
Lucy looked up to her mother with tearful eyes.
Excuse me, ma'am, said Mrs. Lee, from
answering
questions that have nothing to do with my
child's qualifications.
Hem! I understandwhy have not you put
out your child before?
I wanted her at home.
The old excuse! Let me tell you, good
woman, it's a very poor one. I am patroness of
an infant schoolI know children can't be taught
too early.
I have an infant school at
home
, replied Mrs.
Lee, somewhat proudly.
Oh, yes, I know; but your children get such
shocking habits sosling about, and doing nothing,
and living all in a clutter.
What work do you wish to employ my child
for, ma'am?
Oh, you should not be too particular. I make
it a rule that a child should be willing to be called
on for anything. I have two servants, and at most
her work will not be worth speaking of. There
are but two of us, I and husband.
At this juncture Mrs. Broadson was called out,
and an Irish servant who remained in the room
asked Mrs. Lee to sit down, and kindly drew a low
chair for Lucy to the fire. Warm ye, child, she
said, you look kilt with the cold, and being
questioned
at this way, and no use either. Lucy
was exhausted, and the kind word, and not the
concluding intimation, opened a fountain of tears.
Och, child! ye should not fret, continued her
consoler, ye'll be after soon finding a place. It
is not with you as with them that an't born in
their native landlike my poor Judy M'Phealan!
Mrs. Broadson's return interrupted this flow of
kindness; and that lady, after higgling about
wages
,
and making many comments upon the
extravagant
demands of servants, and their
worthlessness
nowadays, agreed to receive Lucy the next
Monday morning. This was almost a measure of
desperation on Mrs. Lee's part. She had
fruitlessly
exhausted her day, and this was apparently
the best situation that had offered. The family
was small. There was an air of order and thrift
in the house, and that, with the kindness of the Irish
woman, Lucy's only fellow-servant, had decided
Mrs. Lee. Sure! said this same woman, as
the door closed after Mrs. Lee, with a face so
changed that she scarcely seemed the same, sure
you do not mane to give this one the place you
promised to Judy?
I mean to have two strings to my bow. If
Judy don't come
But sure she'll be after coming.
Well, if she does, Biddy, you may take time
to look her up another place. It's natural, you
know, I should prefer an American girl.
And this is the way you ladies keep your word
to us, and then complain that we are not up to the
mark! Poor Judy! God help her!
Is the failure in the performance of contracts
between employers and employed so generally
complained of confined to one of the contracting
parties? We ask the experienced.
CHAPTER IV.
LEAVING HOME.
On
Sunday evening Mrs. Lee announced to her
family that Lucy was to leave home in the
morning
.
Lee was reduced to passiveness, and a long
interval of temperance, enforced though it was, had
caused him to revert to some of the feelings of his
better days. Come to my bedside, Lucy, he
said; you are going out into the world, child
you'll find it's a selfish worldeverybody is for
number onekeep open a jealous eyedon't
submit
to be trampled onI have seen enough of the
tyranny of mankindI have no faith in them
your mother will tell you a different storyyour
mother is one of the best of women, and her own
goodness is a kind of veil between her and the
wickedness of the world. She puts the best face
on everything, but she does not seem to have
much to say for the place you are going towell,
there is one consolationyou can always change
itif you have anything to complain of, let us know
itdon't submit to imposition. Now I have given
you all the advice I can think ofbut oh, my child,
what shall I do when you are gone? you have
always
been my pride and darling! you do
everything
just right for meyou fix my pillow easy,
and you make my tea just sweet enough, and you
can always make Jemmie quiet, and the girls are
contented when you are in the house. Oh, Lucy,
if I could only do anything for you!
You can, father, replied Lucy, laying her
cheek wet with tears to his; always speak kind
to mother and poor Jemmie!
Her father promised, and remembered, for the
first time, that others were to suffer severely, as
well as himself, from Lucy's departure.
Jemmie, the poor little boy who was the object
of his sister's intense love and tender care, had
received
a terrible injury when he was three years
old from a fall from a horse, on which his father,
in a fit of intoxication, and in spite of his mother's
entreaties and remonstrances, had insisted on
placing
him. The child's back was protruded, and his
limbs withered, but his mind had a preternatural
development. Lucy withdrew from her father's
bed to prepare Jemmie's supper. He, meanwhile,
was lying in his basket-cradle, his soft black eye
following his sister, and tear after tear trickling
down his unnaturally pale cheek. She sat down
on her accustomed seat beside him. He took in
silence one or two swallows, and then gently
pushing
away the spoon, he said, It chokes me,
Lucy! I can't eat to-night. Lucy set away the
cup of tea, and, putting her lips to his, whispered,
Don't feel so, Jemmie.
How can I help it, Lucy?
Oh, we must do as mother sayslook at the
bright side, Jemmie. I shall come home
every
Sunday.
Every Sunday; and oh, how long it will seem
before Sunday comes! But it is not of myself I'm
thinking, though it does make the tears come so
when I think you won't be here to ask for what I
want, and always to look pleasant, and leave your
work, and come and read to me, and sing to me
when the other girls want to be doing something
else, and I can't bear to trouble motherand you
are never tired drawing me, and I can go to sleep
if my breast aches ever so much when you bend
over me, and stroke, and smile, and stroke as if it
were always pleasant to do it; but it's not for
myself
only
, Lucy, and here he sobbed aloud; but
I cannot bear to think you must go away from your
own home, and work all day for people that will
only pay you, and not love you as we do.
Not as
you
do, replied Lucy, making an
effort
to speak calmly; but I shall try to make
them love me a littleit would be hard indeed to
work for nothing but money, and I do not intend
to do so. Mother says she never saw a family yet
where there was not some one to love, and some
good to do besides just workI shall tryit's not
very agreeable to have a hungry stomach, but a
hungry heart must be a great deal worsedon't
you think so, Jemmie?
Jemmie smiled through his tears. I should
think so, Lucy, but I don't know anything about
it, for we have always plenty of the best food for
our hearts, if we have not anything else.
We must thank mother for that; and now
D
promise me, Jemmie, you'll make the best of my
going.
I'll try, Lucy, replied the little fellow, with a
quivering lip; and Lucy proceeded with all the
resolution she could muster to go through her usual
occupations. Her father's evening meal was
prepared
with as much care as that of a more pampered
epicure. His toast, his tea and salt fish, must be
exactly right to tempt the sense, blunted and
diseased
by gross indulgence, and he selfishly ate,
and groaned, and fretted, while his defrauded wife
and girls sat by, supping on the hardest fare.
Thanks to the sweet used of labour and
temperance
,
they relished it more than the sick man could
have relished a Roman feast.
I am sure, said little Annie Lee, setting back
her chair, and throwing herself into Lucy's lap, I
don't know what Martha and I are to do when you
are gone.
Do? replied Lucy, kissing her; why, Annie,
you are to do all your work, and mine into the
bargain
.
Oh, Lucy, you know that is not what I mean;
but who will make Martha's paste?
I have taught her how to make it as well as I
can.
Yes; but sometimes she has bad luck with it,
and you never have bad luck, and she can't call
on mother, because mother has too much to do
already
.
No; instead of calling on mother, I hope you
will both always be ready to assist her.
But I must ask her, Lucy, to fix my work when
it plagues me, and to put my band on, and to do
everything that you do, and that I can't do.
Well, do your best, girlstry hard to please
fathernever,
never
get out of patience with poor
little Jemmie, and always be kind to dear mother
be
thoughtful
, girlsdon't wait till she asks you
to do a thing, for you know mother is too apt to do
things herself rather than to keep asking and
asking
I
think, girls, it's the willingness we put into
our service that sweetens it to ourselves and to
othersyou will have a great deal more to do
when I am gone; but I shan't be sitting with my
hands before me, and what I earn I shall bring home
to mother; so, though apart, we are all working
for home. Come, mother, let us sit down round
Jemmie's cradle and sing our hymnsit won't
disturb
you, will it, father?
NoI don't hear you half the time when you
sing.
Singing hymns with her children was Mrs. Lee's
habitual Sunday-evening recreation; and never had
she seen an hour so dark and disturbed that this
exercise did not tranquillize and elevate her
spirits
.
Sometimes Jemmie's thin feeble voice
joined
the rest, and he attempted now to raise it,
but his tremulous tones soon died away; and
pressing
Lucy's hand which held his, he said, I can
only join you in my heart, Lucy. Mr. Lee fell
asleep; and when the singing was finished, Mrs.
Lee knelt in the midst of her children, and
commended
them to the care of their Father in Heaven.
Most earnestly did she pray for her who was going
forth from the shelter of family love into the world,
that in her temptations she might remember Him
who was tempted in all points as we are, and yet
without sinthat in her ignorance and weakness
she might seek wisdom and strength from him
who giveth liberallyand that at last, however
separated
and tried on earth, they might all, parents
and children, meet in the bosom of the father.
As they rose the children kissed their mother
and kissed one another. It is such worship as
this, in the sanctuary of
home
, that binds in one
bundle of life the parent and child, that
sustains
the old and prepares the young for conflict
and victory. Before you go to bed, Lucy,
said her mother, I must give you some advice;
it must be general, for I cannot foresee the
circumstances
in which you may be placed. You
cannot greatly err if you will keep it in mind that
God's eye is upon you, and if you love him
supremely
.
Remember what I have so often told you,
that it is not the events of lifeits outward
circumstances
that are important, but the effect they
have on our characters. The cloudy and the
bright day alike soon pass away. It is our
business
to sow the seed and till the ground, and then,
whether bright or cloudy, the harvest will come in
due season. You will have trials, Lucy: your
most faithful services may pass without praise,
thanks, or even noticebut be patient, my child
toil not for praisedo not shrink from underserved
blame. Be content with the sense of doing your
dutyjudge yourself honestly, and never forfeit
your own self-respect. I am a little afraid you will
fail in the manners suited to your conditionI have
been so sure that my children respected me, that I
have not required the outward sign. Though we
live in a republican country, the truth is, we have
unequal
conditionsI do not wish you to be servileI
would not have you imitate the manners of foreign
servantsa respectful manner, my dear child, is
always fitting from a young person to her elders,
and modesty, civility, and gentleness are suited to
every relation in life. I have known many ladies
speak to their domestics with far more civility
than they replied to themand I know some who
forget, in their manners at least, that domestics
are no longer slaves. Keep your feelings right
towards your employers, and then your manners
cannot be very unsuitable. Remember the great
virtue of that soft answer that turneth away wrath.
The heads of families have a great many irritating,
vexing cares that you can know nothing of: if
they are petulant and unreasonable to you, be
forbearing
,
my child, and you may do them good; at
any rate, you will avoid doing evil yourself. Be
gentle and patient, kind and generous, to the
children
of the family.
Gentle, patient, and kind I can bebut
how in the world generous? what shall I have to
give?
Your time, your strength, your ingenuity; a
person who will sit by a child and contrive it
amusement for half an hour is far more
generous
than she who goes out with a full purse and buys
the same child an expensive toy. Our means of
generosity do not depend on our richesyour
generosity
,
dear Lucy, when you have foregone a
pleasant walk of a Sunday, and sat down by poor
little Jemmie, and made him happy for an hour, has
often brought tears to my eyes.
D 2
Oh, said Lucy, how I do wish Mrs.
Broadson
had childrensomething that I could love.
If you find you cannot love Mrs. Broadson,
Lucy, you may find somebody to lovemaybe
that good-natured Irish girl.
That will be a comfortand if Mrs. Broadson
is cross, maybe she will take my part.
Have a care, Lucy; don't have any
combination
against your employer.
But, mother, you would not have me bear
everything?
No, my child; when there is that which you
ought not to bear, you must change your place;
but don't be in haste to do this; you will find
something
disagreeable in every place; permanence is
in itself a great good, especially for a young
person
.
You hardly need any other recommendation
than that you have lived a long while in any decent
family.
Well, mother, I shall always come home and
tell you all my troubles, and then do just what you
think best.
No, Lucytry first to bear your troubles, and,
by bearing, overcome them. If they are
insupportable
,
then come to meif you are puzzled as to
what you ought to do, come to me  but don't
make mountains of molehills. One thing I charge
you to be circumspect aboutthe private
circumstances
of a family must be more or less exposed
to the persons employed in it, and a feeling of
honour should restrain them from tale-bearingI
am afraid there is very little of this. The time will
come, when, as the condition of the employed in our
country is very much elevated above what that of
the same class is in any other country, their
characters
will be so too. This relation is sometimes a
very happy one, when there is mutual kindness, and
affection, and, I may say, respecttrust on one side,
and faithfulness on the other, and gratitude on both.
Gratitude, mother? Do you think that I can
make a person that pays me for my service
grateful
to me besides?
My dear child, if you are such a servant as I
trust you will be, you will render services that
money can never pay forbut you will understand
all this better hereafter, when you have seen more
of the world. Serve others from a sense of duty
as you have served me from love. Remember the
woman in Scripture of whom our Saviour said `she
had done all that she
could
,' and for that reason he
graciously accepted her small service. Ask God's
blessing dailythat will be sufficient for you.
Good-night, my dear child
to-morrow
you begin!
Lucy moved Jemmie from his basket-cradle to her
cot, where he always slept, and fell asleep wetting
his cheek with her tears.
It was worthy of remark, that Mrs. Lee had never
once alluded to her former superior condition. She
carried her virtue still further; she endeavoured to
conceal it from her children, and to forget it
herself
.
How unlike those who have neither the
sense nor the virtue to adapt their minds to fallen
fortunes, but with their old tastes and appetites are
for ever hankering after the luxuries of Egypt,
instead of putting forth the strength essential to
help them through the wilderness, and which would
surely carry them to an inheritance enriched with
divine giftsthe
promised land
of persevering
virtue.
CHAPTER V.
GOING TO SERVICE.
Early
Monday morning, before her father or the
children were awake, Lucy, with her basket in
hand, and her mother's last blessing cheerfully
spoken, set out for Mrs. Broadson's. In fulfilment
of her promise to Mrs. Ardley, she called at that
lady's house to acquaint her with her decision.
Before she had half finished her sentence to the
waiter who opened the door, he said, Ah, I
understand
,
you are the girl Mrs. Ardley gave me
the message for. She says that, as all things are
not quite to your mother's mind here, she'll make
your wages four dollars and a half, if you'll stop
with us.
I cannotI promised Mrs. Broadson.
Oh, that's nothing; the ladies don't half the
time keep their promises with us, and it is
presuming-like
to set out to be better than theyand
Mrs. Ardley bid me tell you an engagement did
not matter till you began at the place.
Good-morning, said Lucy, abruptly, a little
shocked at this new exposition of moral obligation,
and yet secretly wishing she could honestly have
got that additional half dollar for her poor mother.
If we knew the temptation the poor resisted, surely
we should have more sympathy and more respect
for them. The waiter thought Lucy a silly
child, but inferred, from his own experience, that
she would soon learn better!
As Lucy went up Mrs. Broadson's steps she
passed a girl about her own age, with a shabby
bandbox under her arm, such as the improvident
poor usually use to contain all their goods and
chattels. Lucy perceived the girl had been
weeping
,
and thought that she eyed her askance; but
she soon forgot her in the novelty of her situation.
She was admitted by a Polish waiter, who spoke
but few words, and those broken English. It was
still early; but Mrs. Broadson, a stirring, notable
woman, was in her breakfast-room, ready to receive
the new-comer, to give her a right start, as
she said. Mrs. Broadson, it may be recollected,
was the wife of a man who had, by speculating,
suddenly gained a fortune, and, like too many who
thus emerge into a new element in our country, she
required (but had not) a new organization to fit her
for it. The sun and fortune do
not
make
all
insects shine.
Mrs. Broadson had been accustomed to grubbing
all her lifeher domestic labours were now limited
to getting the greatest possible service for the least
possible compensation.
Ah, here you are, child, was her greeting to
Lucy; I am glad you have kept your engagement
servants can't be too particular about thatrun
up to the atticthere you'll see Biddy's roomI
told your mother you should sleep with Biddy.
Leave your basket there, and come back to me.
Lucy went with that sad feeling so natural in
exploring a strange house, and she sprang forward
as if she had met a friend when she saw Bridget's
face in her little cold attic. But how strangely
altered was that face to her! Instead of the hearty
kindness with which she had greeted her on
Saturday
evening, she averted her head, and replied
grudgingly to Lucy's cordial Good-morning!
Where shall I set my basket? asked Lucy.
Where you can find a placethe hole is full
enough already.
I will set it outside, then, said Lucy; and,
suppressing
a sigh of disappointment, she returned to
Mrs. Broadson.
You've taken a time to go up stairs, child
but you are a stranger yetyou should move
quickI always doa great deal of time is saved
by quick movements. To be sure there's very
little to do in my house, but then everybody ought
to keep busyI always doI feel, and so does
Mr. Broadson, as if it was very extravagant to keep
three servants just for us two, and therefore it's
your duty, child, to be as industrious and saving as
possibleit's a great chance to get such a place
as you have here, where there's only two; you
must think of that, and you must not expect, as
some servants do, to have everything on your table
that we have on oursI don't calculate to have you
eat butterI don't touch it myself(the lady was
forbidden it by her physician)and I don't allow it
to Jaboskinor tea, Lucy, nor coffeethe
doctors
thinks them unhealthy nowadaysto be sure,
Bridget has them, but then she's a womanbesides,
as there's only two of us, we have enough left for
her. Bridget, as Mrs. Broadson well knew, was
sufficiently apprized of her rights not to suffer herself
to be defrauded of them. I expect you to get up
very early in the morningI always do; and when
you sit down in the evening, come to me for some
sewingit's bad to be idleI never am. Now,
while Mr. Broadson and I am at breakfast, put the
parlour in perfect order; you must be very smart,
for as there are only two of us, we soon despatch
our breakfast; another thing, child, you should
yourself eat quickI always do. As soon as you
have swallowed your breakfast, come to me for
further directions.
Can I warm my hands before I go in that cold
room, ma'am?
Are you used to having your rooms warmed at
home to work in?
We have but one, and that always feels warm.
Your work will warm themit's a bad habit
to keep running to the fireI never do. Jaboski
was then summoned, and made to understand that
the cleaning materials were to be delivered over
to Lucy. Jaboski promptly obeyed the order,
secretly rejoicing that his labours were to be
abridged, and little dreaming that Broadson and his
wife, a thrifty pair, had resolved upon the
economical
expedient of employing a young girl in order
to let him off in the morning to perform a porter's
task at the warehouse of Broadson & Co. In
this mode that safe speculation of the penny saved
was achieved, and the show, without the expense
of a man-servant, kept up, while the porter had but
the house-servant's wages. So far from perceiving
this was dishonest, Mrs. Broadson valued herself
particularly on her clever expedient. Why,
she would say to her acquaintance, don't you
get German servantsI doget them before they
know a word of the language, and find out the
abominable
wages and ways of our servantsI have
had several at half price, the best servants I ever
had. As they can't speak English, and are utter
strangers in the land, they are glad to put up with
anything they can get in a decent family. It is a
little difficult making them understand; but as there
are only two of us, I and Mr. Broadson, we get
along very wellto be sure, after a while they
learn the language, and then they are just as
ungrateful
as any of the rest, and will go as soon as
they can better themselves! Strange that these
ungrateful beings should obey the instincts of all
animal creation. The horse and the cow will
take to the best pasture provided the fence is down;
and, thanks to a kind Providence, there are no
impassable
fences in our Northern land to secure
involuntary
service, and to retain the human animal
against his will and interest in any man's steril
pasture.
Lucy sat down to her first meal away from home
with Jaboski. The frugal fare allowed by Mrs.
Broadson was certainly luxurious compared to that
of her own home; but the voices of mother and
children were ringing in her ears; Jemmie's
pensive
smile seemed wanting for her, and even the
accustomed sound of her father's chiding voice
would have pleasantly broken the mournful silence.
Bridget did not appear; Lucy was wondering at this,
when, before she had had time to swallow, even at
steamboat rate, that miracle of the deglutition art,
she heard the summons of Mrs. Broadson's bell,
and hastened up stairs. Why, what's the matter
now? said Mrs. Broadson: your eyes are as red
as ferrets.
Lucy was ashamed of her irresolution, and, glad
to attribute her red eyes to that which had in part
caused them, she said, The kitchen smokes
badly, ma'am.
You'll get used to that, childall kitchens
smoke
[2]
[2]
This was the case with most New-York kitchens before
the introduction of anthracite coal.
I am glad it is not home-sicknessit is
too ridiculous to be home-sick for such places as
you live inI'm never home-sick.
Neither should I be, thought Lucy, if I had
such a dismal home as this. Mrs. Broadson then
proceeded to give her directions for her morning
work; and Lucy soon found there was no
advantage
in the truth of that eternal vaunt of Mrs.
Broadson
,
there are but two of us, I and Mr.
Broadson
,
for the woman employed all the mind she
had in contriving to keep Lucy's feet and hands
busy. As if the necessary labour of tending the
street-door, rubbing brasses, furniture, and knives,
going of errands, setting tables, &c., &c., were not
enough, Mrs. Broadson must have her carpets
swept with a short handbrush; and poor Lucy,
accustomed
to consider despatch the soul of business,
spent an hour every day on her knees brushing off
the carpets, Mrs. Broadson the while expatiating
on the great economy of cleaning carpets in this
fashion. There is no dust raised, she said;
the fine parts of the carpet are not swept off
there is nothing worn.
Nothing but my clothes, ma'am, said Lucy,
showing a hole she had worn through her thin but
well-saved frock.
E
That old thing!that's nothingyou should
not mind wearing out old clothes, childI never
do.
I have none but old clothes, ma'am.
Oh, well, you'll soon earn more.
But my earnings, thought Lucy, must go to
something more important than buying me clothes.
Lucy, however, was strong and industrious, and
accustomed
to constant labour; Mrs. Broadson's
incessant
demands would not have exhausted her
patience; she could even smile when bid to open
the windows of the spare room, and dust it, and
shut them up again, and rub over with the soft
brush the silver that was rubbed yesterday,
knowing
that the same process would be to go over
to-morrow
,
the silver meanwhile remaining in
inglorious
rest upon the pantry shelf. But when
Sunday came, then came a hard trial to Lucy
she had looked forward to it as the jubileethe
day when she was to go out free.
What time to-day can I be spared to go home,
Mrs. Broadson? she asked.
La, child, you speak as if your going home
was a matter of courseyour mother made no
stipulation
about that.
We thought everybody had a part of
Sunday
.
Oh, noyou are greatly mistakenBridget
has every Sunday afternoon; I allow her great
privileges
.
As may be imagined, Bridget had
stipulated
for her privileges. Every other Sunday
she has the whole dayto-day I expect you to
cook the dinnerI can't possibly spare you.
But if I get the dinner cooked, and everything
done, can't I just go and see how they all are, and
Jemmie.
Jemmie! who is he?
Jemmie!Jemmie is the youngest.
Not to-day, childwe had best begin as we
are going on. Mr. Broadson and I always go to
church all daythat we consider duty. Go to your
work, child, continued Mrs. Broadson, seeing
Lucy stand as if the question were not settled,
next Sunday will soon be here.
Soon
it may be to you, Mrs. Broadsonbut it
won't be soon to Jemmie, lying all the time in his
basket-cradle, with nothing to think of but when I
am coming. I promised him, Mrs. Broadson, and
I
must
go
You can't go, and there's an end on't.
The thought of Jemmie nerved Lucy's
resolution
,
and she answered modestly but firmly, I
must go, if I
never
return.
I suppose you know the consequences of going
and not returning, child. I never pay any wages
to anybody that leaves me within the month.
What shall I do? what ought I to do? thought
Lucy; mother must have the money to pay her
rentI
can
live without seeing thembut Jemmie!
but mother. Oh, Mrs. Broadson, she burst
forth, let me gopleaseJemmie will be
looking
at the door, and listening till I come.
He must take it out in listening, childI must
begin as I mean to go onI always doso just
go to your work, and think no more about it.
How easy to give the command! how impossible
to obey it! Lucy did go to her work, but her
thoughts went home. Bitterly did she regret
having
given a promise to Jemmie that she could not
perform without violating a paramount duty to her
motherthat duty, after a little reflection, she
resolved
to fulfil; still she hankered after her little
dependant Jemmie, and tear followed tear as her
imagination presented the struggle of expectation
and disappointment on his loved countenance.
Bridget observed her emotionshe rarely spoke
to her, seldom even looked at her, but now she
said, What frets ye, child?
It was kindly spoken, and Lucy poured out her
griefs. If that's all, said Bridget, I'll mind
the house while you run home after dinner.
But Mrs. Broadson has forbidden me.
And won't she be at church, and none the
wiser?
I had rather not go so, Biddy; but if you will
be just so good as to let me speak to her
Take your own way, childit's all one to me.
Mrs. Broadson acceded to her petition.
Bridget's
name was a potent one. She well knew the
cause of Bridget's late sulkiness. She felt the
importance
of propitiating her; and, eager to profit by
the first sympton of returning good-humour, she
said, Oh, yes, if Biddy is willing, you can change
days with herbut remember, next Sunday I must
hear no dinging about this home business.
The run home that Bridget had proffered,
Lucy knew was no equivalent for the next
Sunday's
half day; but further negotiation was out of
the question, and the poor child, like the weaker
party in all treaties, took what she could get. The
first free moment found her on her way home, and
soon after, for she went quick as the thoughts of
love, she was kneeling by Jemmie, with her arms
round his neck, and replying to his Oh, Lucy!
I was afraid you never,
never
would come, I
was afraid so tooand I find, Jemmie, I can't
come home every Sunday.
Then I shall grow old before I see you, Lucy;
it seems a year since last Monday morning.
Lucy used her best rhetoric to make Jemmie
acquiesce in her prolonged absence. It was but
a forced submission to the inevitable.
I know you would come if you could, Lucy,
and that seems hardest of all.
That's true! exclaimed the fatherit is a
shame to make you a slave to people's whims; but
I told you how it would be beforehand.
We can never, in any situation, my dear Lucy,
said her mother, be independent of othersbut
as you have only five minutes, tell us how you get
on. Lucy was preresolved not to distress her
mother with any complaints, and her answer was
guarded and rather unsatisfactory. Poor Mrs. Lee
guessed the meaning of this reserve; but, hoping for
a favourable reply to one question, she said, I am
sure, Lucy, you find that Biddy a pleasant woman
to live with?
Mother, that is the one thing I wanted to speak
with you about. I know Biddy is goodshe is so
very kind to Judy Phealan, an orphan girl that
comes there; she's good, too, to Jaboski; and to-day
she was very obliging to me; but ever since I went
there she has had something against me; she does
not speak to me if she can help it; we sleep
together
,
but she never even puts her hand over me.
It is not natural for an Irish person, you know,
E 2
motherthey are so warm-heartedwhat can be
the reason?
I can't guesssome foolish superstition,
perhaps
.
But persevere, my child; good will certainly,
in the long run, overcome evil.
I will try my best, mother. I must go now.
Good-by, Jemmie. If you only feel as much better
as I do for just this little visit, you'll kiss me and
not shed one tear. Good-by, father! I hope,
mother, you won't look quite so pale when I come
home next time. Give my love to the girls when
they come from Sunday-school, and away she
ran, without shedding a teartill she was out of
sight.
CHAPTER VI.
MORE RULES THAN RIGHT.
Judy Phealan
was with Bridget when Lucy
returned
.
Bridget's countenance was lowering.
You've been in mighty haste, she said.
I was afraid Mrs. Broadson would be at home,
and wanting something; and I did not wish you
to have the trouble of my work, Biddy.
I don't care how soon I have it allbut you
are sure to keep on the blind side of Mrs.
Broadson
.
Indeed, said Lucy, I did not know she had
a blind side, Biddy. With all Lucy's fidelity she
had never extracted from her hardbound mistress
one approving word, it being one of that lady's
golden
rules
not to praise servants, lest they
should take advantage of it!
Nearly two weeks passed without any
recordable
event in the life of our humble heroine, but
they were not profitless. The Father of all leads
his
faithful
children by no barren way. For them
there are gleanings in the most steril fields. Lucy,
while serving others, was educating herself.
Besides
the daily exercise of difficult virtues, she was
increasing her value by learning to perform
domestic
offices well. Mrs. Broadson had not given
her life and her soul to house-affairs without
excelling
,
and Lucy learned in her novitiate the most
thorough mode of dusting, how most accurately to
make a bed, the best way of cleaning plate, and
that heavy duty of our winters, polishing brasses.
Mother was mistaken about one thing, thought
she, as day after day passed without her
painstaking
winning one compensating smile. I shall
never make friends here. Lucy despaired too
soon.
Mrs. Broadson's spouse had some infirmities that
were particularly annoying to her. He had an
inveterate
habit of dropping his handkerchief,
misplacing
the newspaper, mislaying his spectacles,
and leaving his snuff-box on the mantelpiece.
These misdeeds called forth strictures from his
lady that, in their irritating effect, were much like
a smoky chimney, or a shower of hail in the face.
How strange! Mr. Broadson, she would
exclaim
,
why can't you just tuck the newspaper
under these booksI always do; there! you've
sot
down your box in the old placeif there's
anything
that tries me, it's living in such a litter!
it's so unnecessary when there are only two of us!
Now our friend Lucy had an uncommon portion of
that sixth sense, which enables a person to see, hear,
and feel for others, called in polite life
tact;
and by
rectifying these little blunders of Broadson,
slipping
the newspaper into the right place, picking up
the handkerchief before the argus' eye had fallen
on it, &c., &c., she had, though he was rather
oyster-like
in the selfish independence of his existence,
begun to elicit sparks of gratitude which appeared
in a bless me! and then, as his sensibilities were
roused by a sense of the pattering escaped, a
thank you, child! an attentive little girl! and
finally, when one evening, as he heard his wife's
quick step approaching through the entry, he shoved
a lamp off the table, which Lucy dexterously caught
before a drop of oil had touched the Brussels carpet,
he actually thrust his hand into his pocket with the
intention of bestowing a half dollar, as the reward
of his signal preservation, when he was prevented
either by the too sudden entrance of Mrs. Broadson,
or the recollection of one of her economical
rules
, that it was never best to give presents
to servantsit always led to
expectations!
When the tea-apparatus and Lucy had
disappeared
,
some secret thought of his sudden
deliverance
prompted him to ask his spouse what
wages she gave that little girl.
Three dollars and a half, my dearhigh
considering
her years, and considering there are only
two of us.
Why, no, my love, I don't think it is extrava
gant, considering she makes out to do all Jaboski's
work, and a good deal besides; indeed, I was
thinking
,
as you `make it a
rule
' not to give presents,
that perhaps we could afford, now Jaboski's wages
are saved, to give her four dollars a month.
My dear! are you raving? You know I make
it a
rule
never to raise wages. You would directly
give them the idea we
sot
a great value on their
services.
So it would, my loveyou are right, replied
the acquiescing husband, his natural sense of
justice
soon lost in his habitual subjection to the
strong current of his wife's superior selfishness.
The next day, when Mr. Broadson came home
to dinner, after two or three extra pinches of snuff,
and a-hems and ha-as, he announced to his wife
that Jaboski had given him warning he should leave
him when his month was up.
Leave you!why, what an ungrateful wretch!
What reason does he give?
Oh, he says he must get porter's wages for
porter's work!
What impertinence! but 'tis astonishing how
soon they all learn it here. Somebody has been
talking to him. I thought it was a risk to let him
out of the house.
Yesthat was a mistake. As soon as they
learn English, their working for half price is all
over.
[3]
[3]
A Polish exile once told me that a lady concluded an
excessive
commendation of one of his countrymen, who served her
in the capacity of waiter, by saying, with the utmost navet, I
assure you I could not get an American as good for double the
wages I pay him! We may set down disagreeable truths, but
no fiction.
He made out to tell me that the major of
the regiment he served in in Poland was in the
city, and sick and poor, and it was for him he
wanted to earn more money.
Foolish fellow! I wonder what good money
does them! Well, I'll look out for another; you
know I have never failed yet, my dear. But I
think I never was so plagued as now. Bridget has
not been the same since Lucy came here.
What does that mean?
Why, Bridget has got a king of a cousin, you
knowthe Irish are all cousinsone Judy Phealan,
that she has been wild to get here, and I had told
her she might come, when Lucy applied. I liked
Lucy's looks and her mother's, and those Irish are
so sluttish and hard to teach, and Lucy was in a
desperate hurry to get a place, and t'other one I
could have any time, and so I concluded to take
Lucy, and Bridget has really
sot
up about it; but I
expect she'll come to; if she don't, I must take
Judy, for I can't part with Bridget?
I should think it would be easier supplying
Bridget's place than Lucy's.
My dear! give me leave to say you know
nothing about it.
That is not your fault, my love, for I seldom
hear you talk about anything else.
Mrs. Broadson hardly knew whether to
understand
this reply as a compliment or sarcasm, and
she answered accordingly. To be sure, my
dear, as there are only two of usand everybody
says, as well as me, that it's the most
momentious
subject in this country, and will be as long as we
are at the mercy of our servants. Mrs. Broadson
then proceeded to detail to Mr. Broadson, for the
fortieth time probably, the nature of Bridget's
services
,
but rather too circumstantially for the
entertainment
of our readers. The amount of it was,
that Bridget was a woman of great strength,
capacity
,
and industry; that she accomplished more
work than two ordinary women; and that all her
work was well done, and that Mrs. Broadson had
made it an object
, as she had stated to Bridget, to
stay, by paying her above the average wages, and
giving her many indulgences. These cost us
nothing, as there are only two of us, the lady truly
thought.
The Saturday night preceding Lucy's third
Sunday
at service, and the day of her promised
periodical
visit home, arrived. Judy stole in about
tea-time
,
as was her custom, and Lucy was the first to
observe and remark that she did not look well. To
Bridget's eager inquiries she answered that she
had had a sore throat, and chills and burning heats
all day, and the people were out, and nobody to go
for a drop of water.
And ye'll get your death in that cold garret, ye
will, JudyI'll have no more of it, said Bridget,
bursting into tears, and taking Judy on her lap.
Something must be done to-night, said Lucy,
more in the habit of remedying an evil than
crying
over it.
Ye need not tell me that! replied Bridget; and,
wiping away her tears, and swallowing her sobs,
she went up stairs and electrified her mistress with
the information that she must look out for another
in her place, as she would not live in the king's
palace to be queen of it, if she could not have Judy
to be with herthe lone thing, that had nobody in
the wide world to care for her but her! Though
Mrs. Broadson was resolved upon the sacrifice of
Lucy rather than part with Bridget, yet it being
one of her golden
rules
never to let servants
feel that they have the upper hand, she carefully
avoided sudden concession, and merely said,
Perhaps
I can make it an object for you to stay; at any
rate, don't look out for a place till next week.
I've something else to do, thought poor
Bridget, as she hastened back to the sick child,
and what in the world am I to do with her?
She met Lucy at the kitchen door, who, shutting
it so as not to be overheard, said, in her most gentle
voice, I think you did not understand me, Bridget,
when I said `something must be done to-night;' I
meant Judy could not go out of the house, for it's
a cold storm, and she's getting worse every minute.
Now, if you will put her into your bed, I can sit up
in the kitchen, and I can keep her drink warm and
bring it up to you. If we can get her in a
perspiration
,
she will be better directlythat's always
mother's way with a sudden cold.
But, said Bridget, in a softened voice, you
can't sit up all night, and you such a childer.
Oh, yes, I've often done it with our Jemmie,
and not felt it; and, she continued, encouraged
by Bridget's softened manner, I'll go first of all
to Mrs. Broadson, and ask for some liniment for
Judy's throat.
Bless your kind heart!stop a bitshe'll be
after sending her home! First we'll just get her
snug in the bed, and then my old lady must make
the best of it.
This mode of proceeding was not according to
Lucy's code, which prescribed to her to act openly;
but this was Bridget's affair, and she quietly followed
her with the lamp while she carried Judy to the
attic. Now, Lucy, honey, said Bridget, keep
a dumb tongue, and take this shilling, and fetch the
liny-stuff from the `potecaries.' It will be soon
enough to be after telling her when we can't help
it.
But if the bell should ring, and we both out of
the kitchen?
You're not such a natural, Lucy, you can't give
a
rason
when it's wanted?
But I must give the right one, Biddy. Bridget
was too much absorbed in Judy, and too grateful
for Lucy's services, to be offended by the
implication
of Lucy's reply, and she had quite forgotten it
when Lucy returned, sooner than she expected, with
the liniment, and a bag of warmed sand, which
Mother said (and truly) was the best thing in the
world to lay to cold feet.
Ah, how should ye know everything, and ye
such a childer?
It's having our Jemmie always sick, and mother
to teach me.
Och, poor Judy! All her mother did for her
was to bring her into this miserable world, poor
darlint! God help her! But hark! there's the
bell!
And what is all this pattering up and down
stairs for? asked Mrs. Broadson, who had an
ubiquitous
pair of ears. Lucy explained. And who
proposed putting that sick child to bed in my house,
and no leave asked?
I did, ma'am; she was too sick to go out such
F
a night, and I did not think you would have any
objection to my giving up my place to her.
She was not too sick to
come
out, if she was
to
go
out. In future, remember, I make it a
rule
never to take a sick person into my houseit's
very dangerouswe might get our deathsand
there are only two of us. Well, I trust Bridget
will send her off before breakfastdon't tell her I
know anything about it.
If she asks me, ma'am?
Nonsense! she won't; but if she does you
can turn it off without telling a lie.
I don't wonder, thought Lucy, mother gave
me so many,
many
charges about being steadfast in
the truth. Who could have thought that a lady as
old as Mrs. Broadson could have as good as told
such a child as I am to lie! but I guess I shall
find there's not many like mother, who thinks
everybody
ought to try to make everybody else as good,
as well as as happy as they can. Alas, no! there
are not many governed by these divine principles
these moral steam-engines.
Lucy's evening was a busy one. One of Mrs.
Broadson's
rules
being, that whatever was left
undone, the work must be done. All human
concerns
were by this lady divided into two parts;
the
work
was the kernel, the remainder the shell.
Fortunately for Lucy, work was no evil to her, as
appeared by her answer to Jaboski, when he said,
in the course of the evening, You too much work
for one so little girl. She replied, Oh, no,
Jaboski
,
work keeps off bad feelings; when I am so
busy, I can't think of mother and Jemmie.
Ah! the same with me, Lucy; when I too
much work, I not think of mine poor
country-people
.
With what blessings has a beneficent
Providence
begrit labour; with health and appetite,
sweet sleep, and peace of mind!
When her last task was done, Lucy crept softly
up stairs. Bridget was sleeping soundly, and Judy
too was asleep, but her cheek was of a scarlet die,
and her breathing so oppressed, that Lucy, after
another hour's watch, repeated her visit to the
attic. She found Bridget just waked from her
sound sleep by Judy's suffocating cough, and
terrified
out of her wits. The poor child thought herself
dying; her terror increased her oppression, and she
clung around Bridget's neck with the grasp of a
drowning person. Lord Almighty help us!
exclaimed
Bridget, she's the last of all my people,
and she's going! Och, Lucy, could you be after
going for the priest this stormy night, and the
Almighty's
blessing on you? While Bridget was
uttering these ejaculations and entreaties, Lucy
was wrapping a cloak round Judy. We must
first take her to the kitchen, and put her in a warm
baththe water, and the tub, and all is readyI
knew she'd want it; and then, Biddy, you can run
for the doctor that lives up the street. We'll get
the priest, if wanted, to-morrow; I've seen Jemmie
as bad as this, and quite easy before morning.
Ye're the Almighty's own comfort to me,
replied
Bridget, her energies rekindling with the light
of hope; and if she wins through, poor lamb, I'll
down on my knees to you for all my ungrateful
thoughts! This was said while she was hurrying
down stairs with her precious burden in her arms,
regardless of the danger of offending the mistress
of the house, who, roused from her cat-sleep by the
unwonted noise, surlily called to know what all
the racket meant. Lucy stopped and
respectfully
explained. La, it's only a cold, replied
Mrs. Broadson; the Irish are always scared out
of their witsit's hard we can't be allowed to sleep
when there's only two of us! and she closed the
door, thinking it was no further her concern than as
it invaded her comfort.
Judy was immersed in the bath and the
physician
called; and his prescriptions harmonizing with
the restoratives Lucy had advised, Judy was
speedily
relieved. Bless the sweet eyes of ye, Lucy,
said Bridget, you it was that saved her to me, and
I it was that wronged ye; but true as the word stands
in the Holy Bible, I thought that, as St. Paul says, I
had the right of it. But ye will be after forgiving me
when ye know all the bad luck that's broken my
heart. We were but five of us in Ireland, and that
was before Mike, God rest his soul, was killed
fighting
with the rebellion-ruffian about the cow that
kept poor Judy's breath in her, for her mother's
husband, that was to be, was taken off for a soldier,
and so she fretted herself to death for that it was,
and not borning the baby that killed her; and then
the old gentlemanmy father that was, was took
off to the Limerick jail for Mike's business, and
the boys got him out, and hid him in the rocks up
the country, and there of hardship, and starvation,
and fretting, and the like, he died. My own father
it was, Lucy, and he that had a kind word for even
the dog at his door; and then my mother, ah! her
heart was always bending like, not breaking, went
to live with her sister's son's wife, and Judy with
her, and I came off to America to earn money to
fetch them over. Here I thought it was but asking
service, and getting it, and pay for it! The first
lady I went to, she asked me, `Did I understand the
work in a gentleman's family?' and I said, `Troth
and I did not, but I was asy tached;' but she'd not
take the trouble of taching a raw hand, and so to
the next I just rubbed down the truth a bit, and
said sure there was some things I did not quite
understand
;
she asked me would I take lower wages
till I learned; upon no account, I told her, for the
learning was the sevarest of all; so she laughed and
took me, and a happy time I should have had there,
but the lady found fault with my dress not being
smart like the others. And would I be after
buying
clothes, and my mother and Judy starving-like,
and every month a year to me till they came. But
I kept my rasons to myself, and got another place,
where work was light, plenty of everything spent
and wasted, and the lady riding all the day, and out
all the evening; but in three months they failed, so
that place was gone; but they paid me handsomely,
good luck to them! Then I went to another great
house, where I did my best, for my wages were high,
and paid when I asked for them; but the lady was
always finding fault with my `Irish ways,' as she
called them; and what ways would she have of me,
I asked her, that was born and bred, and passed all
my happy life in Ireland, save ten miserable months
and six days in America, with ladies that could find
fault with my Irish ways and never tached me
better
?
so she called me `partinent,' and I looked out
for another place. This time my luck changed.
It was to Mrs. Tilson's I wentthe Almighty bless
G 2
her. It was but middling wages I got there, and
plenty of work, for I was the only one they kept,
and he but a bookkeeper, and she a dilicate woman
with plenty of small children. But then she laid
out the work complately for me, and gave a lift
herself
when it was heavy, and was always taking
thought for me, and asking when I heard from
mother and Judy; when a letter came to me there
was a rejoicing from the very top to the very least
little one in the family. Mr. Tilson would say,
`So you've good news, Biddy?' and then Mrs.
Tilsonbless her sweet voice`You've good
news, Biddy?' and Harry Tilsontheir oldesta
bright lad he was, `You've good news, Biddy?' and
so they handed it down to little Archy, who could
just lisp it out, `You've good news, Biddy?' Och,
they were just like the angels in heaven; where
there was joy with one, there was joy with all.
Everything I know I learned there; Mrs. Tilson
was always telling me there is a right and a wrong
way to everything, Biddy, and she showed me the
right way to do this, and tached me the right way
to do t'other. Ah, if the ladies were the like of her,
half the trouble with their people would be over,
and t'other half would not be to spake of. And when
the bitter news of my mother's death came, she
cried with me, and they all cried, from the top of
the house down to Archy; sure, Lucy, it lightens
the heart to have others fret with you.
Oh, Biddy, how could you leave such people?
Sure and they left me, Lucy. It was a
burning
day in August when Mr. Tilson fell in a fit;
the doctors said it all came from writing too
constant
,
so they moved off into the country. I would
have gone with them, but there was poor Judy yet
to be got over. Mrs. Tilson recommended me
here. I told her, was it the work I cared for, so I
was sure of being well paid; she said I would get
plenty of work, and she would see I was well paid,
and she it was herself that made the bargain for
me; but sure, Lucy, I would rather live with the
Tilsons' for the salt to my gruel, than with this
woman for the best wages in New-York. But
when you have a
rason
for it, Lucy, you can
do
and bear till you die. At last the money went,
and Judy came, and sure I was as plased as if all
Ireland had been in my arms; and it was
all
to
me, my poor father, and mother, and Mike, and
my sister, that was the last and least of us all,
lying low, and her husband that was to be, gone
the Lord knows where! Sure I have wronged you,
Lucy, and sorry am I for that same; but was not it
natural-like I should want Judy to snug down under
my wing. I did not let on to Mrs. Broadson she
was my own dare sister's child, for the ladies are
not fond of getting near kin together, lest they
should favour one another, bad luck to them that
would keep all God's blessings to themselves. I
said she was my cousin, and is not she? and a
dale more; and Mrs. Broadson engaged with her,
and the steps were scarce cold from her feet when
you came with your mother. You know the
rest; but maybe you don't know that, when poor
Judy came that morning with her bits of things,
Jaboski
had orders to send her away without calling
me; and when you came, my breast was all on
fire, and so it kept burning, for Judy was fretting,
and I looking for a place for the two, and could
find none, and you every night lying warm at my
side, when poor little Judy, the last of all the
Phealans
,
was sleeping alone quite in a cold garret.
I don't wonder at your feelings, Biddy; I should
have felt just so if any one had come between me
and our Jemmie. But you should have spoken out,
Biddy. Mother says the simple truth spoken saves
many a heartburn.
Sure that's just the truth of ityou have tached
me a good lessonit's asy learning of them that's
good to us! It was in a pet that I was when I
gave Mrs. Broadson warning, but I'll find a place
for Judy and me; now that I am rid of the bad
blood, it all seems quite asy.
But not to poor Lucy did it all seem quite so
asy. Her nice sense of right bade her
relinquish
her place in Judy's favour. Bridget's wants
it was not easy to supply. Lucy was sure of
procuring
some place; and though she dreaded the
horrid business of going again in search of one, she
did not hesitate; but, without consulting Bridget,
who, in the flood-tide of her gratitude, would be
sure to oppose her intentions, she hastened to the
breakfast-room.
The breakfast things are waiting for you,
child, said Mrs. Broadson; you must not give
the day, as well as the night, to that sick child.
When, after a host of directions to Lucy as to the
petty domestic duties of the day, she stopped to
take breath, Lucy said, I believe, Mrs. Broadson,
you had engaged Judy before I came?
Wellwhat of that?
I would rather not keep a place that another
has a better right to.
It is your choice to gois it?
Yes, ma'am.
But we choose to keep you, interposed Mr.
Broadson.
My dear! my dear! exclaimed his wife,
allow
me to settle thisit's your
rule
that I should
see to the servants. Lucy, you know the
consequence
of going before your month is up?
I hoped, ma'am, as Judy is not well, and there
is but one week of my month, you would be willing
to let me stay till my month is up.
Oh, noit's your own choice to give up the
placeI did not ask you, rememberif you choose
to go, you must go nowI make it a rule never to
have my kitchen cluttered up with folks. Lucy,
unused as she was to maintain her rights, was now
nerved by a strong motive, and she ventured to say
that she thought, under the circumstances, she was
entitled to her wages. We must go according
to rule, child, replied Mrs. Broadson; I can't
spend any more time talkingI must dress for
churchI never talk about business on the Sabbath.
Remember what I said to you about the apples,
and nuts, and dusting the glasses, &c.
Mr. Broadson looked after his wife, and listened
till her last footstep died away, and then he took
out his purse, and paid Lucy, to a fraction, the
money due for her three weeks' service. He was
an honest, though not a generous man, and as he
put the money into her hand, he said, You have
a right to it, Lucy.
I believe I have, sir, replied Lucy, with true
dignity; but, for all that, I thank you, and so will
motherand so will our Jemmie. And the tears,
before restrained, now gushed forth, and, like dew
from heaven, brought forth fruit. Here, take this
dollar, said Broadson, for once indulging in the
luxury of a spontaneous kindness, and buy
something
for our Jemmiebut mind, say nothing to
Mrs. Broadson about this or the pay either.
No, sirbut I wish you would tell her
yourself
.
For what, in the name of wonder?
Maybe she would do right herself next time.
Ah, muttered Broadson between his teeth, and
smothering a laugh, it's hard teaching an old dog
new tricks.
Mrs. Broadson would not have changed Lucy
for Judy if she could have helped it; but, after
Bridget's warning, she was aware that was the only
alternative if she would retain Bridget, and Bridget
was too profitable a person to lose. An actual
fraud like that by which Mrs. Broadson would have
deprived Lucy of her earnings is, we are sure, not
common in domestic diplomacy. But where such
power by common law exists, abuses will prevail
more or less. We have on the best authority one
instance much worse than that which has been
selected
to illustrate the evil. A certain
lady
in this
city was in the habit of picking a quarrel with her
servants within the first month, in order to force
them (to use the phrase of our Eastern friends)
to take up their connexions, and thereby avail
herself of the common law, which exempted her
from paying them. The servants submitted,
because
submission was easier than redress. Our
servants are, for the most part, strangers in the
land; they have no powerful friends to interpose
for them, and the aid of the law is expensive and
uncertain. But the worst of these abuses is their
demoralizing effect upon the weaker and more
ignorant party.
Bridget, when she had recovered from her
astonishment
that such a childer should so soon
decide and arrange her affairs, poured out the
gratitude
of her affectionate heart. It's me and Judy,
she said, will love you, Lucy, to the day of our
death, the same as if ye'd been born one of our own
people. The Lord Almighty bless ye, child, and
give ye a better mistress to mind after than this
same. Judy and I will be after finding another
place, for I'll serve no longer than I can help one
that's no more heart than a hollow potato. The
Lord above go with you, my dear! And blessed
and kissed by both Bridget and Judy, Lucy set her
face homeward, thinking as she went, Well,
mother was rightwe can, if we try hard,
overcome
evil with good, and we can get people to love
us if we make the most of our opportunities!
We once heard a friend boast that he had
studied, in a very short time, a treatise on anatomy,
But, said he, I skipped the arteries! Now,
lest the effect of our humble friend Biddy's
autobiography
should be lost by a similar mode of
reading
,
we would venture to ask whether the right
principles and feelings either for employers or
employed
are in exercise in relation to Irish domestics
they are for the most part persons who are driven
forth by stern want and inexorable misfortune
from their native land. The abuses of
government
have left them ignorant, degraded them, and
deprived them of their birthrights as members of
the human family. They have been bred in
miserable
dirty cabins, where they had
no
means of
learning the arts of domestic economy. Their
faculties have been, for the most part, devoted to
evading by every subterfuge the cruelties of
oppressive
laws. Fortunately for them, their
oppressors
are not their own people. They are of
another blood and another religion, and this
circumstance
it is that binds the Irish so closely in
the ties of nature, and preserves their affections in
such freshness and warmth. God is love, and
affection is the sanative principle in his creatures.
By addressing this principle, the poorest of our
brethren may be redeemed. The Irish come to us
with their habits formed. They require
knowledge
,
energy, and patience on the part of their
employers. Some of them may be unteachable
and irreclaimable; but, for the most part, do they
not repay
real
disinterested kindness with fidelity
and affection? It is very common to say, There
is no use in trying to teach an Irish person. Is
an Irish person less docile than any other who
has arrived to maturity in ignorance? We know
it requires great virtue, conscientiousness,
efficiency
,
and, above all, patience, on the part of the
mistress; but let her think of the missionary who
abandons her country to carry light to the distant,
and bless God who brings the ignorant to the light
of her home, and makes that the field of her
mission
.
CHAPTER VII.
TO CURE, OR TO ENDURE?THAT IS THE
QUESTION.
Rise up, ye women that are at ease; hear my voice, ye
careless
daughters; give ear unto my speech!
Isaiah xxxii., 9.
Surely
the time will come in this country, where
the elements of general prosperity have not been
destroyed by the foolish combinations and
wicked
monopolies of men, when the poor will have
less need of the passive virtues, and be sure of a
field and certain harvest for the active ones; when
no father, like poor Lee, will, by intemperance or
any other vicefor all vice is more or less
destructive
prostrate
his family in the dust; when
physical, intellectual, and moral education will
have raised the level of our race, and brought it to
as near an approximation to equality of condition
as it is capable of in its present state of existence.
One important step to this happy result is in the
power of every mistress of a family. She must
first enter into the sentiment which was so well
expressed by Lord Chesterfield, who, in his last
will, in making some bequests to his servants, calls
them his unfortunate friends, his inferiors in
nothing but position.
[4]
[4]
An instance of almost unparalleled magnanimity in the
discharge
of a duty to one of these inferiors in position, occurred
here at the time of the horrid shipwreck of the Bristol. A Mr.
Donelly, his wife, and children were among the passengers.
The small boat was putting off from the ship with a bare
possibility
that it might return. Mr. Donelly's wife, children, and
other relatives were in it. There was still one unoccupied
place; this he insisted on giving to his nursery-maid, saying,
this girl has left her home in my service and protection. She
was saved. The boat never returned to the ship. Did not Mr.
Donelly do more for the cause of virtue by this last act of his
existence than many men achieve in a lifetime?
When she realizes this,
G
she will make an effort to raise the character of
domestic labourers to the position they occupy in
a new order of things, and the new relations they
sustain among us.
Lucy was received at home with an outbreak of
joy that was not calmed till it was found her
service
was not ended, but only to be transferred to
another place; and, as Mrs. Lee could not afford to
lose a day's earnings, it was decided that Lucy
should the next morning apply to Mrs. Ardley,
who might possibly still want her. Mrs. Lee's
objections to the place were overruled by her
pressing
necessities. Early Monday morning Lucy
again set forth, and was most cordially received
by Mrs. Ardley. You have come just in time,
my little girl, she said; I have had two in your
place; the one went away because the work was
too hard!
Only
six servants in the house, and
nothing but odds and ends to do! But she was a
lazy little mortal. The other wentI don't know
for whatsome bagatelle. She and the cook
quarrelled
,
I believecooks are apt to be cross, you
knowbut you must not mind thatI shut my
eyes to their faults if they will only cook my
dinner
well. Do what she tells you, and don't run to
me with complaints. If my servants will get into
hot water, I beg I may not be scalded with it. I
wish you to be civil and obliging to everybody.
The waiter may impose a little now and thenhe
will shirk sometimesbut he is so good I let him
do as he pleases. Try and please Sophyshe is
very good, though a little old maidishbut I never
cross her. Mind your p's and q's with the wet-nurse
everybody must with a wet-nurse. Always be
ready to run an errand for Mary Minturnshe
hates to move off her chair. And always do what
Becky tells youwhat
she
wants done
must
be
done. Be ready to do any little matter for the
children, and try to please everybody. There's no
hard work, you seeonly odds and ends. Lucy
had not experience enough to know that to work a
little in everybody's field is much harder than to
bring to perfection a corner of one. Mrs. Ardley's
kindly manner pleased her. So different, she
thought, from crabbed Mrs. Broadson! so
sociable
!
Mrs. Ardley's sociability was something
like a brimful cup, always running over upon what
chanced to be near her; however, to do her justice,
she was very kindly disposed, though from the
want of judgment and reflection her benevolence,
like waste steam, was lost in noisy and useless
effusions
.
Mrs. Ardley was the wife of a rich
merchant
.
She had always lived in affluence. As far
as she had thought about the matter, she believed
this was the station Providence had allotted her; and
she fancied also that there was a certain class born
to understand and perform domestic service, while
she and all in her category were to enjoy its results.
She knew no more of that science which every
woman should study, domestic economy, than the
Queen of France knew of political economy, when,
being told her people were clamorous for bread,
she asked, Why, if there was no bread, did they
not give them cake? Mrs. Ardley believed, in the
honesty of her heart, that when she had hired
plenty
of servants, paid punctually the highest wages,
bestowed handsome presents, fed them not only
bountifully, but luxuriously, and never scolded, she
had performed the whole active and passive duty
of a mistress. In common with many others, she
imputed the jars and break-downs of her domestic
machinery to the imperfect mechanism of our
society
.
Everybody had trouble with their
servants
;
of course she must expect it, was the
general
balm she applied to her domestic wounds.
Lucy one morning was summoned to bring the
baby down to show to some visiters, and the little
thing being charmed with the furs, feathers, and
flowers
that decorated the gay guests, Lucy was bidden
to remain in the drawing-room, and, retiring to the
window, she heard, not inattentively, the following
conversation. Do you keep the nursery-maid
you brought with you from Paris, Mrs. Hartell?
Dear! yes. I would not part with her on any
account. She speaks such pure Parisian French.
My next baby, I am resolved, shan't get the bad
habits of my other childrenit shall speak French
first, and French always. I am very fortunate just
now; I have a French cook, and a jewel of a French
waiter.
But do not your other servants quarrel with
them? asked Mrs. Ardley; I had a French cook
once, and they made a perfect
inferno
below stairs.
Oh, n'importe! replied Mrs. Hartell,
shrugging
her shoulders, what signifies an inferno
below
,
if you are in heaven above, as I truly am with
French cooking and waiting.
I am in a higher heaven than any of you, said
a Mrs. Stedman, since I went to boardI live in
perfect luxurynothing in the world to do but get
up and enjoy myself.
Oh, as to that, replied Mrs. Ardley, I
never trouble myself about my domestic concerns;
what can't be cured must be endured, you know.
But can you teach your husband your
philosophy
?
does he not fret when he happens to find
you out when he comes home to dinner, and the
dinner not ready?
Never, dear Mrs. Stedman. My husband is
one of the best-tempered men in the world; besides,
of course, he knows it's all the servants' fault, and
there's no use in scolding themif you dismiss one
set you only get a worse in their place. We long
ago made up our minds, that where there was no
remedy, it was wisest to submit with a grace.
There is one remedy, thank Heaven,
interposed
a Mrs. Linton; we can break up and go to
board, as Mrs. Stedman has done, and as we shall
all have to do. I have been trying to persuade Mr.
Linton to it for the last year.
What is his objection?
Oh, he says he married to have a homehe
got a surfeit of boarding-houses when he was a
bachelor, &c., &c., so we shall have to worry on
a while longer; but I take special care to let him
know all the torment I have. There's nothing like
letting these men share the burden, to make them
willing to throw it off. So Mary Henry said, and
G 2
she never gave her husband any peace till he took
her to France.
Apropos! interposed Mrs. Ardley, I had
a letter yesterday from Mary Henry. They have
had a horrible time of it latelybeen robbed by
their servants.
Bless me, how shocking! do they intend
remaining
abroad?
Yes, till the girls are grown. She found her
housekeeping interfered too much with their
education
.
She was a Martha, you know, troubled
about many things.
Does she intend establishing her daughters
abroad? asked a Mrs. Hyde, who had till now
listened in silence.
No, indeed! She speaks with horror of the
state of society in Paris, and says she would rather
bury her daughters than marry them there.
Then there are worse social evils than the
household plagues of America?
Dear Mrs. Hyde! how sarcastic!
I did not intend a sarcasm. If the evils we
suffer are lighter than those that exist in other
countries, we should, I think, endure them without
complaint; and since they belong to a condition of
society in which our lot and our children's is cast,
it might be well to try to rectify them.
Excuse me! exclaimed Mrs. Stedman, rising
to go, I have washed my hands of the whole
concern, and never shall voluntarily resume
housekeeping
.
And excuse me! said Mrs. Linton,
seconding
her friend's movement, I have made up my
mind to dismiss the crew and give up the ship!
and laughing, she followed Mrs. Stedman.
Chacun  son got! (each one to his taste!)
said Mrs. Hartell; mine is not in your line, dear
Mrs. Hyde! and she, too, took leave.
Now they are gone, said Mrs. Ardley, I
must say, that if my husband was as fidgety as
Sam Stedman, I would give up housekeeping too
or hang myself. Mrs. Ardley and Mrs. Hyde
were old friends, and, in bygone days, schoolmates,
though Mrs. Hyde was by a few years the senior;
this made it easy for her to adopt the mentor style
without any appearance of assumption, a fault to
which there were indeed no tendencies in her
character
.
No, Anne, she replied, no, you are of
too happy a temper to hang yourself in any
extremity
,
and you are too kind to drive others to
hanging; so, if your husband had been as fidgety
as Sam Stedman, you would have set about making
his home comfortable, and not abandoned it.
But how can a home be made what a fidgety
man calls comfortable, with such servants as we
have? Now, dear Mrs. Hyde, answer me that,
said Mrs. Ardley, with the air of one who had
uttered a
poser
.
By the mistress of the house doing her duty
understandingly and thoroughly. We must begin
at the foundation, Anne. In this country, where
often, in town, we have ignorant and ill-trained
domestics
,
and sometimes in the country none at all,
it is an indispensable duty to give our daughters a
thorough acquaintance with domestic affairs. It
seems to me we educate them for everything else
but the actual necessities of their social condition.
Oh, we may just as well save ourselves that
trouble. It don't depend at all on education; for
instance, you and I were brought up as much alike
as two girls could be, and you are a pattern
housewife
,
while I make no pretensions that way.
Before
detailing the conversation that followed, it will
be but just to concede what Mrs. Hyde's modesty
did not permit her to allow, that she was, in
clearness
of mind and force of character, greatly Mrs.
Ardley's superior. Other things being equal, the
woman of the highest mental endowments will
always
be the best housekeeper, for housewifery,
domestic economy, is a science that brings into
action the qualities of the mind as well as the
graces of the heart. A quick perception, judgment,
discrimination, decision, and order are high
attributes
of mind, and are all in daily exercise in the
well-ordering of a family. If a sensible woman,
an intellectual woman, a woman of genius,
is
not
a good housewife, it is not because she is
all or either of these, but because there is some
deficiency in her character, or some omission of
duty which should make her very humble, instead
of her indulging any secret self-complacency on
account of a certain superiority, which only
aggravates
her fault. Many women of very inferior
character make very comfortable housewives, but
why? they give their whole power to a single
object
.
All the rays of a feeble lamp thrown on one
point will produce a considerable illumination.
You say, Anne, replied Mrs. Hyde, that
you and I were `brought up as much alike as two
girls could be,' and so we were. We went to the
same schools, pursued the same studies, and
received
the same accomplishments. Great pains
were taken to make us attractive in a
drawing-room
and amiable in our domestic relations. But,
as to the actual business of life, we were as little
trained for it as if we had been born in the royal
family of Persia, instead of being American girls,
who, whatever their fortune and condition are, will
be sure, in the progress of life, to be placed in
situations
that call all their faculties into requisition.
Oh! some are and some are not.
Allall, Anne. The women of this country,
of every grade, are independent, self-directing
beings
.
The employers have certain untransferable
duties and the employed certain unquestionable
rights.
Do you mean mistresses and servants by
employers
and
employed?
Yes.
That is too absurd for such a sensible woman
as you, Sara. You got that flummery living up in
the country.
Perhaps I did get it sooner there than I
otherwise
should. How can a person who contracts to
perform a certain labour under your roof, who
makes her own stipulations, and may leave you
with impunity at any moment, any more be called
your servant, in the
old sense
, than the builder who
builds your house, or the engineer who constructs
your roads?
How can they? Why they always have been
called servantsmy servants do the same work
my grandmother's did, who were slavesthe same
work that servants do in other countries.
Yes, but is not their condition changed, and
does not that change the relation? Rely upon it,
we make a fatal mistake, not so much in retaining
old terms as in not fitting ourselves for the new
relation
But stay, Sara, don't you call your servants
servants?
No, I call them domestics.
Heaven be praised! I expected you would
say
help
, which is quite too countrified, too like
mechanics'
wives. But, honestly, don't you think
servant
sounds more natural, and is the more
convenient
name?
Yes; but I think the wishes of those who bear
the name should be consulted, and we all know
that servant is so disagreeable to them, especially
to the best among them, that it requires some
courage
and a little hard-heartedness to use it in their
presence.
But is not much of this rank pride, Sara? Are
they not discontented with their subordinate
condition
,
and ought they not to learn that a person may
be as truly respectable in one grade as another?
Undoubtedly this would be a most valuable
lesson learned; but, since the world began,
moralists
have been teaching, in some form or other, that
Honour and shame from no condition rise,
Act well your part, there all the honour lies,
and yet how few have learned it. In our own
country, the apostle's rule is reversed; and `in
whatsoever condition you are,
not
to be therewith
content,' is the general experience. If, therefore,
all are trying to
appear
, if not to
be
something better
than they are, we ought not to be surprised at
manifestations
of this spirit in the most ignorant class,
in those who, for the most part, have had fewest
opportunities for moral progress. The truth is, we
are in a
transition state;
the duties of which, as it
seems to me, are imperfectly understood; and as
to the names, he would be a benefactor who should
introduce those satisfactory to all parties.
There was a short pause, during which Mrs.
Ardley hemmed as if something stuck i' the
throat; making an effort, she said, I confess,
Sara, to hear you talk only, I should think you the
most absurd woman in the world; but then it's true,
that in spite of your theories, you do get on
wonderfully
with your enormous family; but you always
have the luck of having such good servants! you
are almost the only one of my acquaintance I never
hear complaining. You must have a wonderful
knack! how have you acquired it? When you
were married, you knew no more of housekeeping
than I did.
No one could know less than I did, Annebut
my circumstances since have been more favourable
to my improvement than yours. The first three or
four years of my marriage were imbittered by my
ignorance of domestic concerns. My husband,
as you know, is most kind-tempered and
considerate
,
but I saw him perpetually annoyed with the
consequences of my ignorance and inefficiency. I
was never indifferent to my household duties. I
felt my deficiencies and failures, and was
perpetually
made uncomfortable by them. Still I tried
to persuade myself, as everybody else does, that
it was my servants' business to understand their
work. No one dares nowadays scold a servant;
but I remonstrated with them, I changed them, I
echoed the complaints I heard on every side, and
I verily believed housekeeping the bitterest curse
of a woman's existence. My three eldest girls
were born within the four first years of my marriage.
My cares, of course, multiplied rapidly, and made
me all but miserable. My husband was most
indulgent
.
He forbore inviting his friends to his
house, because I had, upon two or three occasions,
been mortified and made unhappy by dinners
illserved
to our friends. We could not afford to hire
extra servants, and I had not yet learned to supply
my people's ignorance by my own knowledge, and
to provide against their shiftlessness by my own
foresight. So all the advantages and pleasures of
hospitality were foregone.
I am sure, Sara, I remember your giving
parties
.
Yesone, perhaps two, I did give, because
we must keep our place in society, and this was
the easiest contribution I could pay. You can hire
skilful people, you know, for such occasions, and
get through them without feeling disgraced
disgraced
,
Anne, I confess I did in my secret soul feel,
for I was conscious that my miseries arose, for
the most part, from my own defects. I look back,
even now, with bitter regret to the social duties
that my ignorance, my utter incompetency
compelled
me to forego.
Dear Sara, that is superfluous misery, I am
surewho ever did perform so many social duties?
I have often wondered how you, with your ten
children, could think of taking your two nephews
into your family, and that little sickly orphan girl.
Ah, Anne, we cannot make one duty performed
a substitute for one omitted.
Dear me! then you may as well omit them
altogether, as I do. But, pray tell me when this
new light dawned upon your affairs? Perhaps it
was a northern light, up in that barbarous country
you removed to?
You are right; it was. My husband's affairs
compelled us to remove to the St. Lawrence. My
nurse was the only person that I could, for love or
money, persuade to go with me. Love was her
motive. Love, not only for the children, but for
us; for before this time I had got on a little in my
domestic self-education, and had learned to treat
Clara Lane as my friend.
Bless me! did mammy live with you so long
ago?
Yes; she it was who taught me not only to
appreciate the virtue, but to estimate the power,
and respect the dignity of a domestic labourer.
Are you not tired, Anne?
Dear! nopray tell me how you got on in
that wilderness.
At first, badly enough. When we were within
six miles of our home, Ella was taken ill. We
stopped at a log-hut; she was too ill to proceed.
There was but one bed that the people could, for
any consideration, spare. I wished to remain with
my sick child, but the mistress of the hut said `No,
unless I could cook my own victuals, make the
child's porridge, and do my own waiting onthe
nurse was welcome to stay, but folks warn't plenty
enough up there to run after ladies!'
What a brute!
H
Not at all. It was the plain truth coarsely told.
Oh, how much I would then have given for
mammy's
facultiesmy
servants
', Anne! There was
no alternative, and I was obliged to go on, with
the consciousness that I should be as useless in
my own home as at the log-hut. However, I had
health and unimpaired strength, and the
cheerfulness
they generate. I was beginning to profit by
the lessons of necessity, `our sternest teacher and
our best!' There were no domestic labourers to
be obtained. I cannot describe to you my woful
condition, nor my family's, when we were first
reduced
to depending on my culinary skill. Oh, how
I broiled over my first beefsteak, dropped it in the
ashes, and blistered my fingers, my poor husband
standing by the while sympathizing and laughing;
my potatoes I served as hard as they were dug out
of the earth! The first day we borrowed bread
from my husband's farmer, our only neighbour; the
next, mammy not coming, I was compelled to make
some. I was ashamed to ask directions of our
neighbour Mrs. Stone; I thought it must be a simple
operation, and I knew, as I supposed, the materials
of which it was composed. I kneaded and baked
it, after calling my husband from important business
to heat and clear my oven. Anne, you would have
pitied my consternation if you had seen me when
I drew the bread from the oven. It was as solid
and as heavy as a brickbat. I cried, my husband
laughed, his patience was inexhaustible; I then
laughed too, threw away my bread, tied my right
arm in a sling, sent for Mrs. Stone, and said, `You
see my conditionwill you mix some bread for
me?' She set about it with alacrity; I watched
every step of the process, and found I had omitted
the yeast in my composition! I went a little
further in my artifice, for I was in a position to be
as much ashamed of my ignorance of the domestic
arts as a professed amateur would be if found at
fault in the fine arts. Good Mrs. Stone vaunted
her
emptyings
, as the country folk call yeast; she
`always,' she said, `calculated to have
lively
emptyings
.'
`So do I, ma'am,' said I, `but I should like
to know how you make yours.' `Oh, I make them
like other people, I guess, but some always have
better luck than others!' I was determined to
secure
her
luck
, if possible, and so I said, `I should
like to know exactly how she made hersperhaps
her way was different from our city way.' I shall
never forget her reply, for it was my first
introduction
to the indefiniteness of unwritten receipts. `I
hang on my kettle of water,' she said, `throw in
some hops and potatoes according to my judgment,
and when they have boiled long enough, I strain
the liquor into some rye flour, if I have it, and put
lively
emptyings to it!' Here, as you perceive,
was neither time nor quantity; but, by means of a
cross-examination which would not have disgraced
a lawyer, I elicited the necessary information; and
when on my next baking-day I presented my first
fair, light loaf to my husband, I was a proud and
happy woman!
Oh, I have always thought, said Mrs. Ardley,
if I lived in the country, I should like to attend to
domestic concernsthere is nothing else there,
you know, to occupy you.
Mrs. Hyde smiled. She thought of the rational
and elegant pursuits that had occupied her in the
country, but she did not advert to them. As all
preachers should do who hope to produce an effect
by a single discourse, she confined herself to one
topic. Yes, Anne, she said, I soon began to
find pleasure in my domestic concerns. I was
often compelled to be an actual operator, for in a
new country labour is too precious to be bought
with money; but I was every day learning, and in
no department is the acquisition of knowledge more
certainly power than in this. Mountains were
soon levelled down to molehills. Labours that, at
first, exacted all my time, strength, and thoughts,
became easy by repetition; and I had not resided
six months at Hydedale before I was able to
despatch
my household business within the two hours
prescribed by Madame Roland.
Madame Roland!the celebrated Madame
Roland? for pity's sake, what had she to do with
household business?
She administered family affairs with a very
small income, and she was at the head of an
immense
establishment, and in both positions she says
her domestic duties were comprised within two
hours.
[5]
[5]
Madame Roland says of herself, The same child who
read systematic works, who could explain the circles of the
celestial sphere, who could handle the crayon and the graver,
and who at eight years of age was the best dancer at youthful
parties, was frequently called into the kitchen to make an
omelet
,
pick herbs, and skim the pot! We have known a few
Yankee girls who might make a similar boast.
Dear! yes, with French servants; but, if I
understand
you, you had not even American servants.
You forget. Mammy was always with me;
and when I could get no one else, she insisted on
relieving me from the roughest of the work, though
she had only contracted for the duties of nurse.
But she was my friendmy
help
in all things, and
I treated her accordingly. If she had been
treated
as many ladies think it necessary to treat
their domestics, she would not have stayed with
me a month; and why should she? The money we
paid her could have been far more easily earned
elsewhere; but our gratitude and our affection
were make weights against which no scale would
have preponderated, though heaped with gold. I
remember a circumstance which mammy certainly
never will forget, that occurred one day when we
had some New-York friends with us. Sabina
Rayson
was one of them. I was baking a pudding, and
my dish was nearly as large as my bakepan; in that
case, you knowno, you do not knowfor I
suppose
,
Anne, you never baked a pudding in your life.
Bless you, noand I trust I never shall.
Well, if you ever had, you would understand
the dilemma I was in. I could not take out my
pudding without risking the burning of my fingers.
Sabina passed through my kitchen just as I was
worrying over it. Mammy stood by, looking on.
Sabina stopped to watch my progress, and
exclaimed
involuntarily, `Why do you plague
yourself
with that, Sara? Why don't you let mammy
burn her fingers?' Now, you know, Sabina has
both sense and kindness; but she had always
looked upon domestics as half the world do, as
persons created expressly to minister to our
pleasure
,
to burn their fingers for us;
and when I
replied
,
`If anybody, Sabina, is to burn her fingers
with the pudding that my friends and I are to eat,
H2
it should be me, and not mammy,' she said, `Well,
you are the oddest woman!' and retreated to the
parlour to laugh at my
peculiarities
.
I do not wonder it struck Sabina as strange
but in the situation you were inso dependant on
mammyyou were quite right.
I should have been right in any situation, my
dear Anne. Sabina's exclamation is a most apt
illustration
of the abuses of nine tenths of the world
of this relation. It has passed into a proverb with
me, and scarcely a day goes by that I am not
reminded
of those unlucky words, `
Why don't you
let mammy burn her fingers?
'
Mrs. Ardley did not quite admit her friend's
inferences
,
but she was entertained with her facts.
Had you no one but mammy, she asked, all
the time you lived at Hydedale?
Yes, occasional services I could always
procure
;
for though, as I told you, money would not
buy labour, yet our farmers' girls said, `Mr. and
Mrs. Hyde had such friendly ways that they loved
to work for them,' and mammy, always a favourite,
was a sort of decoy bird to them. You may have
seen my seamstress Paulina.
The nice girl you told me made the children's
dresses?
The same. She was a poor child whom I took,
in country phrase, `to bring up.' A treasure she
has proved. She is now so accomplished that she
can earn more than I can afford to pay her, and
she is about leaving me to go as a
first hand
to a
dressmaker.
Then you do meet with ingratitude as well as
the rest of the world?
I have, certainly, no ingratitude to complain of
from Paulina. I have had hard work to persuade
her to leave me, and she consents only on condition
that I permit her to return if she
cannot
learn to
content herself away from us.
[6]
[6]
We have known Mrs. Hyde's principle acted on, where the
disinterestedness and the sacrifice were much greater than in
her case.
What a pity! said Mrs. Ardley, whom the
common way of looking at such subjects seemed
to have rendered incapable of seeing them in Mrs.
Hyde's point of view, what a pity she did not
keep to plain sewingcould you not prevent her
learning dressmaking.
Certainly. But a poor girl has it hard enough
getting her living by her needle at the most
profitable
work; so I made her avail herself of every
opportunity
of learning of my dressmaker.
Do you never consider yourself?
Yes, Anne, most effectively. I most certainly
benefit myself by promoting the improvement of
those under my care. I have often wondered that
housekeepers in the country do not more frequently
secure
help
by taking children `to bring up.'
Young
children may always be obtained; and care
and kindness, while they are too young to render
much service, is amply paid afterward. A child
taken from a vicious family, or from a shiftless,
ignorant, or overburdened mother, may thus be
saved not only as far as concerns the
self-preserving
virtues that are brought into action in this
world, but, reaping the fruits of a moral and
religious
education, she may be saved in a higher
sense. In getting new domestics I prefer young
onesyoung subjects can be remoulded and taught.
You can inspire them with confidence, and make
them zealous fellow-workers with you in their own
improvement. Those who have come to years
of maturity, especially foreigners, have minds so
stinted, and such inveterate bad habits, that it is
very difficult to make them comfortable members
of a little family community, regulated upon
principles
of reciprocal affection and confidence.
But, dear Sara, what a task must all this
teaching
be!
And what a harvest, Anne! Depend upon it, my
dear friend, there is no happiness like that of
energetically
employing our faculties to achieve some
good end?
Yes, you are very right; but then the object
must be worth the exertion. Now, to confess the
truth to youdo not be offended, SaraI do not
mean to apply it to youyou are so superior to
most women, that it is different with youbut in
general, I mean, it does appear to me very vulgar
for ladies tototo worksweep a room, for
instance
roast
a turkey! horrible!
There will seldom be occasion for a lady to
perform drudgery herself who thoroughly
understands
it, for this very knowledge will enable her
to direct the services of others. But I would have
every girl practice enough to be able to help
herself
in the emergencies that are constantly
occurring
,
and to teach the ignorant, whose ignorance,
mark, if she cannot enlighten, she must endure. A
woman may employ a vast deal of talent in the
administration
of her family affairs. I think it was
Paulus Emilius who said it required as much
genius
to order an entertainment as to draw up an
army. And, Anne, if our young ladies want the
example of heroines to redeem domestic offices
from their vulgarity, to
idealize
the housewifelet
them remember Andromache, and Desdemona, and
sundry others. For a champion to my cause, there
is the old Roman Cato, who, Plutarch tells us, was
followed to the wars by only one servant; and when
this servant was weary, Cato would cook the
dinner
`roast
a turkey,' perchanceif he could get
one. Seriously, my dear Anne, do not let us
consider
any occupation so vulgar as indolence and
inanity
.
How many lives are consumed in utter
frivolity! A little light reading, a little
needlework
,
a little shopping, visiting, dressing, and
undressing
,
and so day after day passes away. You
and I, Anne, know a great many who perform well
their domestic duties without their interfering with
what are called higher pursuits. But I do not know
how there can well be a higher pursuit than the
improvement and happiness of those who are placed
by Providence in those little primary schools, over
which we, in virtue of our characters as mothers and
mistresses, preside. Let us try to train our girls
for this their happiest sphereto prepare them to
be the ministers of Providence to the more ignorant
children of the human family.
Mrs. Hyde was interrupted from an unexpected
quarter. Lucy Lee had, unobserved, listened;
during
the last sentences she had drawn nearer and
nearer, and now she involuntarily exclaimed, How
like mother she does talk!
A compliment! cried Mrs. Ardley,
laughing
,
and she bade Lucy take the baby up stairs.
The simplicity of the girl pleased Mrs. Hyde, and
her sweet countenance was stamped on her
memory
.
It is fortunate for you, Anne, she said,
that my harangue was interrupted; when we
mount our hobbies, we are apt to jade our friends.
The truth is, I often think reflection would bring
others to the result to which necessity brought me.
It may be, Sara. You have certainly given me
some new ideas. I have heretofore thought only
of enduring the evil, never of curing it.
CHAPTER VIII.
REFORM.
Mrs. Ardley
the very next morning set about
reforming altogether her household. Like that
of many fresh converts, her zeal was employed on
the faults of others rather than her own. I am
resolved, she said to Sophy, to speak to Ferris
about her drinkingshe is getting too bad!
I have long thought so, Mrs. Ardley; and really,
since she set the bed a-fire, I am afraid she will
burn herself up, and poor little Lucy tooher
month is up next week.
She is a capital cookwhat nice made-dishes
she gets up!
Without heeding Mrs. Ardley's interjection, Sophy
proceeded. I heard Mary Minturn (Mary was
the seamstress) say that her health was failing so
sitting at the needle, that she would be thankful
for the cook's place if she could suit you.
Oh, she could not, possibly. What does she
know about cooking?
She has cooked in a gentleman's family. To
be sure it was a small one; but she says, if you
would be patient with her for the first month, she
could learnshe is very handy at learning, you
know, Mrs. ArdleyMary Minturn isshe says
she likes cooking, and it agrees with herand she
is dying by inches now.
She is out of the question, SophyI must have
a thoroughbred cook, that can do everything
without
directionyou know Mr. Ardley and I are both
particular about the table. There's one good thing,
Ferris never get's fuddled till after her work is
done; and if you, Sophy, would just look in her
room after she goes to bed.
I can't undertake that, Mrs. Ardley; I have
quite enough to do without sitting up to look after
Ferris, replied Sophy, who, in the main, was a
very good-tempered girl, though now ruffled by the
ill success of her proposition in behalf of her friend.
I think you are very disobliging, Sophy,
rejoined
Mrs. Ardley, intent on rectifying wrong on
the right hand and on the left. I have been quite
too indulgent. You are all getting spoiled, and I
really must require you to comply with my wishes.
It's
not
my work to look after the cook.
You all know what is
not
your work, though
you seldom know what
is
. Sophy flung out of
the room without replying, and in the course of the
day announced to Mrs. Ardley, that as Mary
Minturn
had determined to go when her month was up,
she should go too! Sophy was too valuable a
domestic
to lose without an effort. Really, Sophy,
replied Mrs. Ardley, kindly, it is foolish of you
to go on account of the few words we had this
morning.
It is not altogether that, Mrs. Ardley, replied
Sophy, softened; but, when Mary Minturn goes, I
shall sleep alone; and you know, when there were
two of us, we never liked David's having to pass
through our room to get to his.
Oh, I understand nowbut indeed, Sophy, it is
too absurd and old maidish! Such a respectable
man as David!
I know that, Mrs. Ardleyand that is why we
have submitted to it so longbut I do not think it
will be suitable when I am alone. You ladies are
fenced and guarded on every side; poor folks must
take care of themselves.
Well, Sophy, I thought you was one that was
above changing for every trifle.
I have borne a good many disagreeable trifles
for two years rather than change, Mrs. Ardley;
but my mind is made up now.
Had Mrs. Ardley thought it worth while any
time within the preceding two years to have had a
door cut from David's room to the passage-way (an
improvement that would not have been deferred a
day, if females of her own grade had occupied
Sophy's
department), she would have attached Sophy
by an attention that expressed respect, and would
probably have secured her valuable services.
[7]
[7]
We once heard a gentleman say that he had for the first
time received from Mr. Gallatin the idea that good servants
might be secured by a due attention to their convenience and
happiness. We trust that gentleman will pardon us for availing
ourselves of the authority of his name in support of a favourite
theory.
Not
warned by her ill success, she proceeded in her
work of reform. Ferris, she said, when Ferris
came to take the bill of fare for dinner, Ferris,
I feel it to be my duty to speak to you about your
habits.
Ferris was by birth an Englishwoman, and she
retained somewhat of the deferential un-American
manners of her early years.
Thank you, madam, she replied; and in
what don't my habits suit, madam?
You know, of course, what I mean, Ferris.
Indeed, Mrs. Ardley, I am as ignorant as the
babe unborn.
Then, candidly, Ferris, I tell you I fear you
drink too much.
Indeed, Mrs. Ardley, there's been a foul tongue
between us. I am not in the least fond of drink.
Do you not drink spirits every day, Ferris?
Indeed, madam, I tell you the living truthI
just take the weakest of weakly toddy, to take off
the 'fect of the dinner-steam, for medicine like.
But as to drinking, there's not the woman soberer
than I in the city.
Mrs. Ardley smiled at the hardihood of this
assertion
;
but she thought it most politic not to express
in direct terms her incredulity, so she said,
good-humouredly
,
I hope you will persevere in sober
habits, Ferris, for intemperance is very foolish and
very wicked. And pray, Ferris, don't burn another
bedspread!
Did ye think it was me, Mrs. Ardley, and just
I
because I would not tell on that childyou know
Lucy is like mad for a book.
I have observed she is fond of reading.
That's what I call a
habit
in a servant; but,
poor thing, she's young. And when she went to
sleep and left the candle burning, and waked in a
fright just as I came in to bed, maybe she did not
just know who did it.
Well, Ferris, we'll see she does not burn a
light after she goes to bed  so, if anything happens
again, you know you must bear the blame. Ferris
learned her own importance by seeing that her
mistress was willing to appear duped, and Mrs.
Ardley stifled the reproaches of conscience for
tolerating drunkenness, and its consequent lying
and injustice, by saying, I have
spoken
to her
what can I do more?
Are not the virtues and vices of domestics too often
requited, not in proportion to their desert, but
according
to their effect on the convenience of their
employers
?
Mrs. Ardley was under a strong impulse, and
she proceeded in that most delicate of all operations
reform. Mary Minturn, she said, I perceive
that you are getting uneasy, like all the girls.
Mary Minturn was suffering from debility and
loss of spirits, the almost certain consequence of
too close a confinement to a sedentary employment.
She burst into tears. Don't be troubled, Mary;
I did not mean to reproach you, resumed Mrs.
Ardley; servants are always fancying they shall
like some other work better than that they are doing
it's the old story; each one is eager to lay down
his particular burden, and glad enough to take it
up again; I was not the least offended; if you had
seriously proposed going away, I should, to be sure,
have thought you very absurd and ungrateful.
Indeed, indeed, Mrs. Ardley, I am not
ungrateful
but
But what? Surely you do not in earnest mean
to leave me?
I must, ma'am. The doctor says I am getting
a liver complaint, and I can never be cured if I
don't take to some stirring work.
Pshaw, Mary, how absurd! You have been
to some goose of a doctor. It is a great deal harder
to do `stirring work,' as you call it, than to sit at
your needle. I will speak to Doctor Smith about
you. You know I have always told you that you
might have our own physician free of expense.
Thank you, ma'am, but I am sure my own
doctor is right. He says he will not impose
medicine
on me; it will only make the matter worse,
and I feel what he says to be true.
And you really mean to leave me?
I must, Mrs. Ardley.
Well, you must do as you think fit, but I doubt
if you find a better place.
Mary was silent; her tears still flowed; there
was something like a taunt in Mrs. Ardley's words,
and still more in her manner, which repressed the
expression of the gratitude Mary deeply felt for all
the indulgences and kindness she had received at
Mrs. Ardley's hand; and the lady left her with the
conviction that, as she soon after said to a friend,
Mary Minturn was just like all other servant-girls;
let Sara Hyde say what she will, they are an
ungrateful
pack. Mr. Ardley and I have made Mary
Minturn presents upon presents. I have never
counted her lost days, and I have never spoken a
harsh word to her, and now she is going away
when she knows how important she is to me, just
because some absurd doctor has put it into her head
that sewing don't agree with her!
If Mrs. Ardley had understood the first principles
of physiology, and she was perfectly capable of
comprehending them, and if she had felt the duties
of her station, and applied these principles to the
persons cast upon her care, Mary Minturn would
not have lost her health, and they might have
continued
to the end of their lives to live together with
reciprocal benefit, instead of parting with smothered
reproaches on the one side for slighted favours,
and smothered gratitude on the other for the
exercise
of virtues that, after all, were merely virtues of
constitution.
After one or two other abortive attempts at
reform
,
Mrs. Ardley reverted to her old mode of
sailing
with the current, and letting things take their
own way, Convinced, she said, there was no
use in trying to have matters too perfect.
Our conclusion is, that old abuses in families, as
in states, are not of sudden or easy reform.
CHAPTER IX.
BONA FIDE.
Lucy Lee
, said Ferris, you know you have
the dishes to do to-day; it's my Sunday out.
But I did not have my Sunday out last Sunday,
you know, Mrs. Ferris.
That was not my fault.
Nor was it mine, said Lucy, who had the
strongest motive for maintaining her rights.
Sophy
wanted to go out, and Mrs. Ardley said if I
would stay and amuse the children I should go
home to-day. And Lucy had well earned the
performance
of the promise, for Mrs. Ardley said she
had never known the children so quietshe and
Mr. Ardley had both got their Sunday's nap without
once hearing them. The secret of this was, that
Lucy, finding it sorely against her conscience to
pass the sacred day in picking up ninepins and
dressing dolls, had kept the children still, and most
happy too, by telling them Sunday stories she had
heard from her mother. Ferris left the kitchen
for a few moments, and presently the bell rung
twice, the summons for Lucy. Lucy, I am sorry
to disappoint you, said Mrs. Ardley, but I
entirely
forgot it was Ferris's Sunday out.
Can't I set the dishes aside, ma'am, and wash
them when I come home?
No, Lcuy. Nothing puts Ferris out so much
I 2
as thatyou know we must mind our p's and q's
with Ferrisdon't look so dismal, childit's only
waiting till to-morrow.
Jemmie will think it's for ever waiting till
to-morrow
.
Jemmie! Oh, that little broken-back brother
you told me aboutnever mind; I'll give you some
of the children's old playthings to carry to him
to-morrow
.
He is not fond of playthings, Mrs. Ardley, he
can't play with them.
Well, books, thenpicture books.
Lucy's face brightened. She had often thought
how happy it would make Jemmie to possess a
few of the books the children were tossing about
the nursery. Thank you, Mrs. Ardley, she
said, nothing would please Jemmie so much; it
will make the time seem shorter when I am away;
and half consoled, and but half, she returned to the
kitchen, where Ferris greeted her with, You'll
find, Miss Lucy Lee, you'll never get the upper
hands of me; so you may as well give up first as
last telling about burnt spreads, or trying to keep
me at home when my turn is out.
I did not try to keep you at home, Mrs. Ferris,
I only tried to go myself; and if you knew how
much reason I had, you would not wonder.
Her mild answer softened Ferris, and she said,
Well, well, child, your turn will comeyoung
folks must give way, you know.
Lucy, after doing up her odds and ends, went
to bed and went to sleep, for sleep is the certain
compensation, the sure wages of the working; but
not till she had wondered whether mother looked
as pale as when she had last saw her, and whether
Jemmie had felt very bad about her not coming
home!
There's tears on her cheek, and she sleeping!
said Ferris, as she got into bed that night. They
sting me. God forgive me!
The next morning Lucy seized a favourable
moment
to ask Mrs. Ardley to select the books. Oh,
there's no hurry, child, said Mrs. Ardley; I can't
possibly spare you to go home to-day. It's
Monday
,
you know, and we are to have company to
dinner, and Mrs. Ardley was interrupted by
a request from David that Lucy might help him
with the breakfast things; this was followed by a
message from Ferris asking Lucy's aid. You
see how it is, resumed Mrs. Ardley, after giving
an affirmative to both applications, you must
wait till to-morrowcome, don't look like all the
woes! I'll get your books ready now, so there
will be nothing to detain you when the time comes.
This she immediately did, and in the indulgence
of her good-nature quite forgot the virtue that was
appropriate to the occasion. Sore as Lucy's
disappointment
was, that boasted specific for
happiness
,
having a little more to do than she could do,
shortened the twenty-four hours which followed.
Now, Mrs. Ferris, she said, I am going. I
have finished all you told me to do.
Finished! you have not brought down the things
for the pudding?
Yes.
But you have not beaten the eggs?
Yes, and ground the spice, and the coffee, and
dusted the dresser, and cleaned the celery, and
taken the pin-feathers out of the ducks.
Lucy! called David from the top of the stairs,
just rub over the table-spoons and silver forks
for methat's you, Lucy. Poor, Lucy with a sigh,
proceeded to the task. Before it was done Mary's
bell rung, and Lucy had to run to the thread and
needle store for something the seamstress must
have. On her return she met SophyOh, Lucy!
she said, you must put Mrs. Ardley's room up
she has sent me to the dressmaker's. Lucy!
called out from the upper entry Miss Anne, just
come and sew on my shoestrings for me; Mary
Minturn is busy. Lucy! screamed Master
Will Ardley, ask David for my boots, and bring
them up. Lucy! piped a little urchin from the
nursery door, mamma says you may come and set
up the soldiers I shoot down. No, no, Lucy!
cried in the same breath Belle Ardley, mamma
says you may iron my doll's frock first! Lucy,
secretly resolving that if she ever enlisted in
another
service, it should not be for odds and ends,
patiently threaded her way through, and then
presented
herself, cloaked and hooded, to Mrs. Ardley,
and asked not if she might go, but how long
she might stay. Oh, Lucy, childI am really
sorry! I forgot to tell you that you cannot possibly
go to-day. Wilson (Wilson was the wet-nurse)
says she
must
go outand you know it is as much
as my life is worth to refuse Wilson.
But cannot Mrs. Wilson come home in time
for me?
Noshe will not be in till after dinner, and
then it will be too late for youquite dark.
Oh, Mrs. Ardley! won't Miss Anne mind the
baby just while I run home and see how they all
are, and tell Jemmie why I can't come?
No, Miss Anne cannot; she is just going to
her dancing lesson.
Lucy was silent for a moment. It seemed
impossible
to her to give up, and she ventured upon
rather a daring request. Mrs. Ardley, she
asked, tremulously, won't you be so good as to
take care of the baby yourselfI'll be as quick as
possible.
Lucy, you are going a little too far.
Everybody
that lives with me, old and young, presumes
upon my indulgence. You know, child, I am just
dressing to pay visits.
Oh, Mrs. Ardley, if you could once see our
poor Jemmie, you would not wonder that I could
ask for dancing or visits to be given up.
It may be, child; but still you should recollect
what is proper and what is not. I really would
not disappoint you if I could well help it.
Lucy turned away to hide the tears she could
not repress. The younger children, who had been
listeners and spectators, now, from the kind instincts
of their nature, pressed round their mother to urge
Lucy's suit. Mrs. Ardley, probably from an
uncomfortable
consciousness of the wrong she was
inflicting, was unjust, and much less good-humoured
than usual. Be quiet, children, she said, I
must be more firm with the whole of you. Don't
tease me any more about this business of going
home, Lucyit's always inconvenient in the week
to spare you. To-morrow Sophy and Mary
Minturn
leave me, and my new women are coming;
Friday the baby is to be christened, and Saturday
is always a busy dayso you must wait till
Sunday
comes, and say no more about it.
It is said, the worm will turn if you do tread on
it. Lucy had nothing of the reptile in her nature,
but she did turn, and said in a voice that should have
penetrated the lady's conscience, You
promised
,
you
promised
, Mrs. Ardley!
Hush, childgo and lay away your cloak and
hood.
But you did promise her, mother, said one of
the children, and you always tell us we ought to
keep our promises.
Certainly you ought, and so I always do unless
I have very good reasons for breaking them.
Half an hour afterward Alice Ardley asked her
sister Belle where the basket was she promised to
give her. I have concluded to keep it myself,
replied Belle; I want it very much to keep my
doll's hat in.
But you promised to give it to me.
So I did; but mamma says we may always break
our promises if we have good reasons for it.
A natural application, and not a very forced
version
of the mother's ethics.
CHAPTER X.
THE VISIT HOME.
Lucy's
joy may be imagined when the most
blessed day of all the week came. One of the
uses of this day is, that it reminds the careless of
their duties; and Mrs. Ardley's conscience being
quickened by its ministry, she told Lucy she might
stay all day, and moreover ordered a basket to be
filled with tea, sugar, and other-luxuries, for Lucy's
sick father, and, she added, with a smile, for
that little Jemmie that Lucy made such a
wonderful
fuss about. Mrs. Ardley was never deficient
in that species of generosity manifested in giving.
Lucy found matters not improved at home. Her
father was still declining, her mother toiling beyond
her strength, and Jemmie as sad as ever at her
absence
.
Oh, Lucy! he said, holding her fast
down to his bosom, seeing you is just like the
seeing the sun shine into the windowno, no, a
great deal better than anything that only makes
us feel good outside! Lucy was, indeed, a moral
sunshine to this humble home.
She spread on the stand at her father's bedside
some of the delicacies from her basket. She
selected
a book for Martha, and another for Anne, and
set the rest in a row at the foot of Jemmie's cradle.
Never did a fanatical bibliopolist survey his
acquisitions
with keener pleasure; and when she saw him,
in spite of her presence, forget her and himself in
that most captivating of all juvenile classics,
Robinson
Crusoe, she drew her chair up to her mother,
and they communicated reciprocally their little
affairs
,
both generously softening or omitting what was
most painful. In answer to Lucy's question, Are
you ever troubled now, mother, to get the bread
money? Mrs. Lee answered, Now and then; but
Charlie Lovett leaves the loaf the same when I
have not as when I have the money. Oh, Lucy, I
have not told you his mother has been to see me.
She was very kind. She looks like Charlie; the
same open, benevolent expression. She brought
cookeys to the children, and told me her husband
would watch with your father. How pleasant it
was to hear a friendly voice once more! She
asked about you, Lucy.
About me, mother?
Yes. It seems Charlie had told her about
you. She said if she had known you wanted a
place, she would have taken you.
Would she! Oh, how I should like to live
with Charlie's mother.
On some accounts I should wish to have you
there; but, as she keeps but one domestic, there
might be too heavy work for youand you really
seem to be very well off with Mrs. Ardley. You
complain of nothing but your disappointment in not
coming home at the promised time?
No, motherno, said Lucy, persevering in
her resolve not to disturb her mother with her little
grievances, and really feeling them to be very
small while she looked at her, gently submitting to
a tide of troubles, and resisting where she could
overcome by resistance. If we all felt other's
burdens
more, we should feel our own less. Well,
my child, resumed her mother, go on where
you areget and do all the good you can, and
always
remember we are sent into the field to be
sowers as well as reapers. If anything serious
occurs, let me know it. I would not have you
submit
to anything that should impair your self-respect,
or ever forget that you can only forfeit your
independence
by misconduct. Their conversation
was broken off by the return of the girls from
Sunday-school
.
Overjoyed they were to find Lucy,
and not a little pleased that they had brought from
their teacher extraordinary commendations of their
well-learned lessons. I wonder, mother, said
Lucy, what Mrs. Ardley would say to your
finding
time to see to the girl's lessons, when, with six
of us to do her work, I heard her say to a lady `she
did not know what her children were studying
she had not time!' Only think, mother!
There are many occupations that fritter away
the time of the rich, which those who must be
devoted
to necessary labour know nothing about. It
is difficult for them to bring anything to pass.
But, mother, could not they if they had a mind
to? asked little Martha.
Certainly, my child; and those do who try
hard. But, my children, don't trouble yourselves
about what others do or do not doour consciences
are given us to watch over our own conduct, not
other people's. Come, girls, set the table. Our
dinner is done.
Dinner, mother! Are we to have a
real
dinner
?
K
Yes; I had two shillings over last night, so I
went late to market, that we might have a little
treat to-day, as Lucy was to be with us. You will
see what a nice dinner can be got for two shillings.
And shall I sit in your lap just as I used to,
Lucy? asked little Jemmie.
Yes, indeed you shall. The humble meal
was soon served, and most savoury did the joint of
mutton, which had been all day stewing with
vegetables
,
taste to the hungry little family. Dear
Jemmie, said Lucy to her brother, whose hunger
had not the keenness of the other children, I am
afraid your appetite is failing.
Oh, no, Lucy! he said, clasping his arm
around her neck, but this is dinner enough for
me.
Ah! muttered Lee, looking half enviously at
the girls devouring a bit of Mrs. Ardley's tart, too
rich for him, ah, girls, but pie is pie for allisn't
it?
Yes, father, said Lucy, pie is pie, and
nothing
else;
but parents, and sisters, and brothers are
everything
. The poor are not poor while they
can thus raise the minds of their children above
mere animal gratification, to a comprehension of
the true riches of affectionthe pure happiness of
home.
CHAPTER XI.
ALL GOES WRONG.
I never
was so tormented before, said Mrs.
Ardley to her husband.
What now, my dear?
My new seamstress plagues me so! From
morning to night she is coming to me with, `Please
to show me how you wish this done, Mrs. Ardley,'
and `would you be so good as just to fix this for
me, Mrs. Ardley?'
If she don't suit you, why not get another?
She does suit in some respectsshe is quick
and very neatshe only does not understand
fitting
.
Can't you teach her?
Ardley, how absurd! I might as well turn
seamstress at onceI sha'n't worry my life out
about it; if she don't get on I shall look out for
somebody elsechange is the order of the day.
How does the girl in Sophy's place make out?
So so. She is a firstrate worker, but she
annoys
me so!
In what way?
She has no manners. She has always lived
in the country and in mechanics' families. She
slam-bangs about the houseshuts the doors as if
she were in a tavernsings when I am in the room
sits down when she is taking my ordersnever
puts a Miss to the girls' namessays yes and no
to meand all that sort of thing.
These are all subordinate mattersis she not
good-tempered and well disposed? can't you teach
her?
She is the very soul of good temper, and she
seems as if she could not do too much for you;
but this drilling is so tiresome. I wish I could
have one perfect servant!
We must have perfect mistresses first.
That is just like you, Ardley. It is their
business
,
and they ought to perfect themselves for it.
The part of a mistress is not less a business,
my dear, nor does it require a less preparation.
Don't be offended, but I must say that I beg our
girls may be made acquainted with domestic affairs.
I should be ashamed to impose them on any man,
as ignorant as many young ladies are.
Oh, it's very easy talking, but you men know
nothing about domestic troubles.
You women, my dear, certainly do your best
to enlighten us.
I think you are very unkind, Ardley, when you
see me so annoyedbut your turn is coming, for
David is talking of going.
David! Heaven forbid!
He is, and it is half your fault, for ever harping
to him about saving his wages, and investing them
for him, till his head is fairly turned. He is going
to get married, and buy a farm in Michigan, the
foolish
fellow!
Not so very foolish either, to exchange a
manservant's
place in the city for a wife, a farm, and
independence in Michigan! Upon my word, it
gives me pleasure to find David's affairs turning
out so well!
Your tune will change when David really
goes.
I hope not, my dear; we will try to lose the
sense of our loss in David's gain.
Charity begins at home, Mr. Ardley.
But should not stop at home, Anne. Mr.
Ardley was a man of sense and benevolence; but,
unfortunately, he had begun with his wife as she
had with her domestics. He found her
not
qualified
for her place
, and it was too much trouble to
teach her. It required too sustained an effort to
awaken her to a sense of her deficiencies, and to
inspire her with energy to supply them; so he
consoled
himself with her favourite adage, What
can't be cured must be endured.
One raw disagreeable day, when the mercury
was just enough above the freezing point to allow
a heavy snow to thaw, Lucy came into the nursery
with the two little girls whom she had led from
school, that being one of the duties included in her
odds and ends. My dear Belle, said her
mother, why are you crying?
It's so cold, mother, Lucy could hardly help
crying. Lucy, please make haste and take off my
rubbers. Lucy did her best, but her hands were
benumbed, and she was less dexterous than usual.
What ails you, Lucy? your fingers are all thumbs.
I should think they would be, mother, said
little Belle, who had inherited her mother's
constitutional
kind-heartedness; she had not any
gloves, and she could not keep her hands under
her cloak, because she had to take hold of our
K 2
hands, you know; and besides, her shoes have holes
in them, and her feet are wet.
My dear, if girls will go out with ragged shoes,
they must expect wet feet. Why did not you change
your shoes, Lucy?
I have no others, ma'am.
Then pray buy a pair the first time you go
out; but, in the mean time, look in my closet; you
will find a basket there with half a dozen pairs'
more or less worntake them all, if they suit you.
Oh, thank you, ma'am! May I give a pair to
mother, Mrs. Ardley?
What an idea! Your mother wear my shoes!
did you ever notice my foot, child?
Yes, ma'am, but mother's is very small too;
and noise troubles father so much that a pair of
light shoes will be a great comfort.
Do what you like with them, child, you are
both welcome to them. But don't let me see you
with holes in your shoes. If there is anything I
can't put up with, it is an untidy-looking servant.
That's just the way, continued Mrs. Ardley, after
Lucy had gone in quest of the shoes, servants
never provide themselves with walking-shoes, and
they go spattering about in the wet, and then bark,
bark all winterit is too annoying to hear them.
Poor Lucy, the immediate cause of this
denunciation
,
having, before earned, predestined every cent
of her wages to her mother's necessities, had
looked with dismay upon her decaying shoes.
If the generosity with which Mrs. Ardley had
lavished
half a dozen pairs of but half-worn delicate
kid shoes upon Lucy had provided her with a
single
pair of stout walking-shoes, the child would
have been saved from much discomfort and
suffering
.
But she had not yet learned that it was her
duty to know the actual condition of her domestics,
to watch over their health, and, as far as she was
qualified by superior judgment, to regulate their
expenses
.
If she had even inquired into Lucy's, she
would have been touched with the child's virtue;
for Mrs. Ardley was far from being an unfeeling
woman; she was
only
thoughtless, indolent, and
self-indulgent. Few women are exposed to
glaring
vices, but let them beware of the moth and rust
that consume their virtues.
The consequence of Lucy's exposure was soon
apparent in a severe cold. The running up and
down stairs in the irritated state of her lungs gave
her pain, and, ignorant as she was of diseases, sad
forebodings.
After crawling about for two or three days with
a burning cheek and short breath, she was laid on
her bed, and Mrs. Ardley's physician being
summoned
,
he pronounced her very ill with
inflammation
of the lungs. The virtues of Betsy (Sophy's
successor) were now called into requisition, and
they amply atoned for the want of the graces that
belong to polished service. Like most American
bred domestics,
[8]
[8]
We once heard an Englishwoman, a competent judge, say
that the very best domestics she had ever seen, excepting the
Scotch, who did not surpass them, were the American female
domestics in Boston.
she had been accustomed to
multifarious
service. Her talents had been developed
by a life of exigences. She used her head as
well as her hands, and, as Lucy found, her heart for
the direction of both. What is your mother's
number, Lucy? asked her kind attendant; Mrs.
Ardley says David shall go for her.
Oh, please, Betsy, don't send to mothershe
cannot
come, and it will only make her miserable
to know that I am sick. I will give you as little
trouble as I canset the drink by my bedthat is
all I want.
It is not the trouble I mind, Lucy, but your
mother is the fittest person to be with you. Why
cannot she come? Lucy explained the sad
why
,
and Betsy, brushing off a tear, said, You are right
we must not put another drop in a cup too full
already. If Mrs. Ardley will only allow me time,
I can do everything for you. Let me see your
blister. The blister was just opened, when Mrs.
Ardley's bell rung. ThereI must golet it be
till I return. Betsy went down two pairs of stairs
to Mrs. Ardley's room. It was Miss Anne rang
the bell, Betsytell Betsy what you want, my
dear.
Have you seen my doll's muff, Betsy? Betsy
had not. Just look for it, please, Betsy.
Dolly can wait, I guessI must go back to
Lucy's blister.
Look first, interposed the mother. Miss
Anne wants to take her doll down Broadway.
Have you sent David for Lucy's mother? Betsy
explained why she had not. How annoying!
resumed Mrs. Ardley; how is she to be taken
care of here?
Oh, I can manage well enough if the children
won't ring me down to wait on their babies.
There's your dolly's muff, Anne; and now, if you
will go up to our sky-parlour, and see poor Lucy's
blister, you'll be sorry for her.
May I go, mamma?
No, my dear, those upper rooms are freezing
you will take cold.
If a sick person can stay in them, it won't hurt
me just to go in, mamma!
Servants are accustomed to cold rooms, my
dear.
But, mamma, insisted the little girl, who was
sagacious, and not accustomed to blind submission
in any form, I am sure the servants are part of
their time in our warm rooms.
You are talking nonsense, Anne.
There is one thing that is not nonsense,
mamma
;
I know, if I was a servant, I would not live
anywhere
that I could not have a fire when I was
sick. The child is fit to be a mistress, thought
Betsy as she remounted the stairs, and that's what
can be said of few. Betsy had just nicely arranged
her dressing to proceed, when the bell again
sounded
.
There it goes againring-a-ding! she
exclaimed
.
Oh, please go, Betsyit makes my head snap
so to hear it when you are staying just for me.
Thus entreated, Betsy went.
Bring me my fur-shoes, Betsy, from the next
room. The shoes were brought, and Betsy half
way up stairs, when the bell again rung. I
forgot
to ask you for my cloak and hat, Betsy, but you
should have thought yourself.
Is there anything else I ought to think of, Mrs.
Ardley, before I finish the blister? she asked, as
she handed in the cloak.
Bless me! is not that blister done yet? Why,
you began it half an hour ago! Mrs. Ardley saw
a cloud gathering on Betsy's brow, and she added,
I know the sick must be taken care of. Give
Lucy plenty of lemonade, or anything in the house
she wants. Betsy perceived Mrs. Ardley was
very bountiful of what cost her neither exertion
nor sacrifice. Is it surprising that such generosity
excites little gratitude?
Betsy had scarcely reached the top of the stairs
when the bell again rung most importunately.
Oh, Betsy, I entirely forgot that Mr. Ardley
wishes dinner half an hour earlier than usualrun
down and tell Ferris. Dear me! I gave David
leave to go outyou'll have the table to set
please, Betsyoh, how inconvenient it is to have
servants getting sickmine always are.
The next morning Lucy was worse. I shall
never be better, Betsy, she said, while I have
such dreadful nights. Mrs. Ferris comes to bed
so tipsy, and I loathe her so that I get upon the
very edge of the bed, and she snores so horribly
that I cannot close my eyesbut pray, don't tell
Mrs. Ardleyshe knows as well as we do Mrs.
Ferris drinks, and it will just end in my being sent
home to my mother, and that I could not bear.
So your life is to be lost, and all of us burnt
up alive, maybe, just because she can tickle their
palates; well, it's a comical world!
If I only might have any little bit of a bed on
your floor, Betsy? Betsy explored the house in
vain for extra servants' bedding. She was,
however
,
a woman of expedients. If she had been in
a log hut in the western wilderness, she could have
contrived something, and so she would not be
baffled
in a rich merchant's luxurious establishment in
the city of New-York. An old sofa-cushion was
brought from the garret, and various articles of
apparel
substituted for pillow and blankets. Betsy
then put Lucy into her bed, agreeing with her
bedfellow
,
the seamstress, that they would alternately
occupy the pallet on the floor. Lucy now reaped
the reward of the kindness she had shown these
women when they were strangers in the family.
To her frequent repetitions of How kind you are,
Betsyhow much trouble I give you! Betsy
would reply, Shut up, childit's contrary to
Scripture and reason to be `forgetful of good turns.'
Many a time have your weary little legs run up
and down stairs to show me where to put or to find
this or that fiddle-de-dee of Mrs. Ardley'sand, after
all, maybe it was not that, but something else she
wanted. She often put me in mind of a fellow that
was laying on to his ox, and screaming haw! haw!
`He is hawing,' said a man, who ached to see the
poor beast whipped. `Oh, I meant gee!' said the
fellow.
In spite of a good physician's advice, and all the
care her voluntary and most kind nurses could give
her, Lucy's disease, though abated, continued.
Two weeks passed away. How long they seemed
to poor Lucy, who, in addition to the usual pains
and penalties of sickness, felt the constant dread
of adding to her mother's burdens, and the failure
of the rent-money from her loss of time. Our
Father in Heaven will not forsake usmother has
often said soand I will try to remember this when
I feel
too bad
, thought Lucy; and with such
reflections
she calmed her beating pulse. Is that little
patient of yours never to get well, doctor? asked
Mr. Ardley one morning, when the physician came
into the breakfast-room.
I cannot answer for it, unless she can have a
room with a fire in it.
Bless me, is she in a cold room all this time?
Mrs. Ardley, my dear, how is that?
You know, Mr. Ardley, the servants' rooms
have no fireplaces, and she could not have a room
with one without turning out one of the family.
Would she not be better off at home, doctor,
even if her family are poor, than in a damp, cold
atmosphere?it must be bad for inflamed lungs.
It is, undoubtedly; and if the child has a home
and a mother, as the day is fine and mild, I should
advise her being sent there at once.
So the carriage was ordered; Lucy's wages paid
without any deduction for loss of time; a basket
with medicines, and another with provisions, put up
for her, and Betsy permitted to attend her home.
As the carriage drove off, That's a very good
little girl! said Mrs. Ardley; I hope she will
recover
;
but, if she does not, what a comfort it will
be to think we have done our duty by her?
I hope the poor child has not suffered from the
cold room; you should have thought of that, Anne.
My dear, how can I think of everything?
I am more dissatisfied with myself than with
you at this moment, Anne. I see that it is a
shocking
neglect of our duty for people of our condition
not to provide for the comfort, no, the actual wants
of those they employ. I do not wonder servants
are always ready to change their places, hoping
for something better, no doubt. If I live another
year, those upper rooms shall be made
comfortable
!
The tiresome domestic perplexities, even poor
Lucy's illness, might have been avoided by proper
qualifications and due attention on the part of Mrs.
Ardley. There was not in her case, nor do we
believe
there often is any want of indulgence or
liberality
to be complained of. We hope we shall
not be accused of imputing all the blame to the
mistress, because it is our ungracious task to
illustrate
her shortcomings. We know that the
general
low character of domestics and their perfect
independence
involves the mistress of a family in
much inevitable perplexity. But the fault is not
all the domestic's. We believe the difficulty would
be materially lessened if young women were
educated
for their household duties, and if they carried
into their relation to their domestics the right spirit;
if they regarded them as their unfortunate friends,
whom it was their religious duty to instruct, to
enlighten, to improve, to make better and happier.
It has been well said, that, when domestic economy
was perfected, there would be no need of political
economy. We would venture further, and say, that
when our family communities are perfectly
organized
the Millennium will have come. Will it
sooner?
L
CHAPTER XII.
THE SCENE CHANGES.
Whatsoever
is brought upon thee, take
cheerfully
,
and be patient when thou art changed to a
low estate, was an admonition perfectly illustrated
by Lucy's mother. Lucy's folks an't every-day
folks, said Betsy, when she returned, to her friend
the seamstress. I found Lucy's mother in a little
back room, as clean as hands could make it, sitting
over a few coals, sewing away for dear life, and
two bright slips of girls beside her. She turned
deadly pale when I brought Lucy in, and the girls
screamed out. `Don't be frightened, dear mother,'
said Lucy, in her quiet way; `I have been sick, but
I am getting better.' Her mother drew a cot near
the fire, and we laid Lucy on it. I saw the poor
woman was all of a nerve, but pretty soon she
kissed her child, and said, `It's a blessing to see
you, any how, Lucy.' Then I heard a slender little
voice, and I turned round and saw `
our Jemmie
,'
you know, bolstered up in a basket-cradle. An
angel's face he has on his crooked body. He
begged to have his cradle drawn close to her bed,
and then he took her hand, and kissed it over and
over, and said, `Oh, how glad I should be, if I was
not so sorry to see you sick, Lucy; and now you
will stay at home, and it won't be your duty to go
when you
can't
go, Lucy,' and so on. I declare, it
made me feel weak in the joints to hear him; so I
sat down, and `took an observation,' as the sailors
say. The father lay in bed with his eyes open,
but his wife said he did not know anything; he had
had a paralytic stroke since Lucy was at home.
They're sort o' and sort o' not poor folks; in respect
to this world, poor as the young ravens; but, in
respect
to furniture for t'other, forehanded! But soul
and body must be kept together, and, if you'll join
me, we'll send a load of wood just for love to Lucy
they'll feel better to take it so than as charity
from rich folksto be sure, them that takes can't
enjoy themselves so much as them that gives; but
that's Scripture law, and we can't help it.
As our business is with Lucy's domestic service,
we must pass over the interval spent at home. The
energies of youth and good nursing soon restored
her, and, through the good offices of Charles Lovett's
mother, she obtained a place at a Mrs. Simson's,
Mrs. Lovett's next-door neighbour. Mrs. Lovett
would herself gladly have taken her, but she had
just then cast upon her charities a desolate German
girl, who, on account of her utter ignorance of our
language, was unable to obtain a good place.
As soon as Annet has learned English, and
learned our ways, she will do well enough, said
kind Mrs. Lovett; and, in the mean time, I can
make out with her better than others, for I am not
particular. Never was woman less particular in
her requisitions from others, nor more exact in the
performance of every duty of humanity, than Mrs.
Lovett. She was too intent on her own
performances
to watch over her neighbours, and she knew
nothing more of the Simsons than that they were
what are called respectable people.
Lucy's new mistress was from one of the
Eastern
states. Her husband was a thriving mechanic,
and she was, in her little sphere, an ambitious
woman, what is called, in vulgar parlance, among
country housewives, a
driver
. She had certain
aims in lifethe first was riches; the second that
her children should rise far above their parents'
level. She well understood the means of achieving
the firstthe second is somewhat more difficult.
Aurelia, her eldest girl, was eighteen, with full
dark eyes, white teeth, and a profusion of brown
hair, that was dangling in half a quire of
curlpapers
in the morning and depending from half a
dozen combs in the evening. She had, moreover,
a fair, pale complexion, and a very slight person,
the result of indolence, indulgence, and
mismanagement
.
These attributes were valued by herself
and her mother as giving her what they called a
gen
teel look. Alas for such gentility! Mrs.
Simson
,
reckoning an exemption from manual labour
as the
first
requisite for a
lady
(that charmed word),
permitted Miss Aurelia to dawdle about all the
morning in a greasy black silk, with a novel, or a
bit of soiled muslin embroidery in her hand, while
she was in the kitchen overworking herself and her
handmaid Lucy.
Lucy was maid of all work. She rose early and
worked late, it being an oft-repeated aphorism of
Mrs. Simson, that young help should be up
betimes
.
The natural corollary from these premises
would seem to be, that young help should go to
bed betimes. Not so reasoned Dame Simson.
Young help, she said, should sew evenings
to make up for not turning off heavy work, that is,
should make up in time for defect of force.
I understood you hired for washing, said Lucy,
the first time she saw preparation for those
domestic
orgies, that were said by a wit to have been
instituted
to celebrate Job's birthdaythe day he
cursed.
Did I say so? Well, I meant I hired when I did
not keep help; but I don't calculate to pay monthly
wages, and six shillings a day for washingsix
shillings is six shillingsyou can't complain, child,
for I take the brunt of it. Lucy did not complain;
but, as she toiled through the too heavy burden
imposed
,
she looked back with regret to Mrs. Ardley's
odds and ends, and even to the never-ending
trifles of vexing Mrs. Bradson.
When the washing was ended, the accessories
fell to Lucy's sharethe starching, hanging out,
bringing in, sprinkling, and folding. The
heft
of the ironing I shall do myself, said Mrs.
Simson
;
you'll have nothing to do to-day, Lucy, but
make the beds, and sweep down the chambers, and
hang over the dinner, and smooth off the light things
while the pot is boiling. Oh, don't forget, though,
to rub over the knives, for
he
[9]
[9]
We do not know why so many good wives designate their
husbands by the pronouns
he
and
him
. It may be from a
transmitted
feeling of their supremacy.
is particular about
clean knives.
Any further directions were interrupted by a call
from the stairs. Ma, ma'n't Lucy finish sweeping
off the walkI sha'n't be ready for dancing-school.
Yes, Juliusrun and do it, Lucy, quickif
L 2
he
comes home and finds it not done, he'll find fault
with JuliusI don't know how I am ever to make
a gentleman of Jule if
he
sets him about such jobs.
Another scream from the stairs, and a request that
Ma would send Lucy to do up the parlour, for
Miss Aurelia expected Mr. Smith to call. Mr.
Smith was a young spring of the law from the
country
,
of whom Miss Aurelia flattered herself she had
made a conquest at her dancing-master's public
the preceding evening. The mother answered in
the affirmative. Be spry, she said to Lucy, and
make a fire in the grate, and polish the brasses,
and dust off the shades over the flowers, and reel
the sofy up to the fire. Aurely is very pa'ticular
when she expects her beauxand if Mr. Smith
should stay to dinner, fix the dinner-table just as
they fix it at Miss Ardley's; and I expect you won't
eat with us, Lucy, because Aurely has feelings
about such things.
Lucy had
feelings
too, but not about such
things. Her mother had early taught her that
feelings were given to quicken the affections and
awaken the sympathies, and not to feed pride,
vanity, and selfishness. Her feelings were no way
affected by sitting or not sitting at Mrs. Simson's
table. Your respectability must come from your
own character and deportment, my child, and not
from the place you occupy, her mother had said;
and Lucy, in her short experience, had seen
vulgarity
at a gentleman's table, and witnessed
refinement
in the lowest seat of the household.
Lucy had
feelings
, and once every day they
were called forth by her friend Charles Lovett,
who brought her tidings from home, which he
always
gave, with some kind word to boot, when he
delivered the family supply of bread. It had been
Mrs. Simson's custom to send to the bakehouse in
order to avail herself of a customary deduction in
the price of a certain number of loaves; but, since
Lucy had lived with her, Charles Lovett had
volunteered
to serve her at the door without an additional
chargean offer extremely puzzling to Dame
Simson
,
who understood little of those considerations
that cannot be represented by dollars and cents.
The day before Lucy's first month was up, Mrs.
Simson said to her, I see your ears are bored,
Lucy, why don't you wear ear-rings?
My mother bored them when I was a very
little girl, toto please my father.
Then you have worn them?
Yes; my father never liked to see me without
themso I always wore them at home.
They are dreadful pretty things, I think; don't
you, Lucy?
Yes, ma'am; but I think, as mother says, they
would look prettier if there was any use in them.
Use or no use, you would look a deal
handsomer
for themyour face is the right shape, and
your neck rather longyou raly want 'em. What
have you done with yours?
Mother disposed of them, replied Lucy, and
she was leaving the room to avoid telling the why
and wherefore.
Stop, Lucydid you ever take notice of
Aurely's
ear-rings, with red drops? Lucy had seen
them. Well, here they arejust as good as new
only one stone is gone and one hinge broke.
They might be repaired for a triflethey cost four
dollarsAurely has got two other pairs, and so she
has handed them over to me. To oblige you,
Lucy, I'll let them go at half price.
Thank youI do not want them.
Don't want them! I know what that means;
well, rather than you should be disappointed, you
shall have them for
one
dollar! it won't be like
laying out money. You can take them towards
your wages.
I cannot take them at any price. My mother
has occasion for every penny I earn.
Thus answered, Mrs. Simson was not ashamed
still to urge; and finally, when she despaired of
putting
off her foolish girl's broken finery, she mumbled
over something of girls not fifteen asking four
dollars
in cash
a month; and, if she paid at that rate,
she should look out for somebody that could earn
it; and a deal of stuff that made poor Lucy feel
very uncomfortable. Mrs. Simson, however,
understood
her own interests too well to part with so
faithful and capable a girl, and Lucy went on in
her second month's service. You can't find it
pleasant there, said her mother; Mrs. Simson
is a vulgar, hard woman; but patience is a great
help, and in some respects she is a desirable
person
with whom to serve a short apprenticeship.
She is a thorough worker. With her you are every
day qualifying yourself for the future. Your work
at Mrs. Ardley's was quite as wearing, and her
`odds and ends' would never have fitted you to
conduct business yourself. Go on, my dear child,
cheerfully. The future has always a harvest in
store for those who diligently improve the present.
As some plants grow stronger exposed to winds and
cold, so Mrs. Lee's resolution had strengthened in
keen adversity.
Lucy's labours were interrupted by a summons
home. Her father was dead. The events that
are appointed alike to all seldom pass without
awakening sympathy. No poor widow could be
more lonely than was Mrs. Lee; but she found
friends among those who bore it steadily in mind
that to do good and to communicate is an
acceptable
sacrifice.
Charlie, said Mrs. Lovett, bustling in a few
minutes after Lucy had got home, Charlie would
not give me a minute's peace till I came over to see
how you all wereand so forth.
The
and so forth
, afterward explained with an
awkwardness that had the quality of inward grace,
meant, that, at Charles's instigation, seconded by her
own generous heart, and authorized by her
husband
,
she came to offer to defray the expenses of
a decent funeral.
Mrs. Lee had calmly supported herself till that
moment; but such kindness from persons almost
strangers to her, such a tribute of respect to her
and her little ones in their very low estate,
overcame
her, and she burst into tears. As soon as
she could regain her composure, and express her
gratitude in words, she communicated, with the
confidence that such kindness deserved, the precise
state of her affairs. She had a watch which had
been given to her husband by his mother. It had
once been very valuable, and now, though
oldfashioned
,
if Mr. Lovett could obtain a just price for it,
she should be able to meet the expenses of the
funeral. She did not tell how tenaciously, through
all their clamorous necessities, her husband had
retained
this memorial of his motherhow, amid
the ruin of every just principle, and every other
pure and holy sentiment, that affection, which is
truly our
first love
and our last, had clung to him.
Neither did she communicate to any one but Lucy,
the sharer of all her thoughts, the weakness that
had assaulted her noble mind. For a little while
I did feel, Lucy, she said, as if I could not part
with that watchit is the last relic of our better
days, and a secret wish has lurked with me to have
something to show the children in future, as a proof
of what their grandparents were. So our little
pride and vanity will stick to us, Lucy! So
inconsistent
are our foolish habits with our principles.
It has been my desire to conform your minds to
your situation, to make you realize that all honour
and happiness was in your own souls, and not in
anything outward; and I might have spoiled it all
by turning your eyes back to what your parents
were, instead of directing them forward to what
you should be!
But we are lingering with Lucy's mother when
our business is with far less interesting people.
Mourning is very expen
sive
, said Mrs. Simson,
when Lucy returned to her work in her usual dress;
I conclude your mother don't feel as if she could
put you all fully into it at once?
No, ma'am.
That's wellI like to see folks prudent, and
to help 'em to be so. I've got a bombasin that I
had for my best when mother died, and it was made
over for Aurely when the baby died. I calculate
it will answer your purpose very well for Sabbath
days and so forthgo get it, Aurely.
Aurelia did not know where it was. She
believed
she had tucked it in the rag-bag.
Her mother uttered a philippic upon her
wastefulness
,
and bidding her hunt it up, the gown,
torn, frayed, and rusty, was soon produced. It
don't look very smart, to be sure, said Mrs.
Simson
,
evidently taken aback by its forlorn
appearance
;
but when it's sponged, and turned, and made
overI'll allow you time to do it of eveningsit will
make quite a scrumptious dressthat is,
considering
it sha'n't cost you more than a dollar and a
halfonly think of getting a bombasin for a dollar
and a half!
I am not going to wear mourning at all, Mrs.
Simson.
Possible! exclaimed Mrs. Simson, holding
up both her hands, nor your ma neither?
Yes, my mother will wear it, but not the
children
.
Lucy's manner was so quiet and decided, that
Dame Simson's hopes of turning the penny
vanished
;
but suppress her spleen she could not.
Well, she said, every one to their notion; but
I think, if I was ever so put to it, I should find a
way to get mourning when my folks died, especially
where it was as it was;
it looks pa'ticular and
wanting
of respect to go without it
looks is looks
.
Lucy would have borne this innuendo in silence
if she alone had been concerned; but her mother's
part in it made the blood mount to her cheeks, and
she said, My mother's rule is to show your
respect
by doing your duty to the living; and,
afterward
,
those that form wrong judgments by
looks
must she checked her resentment and stopped.
Must
what? you may as well out with it.
Must answer for it themselves, Mrs. Simson.
Ma, interposed Miss Aurelia, how can you
let your help be so impudent to you?
Master Julius stood by, and taking a different
view of the case, said, If ma is
sarcy
to her help,
she must expect her help to be
sarcy
to her.
But we are tired (we are sure our readers must
be) of detailing the petty abuses of a griping,
vulgar
mistress. Lucy endured them patiently for
some months, and till Mrs. Simson became impatient
of regularly paying the four dollars, instead of
putting
off, in part payment, some useless thing that
gave her the agreeable feeling of having got a
bargain
out of the person on whom she imposed.
It happened, not half an hour after Lucy had
received
her warning to look for another place, that
Charles Lovett, while delivering the bread, said,
Mother has found a capital place for Annet, and
she leaves us next week.
And I leave here next week. Charles snapped
his fingers, but said never a word. A few minutes
afterward Mrs. Lovett sent for Lucy, and engaged
her to supply Annet's place.
CHAPTER XIII.
CHARLIE'S MOTHER.
Mrs. Lovett
, in point of fortune and station, was
on an equal footing with her neighbour. Her
husband
was a prosperous baker, with seven sons,
healthy, noisy, good-humoured boys, our friend
Charles, now a lad of seventeen, being the oldest.
A person suddenly transported from the depths of
the winter of an arctic region to a land of soft airs,
verdure, fruits, and flowers, could not have felt a
greater change than did Lucy in her translation
from her dreary existence at Dame Simson's to the
atmosphere of affection and kindness that Mrs.
Lovett breathed around her. These two women
possessed the same external means; the cupidity
and selfishness of the one made a moral waste
around herthe good sense, affectionateness, and
sweet temper of the other operated like those
blessed fountains well called diamonds of the
desert, that minister to the life and beauty of
everything within their reach.
If Mrs. Lovett had some defects which impaired
the effect of her virtues, or rather diminished the
amount of good she might have produced, we do
not care to analyze them. It seems unreasonable
to demand an exact arrangement of rich,
spontaneous
productions. We therefore prefer giving a
glimpse of her home; a day there might stand for
M
a year, as her kindness was inexhaustible, having
no measure but the never-ending wants of her
fellow-creatures
.
Lovett's business made it necessary for him to
be in his bakehouse before light, and Charles, at
the peep of dawn, was off in the bread-cart. The
morning was yet dim when Lovett came in from
his bakehouse, and found his wife kindling the
kitchen fire. Mother! he exclaimed, why
don't you call up your boys to do that?
Oh, I like to do it now and then myself.
Yes; but your now and then is about every
morningit's the boys' business.
They went out skating last evening, you know,
and it's their nature to love to sleep in the
morning
.
Have a care, mother; boys'
natures
must not
be humoured too much. Where is Lucy? Why
is not she helping you?
Oh, you know she had Jemmie here to spend
the day yesterday, and she and Charlie drew him
home in the evening, and she went to bed late and
tired. Besides, poor thing, she has got a pain in
her breast working so hard next doordown late
and up early, and it will take a good deal of
resting
to bring her quite right again.
Well, she has reason to bless her stars she has
got into hands that give rest to everything but
themselves
.
What upon earth is that noise? A cock
crowing up stairs!
Mrs. Lovett laughed. It's only Sammy's
bantam
!
He begged me to let him take him up stairs
to wake the boys up this morning; I thought I
would indulge him just once.
Once!
It's well it takes a power of spoiling
to spoil good boys. Lovett hit the truth, though
he did not precisely state it. Indulgence loses
much of its vitiating effect where good feelings are
kept in constant exercise by pure examples and
warm affections. Come, Sam! John! Bob!
cried Mr. Lovett, going to the stairs, get up and
help your mother. Bring down your bantam, Sam
he'll wake Lucy!
Lucy at this moment was coming down stairs,
and she said, smiling, she wished he'd waked
her sooner.
Soon enough, my child, soon enough. Mother,
now Lucy is up to help you, I'll tell you what I
stepped in for. There was a poor German came
into the bakehouse last night for employment, and
Charlie made out to talk with him enough to find
out he had been looking since he landed, a week
ago, in vain for work. He is a very
respectable-looking
man, and tells a sad story about the
starving
state of his old parents at home, for whom he
hopes to provide a place in our country
Did Charlie, interrupted Mrs. Lovett, find
out all that? Well, he did not take all that pains to
teach Annet for nothing.
No, mother, a kind turn is seldom thrown
away. But I was going to say, that as this poor
fellow has nowhere to go to breakfast, I thought, if
you were willing, I would ask him in?
CertainlyI should like it. You know I have
rather a fancy for Germans. Lucy, clap down
some sausages; he has been so long fasting he'll
want something warming. Make a good cup of
tea, Lucy; it will be relishing to himpoor
fellow
!
Lucy did all she was bidden, and would
fain have done more. A portion of her work had
been omitted in consequence of Jemmie's visit the
preceding day, and she set about rubbing the
knives. That will do, Lucy, said Mrs. Lovett;
they are clean, never mind the polishing; put the
brightest by father's plate and that poor fellow's.
I'll see to the sausages, and fry the cakes; it's bad
work for your eyes. You run and set the table,
and clap on an end, so that German need not feel as
if he crowded us.
The cloth is rather spottedshall I put a clean
one on, Mrs. Lovett?
No, never mind; it makes the washes too heavy
for Dinah to have clean table-linen every day. Set
the plates round so as to humour the spots. You
say they only dirty one cloth a week next door. I
should think the Millennium had come if that
happened
with my boys. They never will learn such
neatness!
It is a good lesson to learn, thought Lucy,
but learned next door at too great an expense of
thumps on the head, raps over the hand, and
aching
hearts. Mr. Lovett now came in to say the
stranger was ashamed to accept their hospitality.
He had not been shaven for a week, and was not
willing to appear before the women in that
condition
.
Oh, said Mrs. Lovett, ever ready to sacrifice
herself to the simplest act of kindness, oh, never
mind, let him just step into our bedroom and shave
take him round the other way. Lucy, run in,
and clear up, and tuck away! This was done, and
well done in a minute, and no one can question
Lucy's faculties who has seen mother's room, in
a house where there are half a dozen boys, a baby,
and a never mind! mother. The Lovetts'
hospitality
was the first ray of kindness that had fallen
on the poor stranger since he had reached our
shore, whither he had come full of hope as the
pioneer of starving friends at home. In Charles's
absence not one of the family could speak an
intelligible
word to him; but each, eagerly offering some
kindness, employed a language as universal as
human
feelings. Bobby set his favourite cat on the
stranger's knee, and the baby, sitting on Lucy's lap,
snatched from her plate a buckwheat and offered
it to him. Willie, dear! exclaimed Lucy,
repressing
his hand, you are dripping the molasses
all over the cloth. A tear of pleasure started into
the mother's eye. Never mind, Lucy! she said;
dear little fellow, how strange he should enter
into his feelings!
Mother! cried out one of the little boys, do
see Bob and puss drinking milk out of the same
cup! The mother reproved Bobby, but, joining
in the general laugh, the reproof was neutralized.
You need not all laugh at me, retorted Bobby,
for Sam lets his dog eat out of his plate.
But not when he does, interposed Lucy.
No, but he lets Jerry Bantam pick the corns
off his lips, and I am sure my pussy's mouth is as
clean as Jerry'syou need not laugh so, mother,
it's cleaner than baby's was yesterday when you
kissed it, and said you did not mind such a sweet
little fellow's dirt.
Oh, Bob! I guess not.
Well, if you did not say so, mother, you did
not mind it.
M 2
Then I'll punish myself by not kissing you for
a week to come.
Oh, no, no, mother! please give me one kiss
now. Mother refused, and Bob, a dauntless little
rogue, jumped up behind her chair, encircled her
neck with his arms, and kissed her chin, cheeks,
and forehead, leaving an impress of molasses
wherever his lips touched. There was a general
shout round the table at Bob's victory. Lucy
quietly handed Mrs. Lovett a wet napkin; the
stains were effaced, and the breakfast being over,
the family proceeded to the business of the day.
Mrs. Lovett had an energy and steadfastness in
the pursuit of her children's improvement, that,
if we did not every day see new and strange
combinations
in individual character, would have
seemed
incompatible with the habits of general
indulgence
we have depicted. A portion of her power
was undoubtedly wasted; but her imperfections
were accompanied by such perfect
disinterestedness
and generosity, that all sense of the infirmity
was lost in love and gratitude.
Bring your book, John, she said, and let
me be sure you have learned your lesson. You
were all agog about the skating last night. Lucy,
just hear Sam in Colburn. Oh, never mind! if
you are getting Charlie's breakfastthat's right,
dearkeep the sausage hot for him, but you need
not spread that clean napkin over the cloth
Charlie is used to taking it as he can get it.
He never finds fault, Mrs. Lovett, but he likes
it nice. Dinah don't mind washing a napkin more
for himshe says Charlie's clothes wash easy.
[10]
[10]
It is a common superstition among that much-enduring class
the washwomen, that good-natured people's clothes
wash easy
.
There is philosophy in this. What a pity a moral power should
be wasted which is a more certain lightener of labour than the
best patent washing-machine ever contrived.
Charlie gets the blind side of every one in
the house; but go on your own way, Lucy. Bless
me! when did you scour that knife and fork. It
must be confessed, you have profited by living next
door. Such a body as Mrs. Simson has her uses
for those who know how to catch the good and
leave the bad.
The bad was so disagreeable, Mrs. Lovett, you
could not catch it. Lucy was right. It is the
faults of the good and loveable that we are in
danger
of imbibing.
John had finished his recitation in that charming
school-bookcharming alike to teacher and learner
Popular Lessons, and was now in eager
pursuit
of his slate. Have you seen it, mother?
he asked.
Nohow is that, Samseven times seven is
fiftythink againLucy, dear, just set the baby
down and look for John's slate.
Oh, mother! Miss Selden said I must not
come to school again without strings in
both
my
shoes.
Lucy, dear, run into the bedroom and look for
a piece of galloonit is in the upper drawer, or
the under, or on the tableoh, perhaps in my piece
basket. Alas for the chace through that labyrinth.
Oh, Lucy, please to find my capblame it!
it's always gone.
Find it yourself, Bobdon't call on Lucy for
everything.
But, mother, Lucy always can find everything,
and I always can't. And so it proved. Lucy,
with infinite sweetness, found and arranged all that
was wanted, and the happy little troop issued from
the street-door and were bounding away, when
their mother called after them, John! Sammy!
here, for mercy's sake! John, you must take a
bottle
of wine to poor old Bretti.
Mother!clear to Reed-street!
Not if you do not choose, sir, replied his
mother, sternly, for she could manifest displeasure
when her children failed in an act of kindness.
Do give it to me, motherI do choose, only
it's such a horrid long way down there.
No. Charlie will take it by-and-by. The
way should never seem
horrid long
when we go to
do a kindness.
Well, I don't see what he wants wine foryou
and father never drink wine.
The doctor has ordered it for him, John. Now,
my boy, you are conscious you have done wrong,
and are trying to find some reason for it. Sammy,
take this book to Sarah Martin.
Has the doctor ordered a book to cure Sarah
Martin's lame foot, mother? asked Sam, laughing.
I don't know as to that, Sam, but I know it's
what they call an `easing medicine' for all
diseases
that are not too bad to admit of using itah,
Charlie! good-morning to you. Your breakfast is
all ready, and Lucy ready to bake your cakes.
That's firstrate, mother. Never did
breakfast
meet a keener appetite to do it justice, an
appetite
prepared by long exercise in the morning
air, and stimulated by good food, arranged by
neathanded
Lucy, who, while performing various other
miscellaneous offices, was baking the cakes, filling
his cup, and throwing in kind words and smiles.
A spoiled favourite of fortune (so called), rising
from the distasteful luxuries of a twelve o'clock
breakfast, might have envied our baker's boy!
Oh, mother, asked Charles, has father
decided
about the ticket for the lectures?
Yes; at least he left it to me, as he always
does, and I am determined to go, provided Mr.
What-ye-call-him says that a family-ticket will
admit Lucy.
To be sure it willis she not one of the
family
?
There are few, said Lucy, slightly blushing,
that consider
help
so.
Then they are fools, Lucy, besides being geese
but, in order to be certain, besides being sure, I
called on Mr. `What-ye-call-him,' mother's name,
you know, for all mankind, besides a part of
woman-kind
,
and asked him, and he said any one that lived
with us was one of the family.
But be honest, Charlesdid you tell him I was
your mother's help?
Nowhy should I, any more than that mother
was your helpno disparagement to you, Lucy;
but I think mother is the greatest help we have in
this family.
If help means aiding every one, and more
kindly than any one else ever did, I think she is
the best
help
in the world, Charles.
Oh, Lucy and Charliego about your business
you are turning my head!
CHAPTER XIV.
CALL AGAIN!
Mrs. Lee
received a proposition from some
friends in the village where she had spent her
youth, that induced her at once to renounce her
wearisome life in town and return there. She was
to preside over the family of an old pair, whose
some dozen children were married and dispersed.
She was permitted to bring Jemmie with her, and
advantageous situations were offered for her two
little girls. Lucy, it was decided, should be left
with Mrs. Lovett, and Lucy determined to
consecrate
her future earnings to Jemmie. This poor
little fellow's heart was almost broken at parting
with his sister. Without the extravagance of
Rousseau's
lover, he divided the world into two parts,
where she was and where she was not!
Lucy continued through the year at Mrs.
Lovett's
,
reminded by nothing but the regular receipt
of her wages that she was at service. At the
expiration
of that time a sad change occurred. Mr.
Lovett suddently determined to remove to Ohio.
He was the proprietor of land there, which was
now promising to become very valuable, and both
he and his wife expected, from a removal to that
fine new country, physical and moral benefit to
their children. The well-established bakehouse
was to be retained, and Charles, perfectly qualified
for the business, was left to conduct it. After
much deliberation, decision, and reconsideration, it
was settled that Lucy should remain in the city
this was strenuously urged by Charles, and rather
favoured by herself. A place had offered at Mrs.
Hartell's, where she might earn, with very light
labour, seven dollars a month. This money would
enable her to put some favourite plans for Jemmie
into execution, and any time, if she chose, as
Charles said and reiterated, lest the argument
should not prevail, she might go to her mother.
Well, my children, said Mrs. Lovett, at the
conclusion
of their deliberations, if one must stay, I
had rather the other should too. You will be a
brother to Lucy, Charles, and you will be a sister
to him, Lucy? They both promised. Did the
thought of ever being anything nearer enter their
young hearts? We shall see.
We are obliged to omit some of the most
interesting
scenes in Lucy's lifethe parting from
the Lovetts and her closing, for the last time,
those doors, that, as she turned their bolts, she
thought had never been closed against any claim
to hospitality or kindness of any sort, and the first
depression of her mercury at the chill atmosphere
of a new service-place.
She went to Mrs. Hartell's in the morning, and,
on inquiring for the lady, was told she was never
visible till eleven; but that she could see Miss
Adle. Miss Adle proved to be the nurse, a
Frenchwoman of a certain age, who lost no time
in acquainting Lucy with the duties of her new
place and its advantages. Her inaugural discourse
we shall repeat, merely taking the liberty to
translate
the French she interspersed, and mend her
broken English.
A very pretty position you will have here, my
dear, if you do everythingvery quick, and very
well. It is very necessary you should never forget
you are to be grateful to me for itfor Mrs.
Hartell
,
my dear, would never know that you was born
if I had not made the discovery. Lucy smiled.
'Tis very true, my dearwe had one Bridget here
very low Irish person, but very good judge of
charactershe admired me very muchshe spoke
well of youyour needlework, and so forth
particularly
she said you was very humble, which is
very pretty quality in young personyoung person
should always look up, and so forth, to those that
are very little olderas I am than you.
Adle! Adle! shouted one of the little girls,
you look full old enough to be her mother.
C'est que j'ai la dignit d'un ge mrmais,
mademoiselle, vous ne devez parler que Franois.
That is because I have the dignity belonging to
ripe yearsbut, miss, you ought to speak only
French
.
So you always say when you don't want us to
be understoodI hate French, and I never will
speak it when I don't choosepapa says I need
not.
Mais votre maman, ma chere mademoiselle,
elle dit tout au contraire.
But your mamma, miss,
says quite the contrary
.
Oh, well, I mind papa when I like, and mamma
when I like.
That is the way, I assure you, said Adle
to Lucy, making, like most foreign observers, a
general
inference from her individual experience,
with all American childrenthere is no
government
in this country nowherethe people do as
they please, and the very little children do as they
please. You will have the very great advantage
to eat with me.
Great advantage, indeed! interposed again
the aforesaid young speaker. Adle will take the
best, and leave you the restthat was the way she
served little Judy Phealan.
Mademoiselle Ophelia, vous tes trs desagre
ble ce matin; je me plaindrai de vous  votre
maman
.
Miss Ophelia, you are very disagreeable this
morning; I will complain of you to your mother
.
And mamma will complain to me, and I will
complain to papa, and papa will complain back to
mamma, retorted the little girl, laughing.
I wish you to pay no attention to miss, because
her mamma wishes her to say nothing in English,
and it is as if she spoke not a word.
Then you need not answer what I say, Adle.
Adle muttered a Mon Dieu! between her
teeth, and proceeded: You will keep our room
very niceI like very pretty order.
Yes, when you have others to take the trouble
of it, Adle.
Sacre! And in very hot days I wish you to
walk out with the young ladies, because it is very
disfavourable to my health.
And your complexion, Adledon't you
remember
the day your colour ran down on to your
frill?
Adle's colour now at least was natural. It is
impossible, she continued, when Miss Ophelia
is here to tell you all; but you will do everything
as I wish. You must ask always my direction, for
Mrs. Hartell is very delicateall American ladies
are very delicate, you knowand she wishes not
to be troubled. A slatternly girl now appeared
with the nurse's breakfast; Adle inquired why it
was not brought by Monsieur Achille, the waiter.
For a very good reason, replied the girl,
chuckling, Mr. Hartell has turned Monsheer
Achille out of doors.
Achille turned out of doors! For what?
For loving iced Champagne too welland
drinking as much of it as Mr. Hartell himself.
Quelle horreur! Je lui ai dit Adle checked
before she had betrayed herself. Pauvre
madame
,
muttered Adle, son mari est un bte.
Poor madame, her husband is a brute!
Anne,
she called after the girl, these cakes are cold
ask Henri to send me some hot ones.
Henri says if you want any more you may
come and bake them yourself.
Adle now bestowed the most vulgar abuse in
French upon Henri, and then begged Lucy to run
down and bake her some cakes. Just half a dozen
for meyou can eat the cold ones, my dearbut
my stomach won't bear cold cakes.
Lucy civilly but resolutely declined going down,
alleging that she was a stranger, and feared to give
offence in the kitchen. She immediately found
that in avoiding Scylla she had run on Charybdis.
Adle had expected to find in Lucy a meek
subject
to her authority; and disappointed, as well as
displeased, at so early a resistance, she looked
angry, spoke pettishly, and manifested her
selfishness
without the slightest restraint of good
manners
,
turning over the toast to get the best buttered
bits, pouring off all the clear coffee, and
appropriating
the only egg to herself. Before the
breakfast
was finished the baby cried, and Adle directed
Lucy to take the little angel up and make it quiet,
adding, that it hurt her digestion to be disturbed
at her meals!
Lucy obeyed. The little angel proved to be
a stout boy of ten months, in a most impish humour,
and, in spite of the kind instincts of her nature, that
led her always to care for and caress children, she
was tired resisting its struggling and screaming
before Adle was ready to take it. Miss Ophelia
and her sister had gone to their French school.
Eugene, the baby, was exquisitely dressed; no one
could deny Adle's perfection in every department
of the toilet. Lucy had arranged the nursery, and
was sitting at her needlework, when Mrs. Hartell
made her appearance. She was a tall and
handsome
woman, of about thirty, but her beauty was
impaired by paleness and langour, and powerless
from the absence of all expression. Her air of
high fashion, or perhaps her extreme coldness and
indifference, appalled our modest heroine; and after
the first glance she did not again raise her eyes to
the lady's face, and her ears gave her no
information
as to the character of her new mistress; for
her languid endearments to her baby, her more
animated admiration of its new French dress, and
her conversation with Adle, was all in French.
We shall take the liberty to translate it, omitting
the expletives with which both mistress and maid
garnished their discourse, Mrs. Hartell thinking it
quite graceful to exclaim at every other breath
Mon Dieu! though she rarely uttered the words
in English, the profanity being forbidden in her
own country by the usages of good society, as well
as by a Divine command. What made Eugene
scream so horribly? he broke my morning nap.
Oh, madame, a thousand thousand pardons!
Ask mamma's pardon, Eugene, and she joined
his hands, exclaiming, What an angel! He was
so terrified at a new face. She, nodding to Lucy,
took him up too suddenly. It was all I could do
to tranquillize him.
Is the girl promising?
Well enough! I may make something of her
in timewith an infinity of trouble; but nothing
is too much to do for madamethese Americans
are so awakward at firstso ill-mannered!
And
at last
too, Adle. But I suppose we
are to have an American waiter. Mr. Hartell has
turned away Achille, and swears he'll not have
another Frenchman.
Mr. Hartell is very impetuous, madameit
was only a suspicion of poor Achillethe other
servants are always against us. In truth, madame,
they are all in revolution down stairs, and Henri
swears he will abdicate.
Henri going! Achille gone! Well, I will
just shut myself up in my room, and let things take
their own way. If Mr. Hartell will turn away my
servants, he must get others to suit himselfI'll
have nothing to do with it.
Ah, madame, that is like the poor devil who said,
when the coach went over the precipice, `Never
mind, I am but a passenger.' Madame cannot live
without French cooking. American cooking is for
the brutes, not for ladies. If madame could only
persuade Mr. Hartell to return to Paris
Ah, Adle, if I could! Dear Paris! I shall
never go there till I go to heaven. Mr. Hartell
makes a point of never going where I wishhe
says, if he goes again to Paris, he shall go without
me.
The savage! a thousand pardons, madame!
But how can any one say or do anything unkind to
such an angel as madame! One thing is sure, Mr.
Hartell adores Monsieur Eugene. He will not go
to Paris without you, and leave him.
Well thought of, Adle! and, by-the-way, Mr.
Hartell has taken it into his head that Eugene is
getting pale, and he puts all the fault upon you, for
he says the wet-nurse told him the only reason she
went away was because she would not live with
you, and she called you a bag of lies and
pretences
.
The Irish savage! The Irish are all savages
all false and cruel.
Margery was good to Eugene, though.
Certainly, madame
before your eyes
and Mr.
Hartell's.
Mrs. Hartell was not ashamed to laugh at Adle's
insinuation against a faithful and warm-hearted
creature, who, during a long illness, had watched
all night with her child, and carried him all day in
her arms, and whom Mrs. Hartell had finally
sacrificed
to her favourite. I wish, Adle, resumed
Mrs. Hartell, you had borne with Margery a
N 2
little longer; wet-nurses are like cows, we only
keep them for the milk they give.
Adle shrugged her shoulders. But when they
kick and hook, madame?
This precious colloquy was broken off by the
entrance of the person in question. At sight of her
the baby almost sprung from his mother's arms;
Margery caught him in hers; and, pouring out a
flood of tears, caressed him with the fondness
characteristic
of her people.
God bless my darling! she exclaimed; and
ye feel just the same, and six weeks it is that ye
have not seen me.
One pretty while to stay away when one loves
so furiously! said Adle, contemptuously.
Her words were like the spark that kindleth a
great fire. And was I not here the very day after
I left ye? asked Margery.
Yesyou came for your wages.
God forgive me, and so I did; but my mind
was so full of my baby, that when they told me
Mrs. Hartell said I must call next day, I thanked
God, thinking then I should see the boy again.
The milk was in my breasts yet, and pressed upon
my heart like. But I should have been thinking
of the money, for my own child's nurse was
wanting
her pay, and two miles from the village had I
walked for it.
But, Margery, I told you I would pay you the
next day.
Ah, but ye ladies never think we have not
servants to send or carriages to ride in for our pay.
The time is all we have. It's easy for you to say
`call again,' and `call again,' and the time it takes
to `call again' is money to us, and ye are robbing
us of it, besides holding back our own.
Margery, you are very impertinent.
It's the truth, and not me that's impertinent to
you, Mrs. Hartell. Just listen to my story, and
ye'll be convinced. 'Twas the next day I was
offered a dollar for my day's workI could not
lose it, for I had two dollars a week to pay for my
childso I did it, and then in the evening walked
the two miles again, to be told, when I got to your
door, that you `could not attend to it thenyou
were dressing for a partyI might call to-morrow.'
I asked for Mr. Hartell, but he was out; so back
the two miles I went; and the walk, after the heavy
day's work, and fretting, brought on a fever that
night, and held me a week, and dried every drop of
milk in my breasts; so I lost the nurse-place I had
engaged, and had to take my own poor little baby
from the breast, for how was I to pay eight dollars
from the seven, which was all I could get as
drynurse
?
and the poor thing sickened and died,
and allallmark it well, Mrs. Hartell, came
from my not getting my money when it was due!
Mrs. Hartell, cold and careless as she was, was
startled with the consequences of her own mere
thoughtlessness, and naturally sought some
vindication
.
How could I know, Margery, you was in
such need of it?it was a mere trifleonly your
last month's wages!
Ye knew it was due, and that is all a lady
should want to know. What seems a trifle to you
is all to us.
But how could twelve dollars be of such mighty
consequence?
I have told you my storyit proved sickness
to me and death to my child.
C'est bien ridicule! exclaimed Adle; you
desolate madameand you very well know
madame
is very charitable.
I was not after wanting charity, but my own,
that madam had, and I could not get.
Well, pray, Margery, say no more about itit
is all paid now.
Yes, Mrs. Hartell, but paid
too late
.
We trust such evil consequences as Margery
suffered from the want of punctuality in the
employer's
payment do not often occur, but they are
not without a parallel. Is it not very common for
ladies, far more from thoughtlessness than
meditated
injustice, to delay the payment of wages?
Is there not a culpable inconsiderateness of the
rights as well as necessities of a large class,
including
tradespeople and humble creditors of every
sort, in that common reply to their demands, Call
again?
CHAPTER XV.
TRUTH AND FALSEHOOD.
Every
schoolgirl now acquires a certain facility
at talking French. Mrs. Hartell was educated
before
this was considered one of the necessaries of
polite life, and she set an undue value upon it.
She went abroad, to use a commercial phrase,
without capital, and consequently returned as poor
as she went. In plainer language, she acquired a
taste only for that to which art gives a false gloss
and fashion a fictitious value, a love for the
frivolities
that float on the surface of society in the
French capital, and for the usages that belong to a
highly artificial state of society; usages about as
well adapted to our stage in the progress of
civilization
as an ottoman is to the growing, bounding
child, or a lord-mayor's coach to our western
hunting-grounds
.
Instead of training her children to
the vigour necessary to endure and resist our
rugged climate, she immured them alternately in
the nursery and in a French boarding-school.
Instead
of allowing their persons to expand in
obedience
to the laws of nature, the beautiful work of
God was marred, and the frames fearfully and
wonderfully made were given over to French
milliners
and tailors. But worse than this: instead of
learning to speak their own homely Saxon, in the
phrases consecrated by the domestic usages of
centuries, they must first lisp in foreign accents,
taught by French servants. Even Mrs. Hartell
might have perceived the folly of a Frenchwoman
permitting her children to take their first lessons
on that most delicate, most cunning instrument,
language, from an American servant; but it never
occurred to her that the care of the French servant
teacher was worse, inasmuch as the opportunities
of education, moral and intellectual, for the lower
classes abroad are inferior to those accessible to
parallel classes at home. But, unhappily, these
were not Mrs. Hartell's most serious mistakes. She
never even thought of preparing the minds and
manners
of her children for the state of society in which
they were to live, or of adapting her own conduct to
the actual duties of her condition. Among other
necessary effects of this fatuity was the disorder
and misrule which in our domiciliary visits fall
more particularly under our observation.
Mr. Hartell was a man of good moral instincts,
but very little moral cultivation. He but half
concealed
from his children his contempt for their
mother, and not at all his detestation of her French
favourites. He very early took a liking to Lucy
Lee. He perceived that his boy, his idol, soon
preferred her to Adle, and he knew the preferences
of a child are unerring. He unwarily expressed
in Adle's presence his superior confidence in
Lucy. Lucy's sweet qualities, and thoroughly
tried they were, won the love of the little girls,
which they constantly manifested, much to their
mother's annoyance, by preferring Lucy on all
occasions
to Adle. All this, of course, galled Adle;
but while her mistress was her champion she felt
quite safe, and she was not insensible to the
advantage
of having a young girl of Lucy's capacity
and good temper, upon whom she might impose
her duties without her indolent mistress giving
herself the trouble to reprove, or even to notice her
injustice. But there were occasions when she
felt the presence of this faithful girl to be not only
inconvenient, but dangerous. On one of these
Lucy returned unexpectedly from Mrs. Hartell's
sister's, where she had been sent to aid in the care
of a sick child. The child had died suddenly, and
Lucy, on re-entering the nursery, found Adle at a
tte--tte
petit souper
with a dear friend. Both
master and mistress were out, and the keys had
been left in trust with Adle. The table was
spread with the choicest luxuries of the pantry.
After Adle recovered from the first shock of Lucy's
appearance, she resumed her conversation with
her visiter in French with apparent ease, and with
unwonted courtesy begged Lucy to join them.
Lucy declined, and refused a glass of Burgundy,
which Adle said was the best thing in the world
to raise the spirits after seeing one little child die.
When Adle's friend was gone, and the relics of
the supper removed, she said, as if soliloquizing,
Oh, how generous madame isshe say to me
always, `Adle, do with mine as if it were yours.'
Ah, she is one angel, madame!
Lucy understood the drift of this. No one likes
to appear a passive dupe; and, nettled at Adle's
thinking her so, she said, in allusion to the
Burgundy
,
Does Mr. Hartell tell you, Adle, to do
with his as if it were your own?
Very impertinent, miss! just so you always
are. Madame know so well as I your little arts
to get the blind of Mr. Hartellbad appearance in
the young girls to get the blind of the lady's
husband
.
I have madame's leavemonsieur is quite
another thingyou will not tell him? she added,
softening her tone. Lucy considered for a
moment
,
and then remembering her mother's rule,
whenever she doubted as to her course, to go
straight forward, she said, Adle, you know that
I know you are abusing Mrs. Hartell's confidence.
Adle's eyes absolutely glowed with rage, but Lucy
courageously proceeded. Did I not hear you tell
Mrs. Hartell how much sewing you had done the
two evenings you were out at balls when she was
gone, and every stitch I had taken myself?
You could not hear thatwe talk alway
French.
I heard and understood perfectlyhalf Mrs.
Hartell's words are English, and I have learned
many French words from you and the children.
Perhaps you think I did not understand your
winking
at me, when you showed Mrs. Hartell as your
work the stitches I had taken up on Ophelia's
stocking, nor your offering me the pink cravat
when Mrs. Hartell had left the nursery?
So it was to insult me you did not accept it?
No; but I would not accept a free gift from
one I did not like, and certainly not a bribe.
Adle had begun with a high blustering tone.
She now began to feel how powerful are the
weapons of truth, even wielded by a child; and
softening down, she said, in a deprecating voice,
You, my dear, mean always right, but in one
such young person the judgment is not ripe!
If my judgment is not ripe, Adle, my eyesight
is very clear, and I made no mistake when I
unlocked
Mrs. Hartell's emerald earring for you. You
would not have asked me to do it if you could have
done it yourself.
Mon Dieu! mon enfant, is there but one
emerald
earring in the world?that was the earring of
my friend Matilda!
I do not believe it, Adle, any more than I
believe
those stockings embroidered with rosebuds
which I saw on Mrs. Hartell's feet last Sunday,
and which are now on yours, belong to Matilda!
I am not deceived, Adle, and I fear I am wrong
in not undeceiving Mrs. Hartell.
You will not dare to say to madame, cried
Adle, bursting into a stormy flood of tears, that
I am thief and liarmadame will believe not
madame know very well the American servant hate
all the French peoples.
It is true she may not believe me, but that is
no reason why I should not do right. I hate to
turn telltaleI have no friend to advise me; but
my conscience, a safe adviser, tells me I ought not
to stand silently by and see my employer's
confidence
abused.
Then you tell? asked Adle, alarmed and
enraged
.
I must, if you go on in this waybut if you
stop here I will never tell what is past. Lucy
paused for Adle's reply. She was too cunning to
make a promise that implied confession. I never
will bind myself to one such little girl as youbut
remember, you have promised not to tell till you
suspect more. She evidently was abashed, but
O
not penitent. She was hardened by the long and
unexposed practice of evil and imboldened by Mrs.
Hartell's silly confidence and partiality. Perhaps
Adle had been singularly unfortunate; we leave
to others to decide whether her case was a rare
one; but in many years' service in her own country
and with sorrow we add in oursshe had never
had one employer who had regarded it as a duty
to attempt to reform the faults, and enlighten the
moral sense, and strengthen the feeble virtue of her
inferior and dependant. She had never had one
who considered her a member of the same great
family with herself, a creature of the same passions
and affections, who, after a few flying years, when
the relations instituted as a trial to the virtue of
employers and employed are past, must appear
with her at the same tribunal. Mrs. Hartell
winked at her faults to profit by her faculties; and,
instead of leading her back to truth and duty, urged
her forward in her devious course by the example
of her own vanities and self-indulgence.
Lucy knew she had provoked a powerful
adversary
who would do battle with the sword and
the shield, but she was strong and tranquil in the
consciousness of having done right. Before going
to bed she offered Adle her hand, saying, Be
sure, Adle, I wish to be your friend; and it shall
not be my fault if we are not the better and
happier
for living together.
Maisc'est un bon enfant!
She is a good
creature!
exclaimed Adle, yielding to a good
impulse and returning the pressure of Lucy's hand.
He's human, and some pulse of good must live
Within his nature.
CHAPTER XVI.
A DETECTION.
Though
too confirmed in evil to be reformed by
Lucy's gentle influence, Adle, for some weeks
after her conversation with Lucy, was guarded
before
her. She wore only her own finery, neither
indulged herself nor a
cher ami
with Champagne
or Burgundy, and only went out with Mrs. Hartell's
knowledge. This was often enough; for Lucy was
the pack-horse on whom she was allowed to cast
all her burdens. She was more lavish than ever
of her hollow caresses and pretty French epithets
on Eugene in his parents' presence, and the little
fellow requited her as well as if he had understood
them, by preferring everybody else to her. The
constraint of Lucy's presence was becoming
intolerable
to Adle, and she took a new course,
treating her with injustice and constant petulance,
in the hope of driving her to seek a new service.
But this was not easy to effect. Lucy had been
early impressed with an aversion to change, as an
evil in itself; and, besides, her love for Eugene
would not permit her to desert him. She had no
confidence in Adle, and she considered herself
pledged not to communicate her distrust till there was
some further overt act on Adle's part. There were,
too, in her situationwhere are there not?some
alleviating
circumstances. She had the half of every
Sunday to go to church; and true to the stroke of
the bell, Charles Lovett was on the steps to go
with her. She had often whole evenings, when
Adle had gone out without preparing her
taskwork
,
to read and write. She wrote often to her
mother and Mrs. Lovett. Her separation from all
she dearly loved sometimes brought the tears from
her eyes to the paper; but she wrote cheerfully,
said nothing of her trials, or put them in the faint
hues of the distance in the landscape, while her
pleasures filled the foreground. The letters began
and ended with some allusion to Charles.
Sometimes
Charles thought the sermon the best he
ever heard, or Charles thought it not quite so
instructive as the last Sabbath. It was a rainy
Sunday, and Charles prudently wore his old coat,
or it was such a beautiful Sabbath, and Charles
looked so well in his new coat. Last Sabbath,
dear Mrs. Lovett, Charles laughed and said my old
bonnet wanted a new riband and my old riband a
new bonnet; and so, to reconcile him, I told him
how, remembering mother's advice, never to wear
what was not suited to my circumstances,
though
given to me
, I had declined a present from Mrs.
Hartell of a French pink satin hat, hardly soiled at
all. The next day he sent me the greatest beauty
of a little straw bonnet with a white satin riband
I hope it will
never
wear out! Mother, there is
one thing I wish you would tell me whether you
think wrong. Charles and I always come the
longest way home from churchit seems
very
short too. Is not it strange Eugene should know
Charles? When I am holding him up at the
window
,
and he sees him coming up the street, he
claps his hands; but, oh, the poor little fellow is
so affectionate! When I come home he shouts as
if he would go mad with pleasure.
Lucy had now been four months at the Hartells',
and she was beginning to suffer the natural
consequences
of her position. Her principles rested
too firmly on a sure basis to be shaken, and her
dispositions were too sweet, they had too much
natural force, to be easily impaired; but her habits,
like the habits of most young people, were flexible,
and at the mercy of circumstances. She fared
sumptuously every day, and in her steril and
inactive
life her meals became events. She had
felt a blush steal into her cheek as she detected
herself mentally wondering how she had existed
day after day on rye-mush. Trained from infancy
to early rising, it had seemed as natural to her as
to the birds to rise when the day broke. At Mrs.
Hartell's she occupied a sofa-bed in the nursery.
At first it had seemed to her a real misery to wait,
hour after hour in the morning, till it pleased Miss
Adle to have the blinds opened; but, in the
process
of a few weeks, partly from keeping irregular
hours at night, and partly from the facility that all
young people have at sleeping, and partly, probably,
from the physical indolence that seems ever ready
to encroach on our energies, she became at first
passive, and then, like the sluggard, she loved a
little more folding of the arms to sleep, and a little
more slumber.
From having been a very bee in her industry,
she was falling into the lounging, desultory habits
of the household. Sometimes she would be so
hurried by Adle that she was compelled to
despatch
her work in the most slovenly manner, and
then precious minutes and half hours that she had
been taught to cherish as the stuff that life is
made of were wasted in lounging about with
the children, or gazing out of the window with
them, listening to their comments on the fine clothes
that were worn by those people whose only part
in life seems to be to play walking advertisers for
dressmakers. Dress was the constant theme at
Mrs. Hartell's. Lucy had scarcely ever heard her
mistress talk of anything else. Upon this topic
Adle was almost eloquent, and the little girls
naturally
adopted and repeated what they heard, so
that life, in the aspect it now offered to Lucy,
afforded
ground for the fanciful theory of a certain
writer, who supposes man, that paragon of
animals
and quintessence of dust, to be made up of
clothes
. Lucy had been well fortified by her
mother to resist this ruling passion of the house,
but she was not exempt from the infirmity of her
age and sex; and there is no knowing how long
she might have resisted the deteriorating influences
that make half the world creatures of mere sense
and frivolity, had they not been suddenly
interrupted
.
Eugene had arrived at the teething period, trying
to the soul of mothers and nurses. Lucy's days
and evenings were devoted to soothing him. At
night he was left to Adle's tender mercies. Her
virtue could not be expected to stand the test of
his wakefulness and fretting, and repeatedly Lucy
was startled from her deep sleep by the shrieks of
the child; and when involuntarily she sprang to his
bedside, the poor little fellow most beseechingly
stretched out his arms to her. She suspected that
Adle, in her impatience, inflicted some personal
violence upon him, and particularly after hearing
her assure Mr. Hartell the next morning that it was
the cries of cats, and not his child's, that had
awakened
him. On the same morning she saw Eugene
frequently put his hand to a part of the arm covered
by his sleeve, and, on examining it, she found it
black and blue, and looking as if it had been
severely
pinched. Could Adle, she asked
herself
,
have done this? it seemed to her too
fiendish
an act; but suspicion had taken possession
of her, and she determined to be watchful. She
loved the child fondly, and felt the more tenderly
for it from the carelessness of its natural protector.
The next night Eugene waked at his usual time,
and his first whimper roused Lucy from her light
slumbers. She took care to give no sign that she
was awake. Adle got out of bed, and taking up
the night-lamp, and ascertaining, as she supposed,
that Lucy was sleeping, she took a vial from under
the pillow, dropped a few drops into Eugene's milk,
and fed him. He soon fell asleep, and, as Lucy
observed, slept late and heavily the next morning.
All the next day Lucy was wretched. She shed
bitter tears over the poor little boy, who, it seemed
to her, would be the victim of his unprincipled
nurse. She was uncertain as to the best course to
pursue. She felt sure Adle had given the child
laudanum
;
but what use would there be in telling the
mother so? Adle would frame her own lies for
the occasion, and would be believed; and then she
herself would probably be sent off in disgrace, and
no one would be left to comfort the poor little boy.
But had she not best address herself to the father?
it would be easy to rouse his fears. He was now
in Philadelphia, and expected home the next day.
In the intervening night she might perhaps get
some proof to substantiate her suspicions. Thus,
with a prudence beyond her years, determining on
her course, she was careful not to betray, by word
or sign, her suspicions to Adle. The next night
Lucy lay awake with a beating heart till Eugene
began his usual fretting. Adle gave him his milk,
and soothed him to sleep; but his sleep was
restless
,
and she was long kept awake. Just as her
breathing betrayed that she had fallen asleep, and
Lucy, believing that all danger for that night was
past, was yielding to the demands of nature, Eugene
started up wide awake and screaming. This was
too much for Adle's patience. He had taken his
milk, and she had no proper resource for quieting
him, so she adopted that most convenient to
herself
;
and rising, she took the vial from its
hiding-place
,
and, with her back towards Lucy's bed, was
in the act of dropping some drops into a spoon,
when Lucy sprang upon her and wrested the vial
from her hand. A scuffle ensued; and Adle
succeeding
in regaining the vial, instantly threw it into
the grate; and then, recovering her self-possession,
as even weak persons sometimes do in great
emergencies
,
she said, with forced calmness, What is
it all? Why let me not take my drops?
Your
drops, Adle! oh, don't think to deceive
me! It was the drops I saw you give the baby
last night! horrid laudanum!
LaudanumI swear it was notyou have no
proof it was laudanum.
Have I not? said Lucy, pointing to some drops
that had fallen on the sleeve of her night-dress.
They are on you, not on me. I will first tell
the story to Mrs. Hartellshe will believe you
nevernever.
But Mr. Hartell will believe me; and as surely
as he returns to-morrow I will tell him the whole
truth.
Adle's hardihood now forsook her utterly. She
saw the abyss opening at her feet, and falling on
her knees and wringing her hands, she besought
Lucy to have pity on her. I am away from my
country, she said; I left all to come with Mrs.
HartellI have no friend in this countrynobody
will care for menobody will pity me.
I do pity you, Adlebut
But you will tell all to monsieur; is that what
you call pity? Oh, Dieu merci! he will be like
one tiger to me.
And what have you been to this poor little
helpless
child that was trusted to you, Adle? think
of that. Lucy had taken up Eugene, and he had
quietly lain his head on her bosom, and was
looking
up into her face as if he knew she was his
guardian angel. Lucy caressed him tenderly; and
then turning up the sleeve of his night-dress, she
showed Adle the traces of her violence on his
arm. Adle well understood her, but she said
nothing. She perceived there was no use in any
further lies to Lucy; and when Lucy added, I
know what my duty is; and though, as I told you,
Adle, I am very sorry for you, I will certainly do
it. Adle saw there was no use in any further
supplication. She rose from her knees, and, after a
few moments' silence, she said, with a totally
changed tone, I will not be lost by one such
young person as you.
Poor Lucy, little imagining how much this threat
imported, took her protge to her narrow bed,
where they soon fell asleep together, while Adle
lay tossing on hers, and contriving a cruel plot.
CHAPTER XVII.
FALSE APPEARANCES.
The
next morning, while Mrs. Hartell was in
the nursery, during some very common
conversation
about French embroidery, Adle asked, as it
seemed, casually, if madame had found the superb
cape she had missed. Mrs. Hartell said she had
not; that she and her maid had searched
everywhere
for it; she was sure it must have been stolen;
and if it were not for letting Mr. Hartell know
how much it cost, she would get him to inquire at
the police-office.
Oh, madame! cost so much! it was but seven
hundred francone hundred and fifty dollar for the
most superb 'broidery of Paris, and the full Mechlin
trimming the most rich, is nothing at all!
Mrs. Hartell was really mortified at having set
a higher value on a particular sum than her
liberal
domestic, and she replied, Oh, of course it is not
the money it cost I care about; but there is not
such another cape in New-York. Nobody has
anything
like it. No one can get anything like it; for
I was assured in Paris the pattern was destroyed,
and there never should be another like it.
Does that make it any more valuable, mamma?
asked Miss Ophelia, who happily was yet
ignorant
of the ludicrous ambitions and rivalries of the
dressing world.
Certainly, my dear, interposed Adle. I
lived with one lady who would not wear nothing
everybody else wore; and one time she burnt up
one new pretty hat because she saw one just like
it. Ah, madame, you must find that cape, so
distingu
why
not search your own house before
you search the police?
Mrs. Hartell shrugged her shoulders. The
servants will all be angryand then Mr. Hartell
will be angry.
They cannot be angry with you, madame, for
I make the proposition. I am one of the servants,
and you shall search my trunk, my box, my bureau
first. And, suiting the action to the word, she took
her keys from her pocket and gave them to
Ophelia
,
who, like all children, delighted with the idea
of exploring, flew to Adle's trunk; and, opening it,
exposed a confused mass of clothes, finery, little
boxes, knickknacks, and toys of every description,
such as would naturally be accumulated by a
French
femme de chambre
. Miss Ophelia was so
much amused that she seemed to have forgotten the
object of her quest, and Adle came to her aid, and
saying, You will never find the cape this way,
Miss Ophelia, she proceeded with the keen scent
of a trained policeman to ransack boxes, unroll
stockings, turn the sleeves of dresses, shake out
the skirts, &c., &c., and thus she went through all
her own repositories, of course finding not a thread
that did not belong to her, for well had they been
sifted that morning. Now, Miss Ophelia, she
said, ask Lucy for her key to her one trunkshe
always wear it round her neckshe very careful
of her keyshe have such rich clothes, you know.
For shame, Adle! I am sure Lucy looks
prettier in her plain clothes than an old painted up
person would, even dressed in mamma's clothes.
Ophelia! no hints.
Well, then, mamma, she need not hint at Lucy
if she does not want to be hinted at; and besides, I
won't unlock Lucy's trunk. She steal mamma's
cape, indeed! I would trust her with all the gold
in the world.
Why don't you unlock your own trunk, Lucy?
Lucy blushed deeply, and said she had rather
not. Adle threw up both hands, and looking at
Mrs. Hartell, exclaimed, Mon Dieu! est il
possible
?
No, it is
not
possible! retorted Ophelia; and,
fired by Adle's insinuation against her favourite,
she caught the riband by which Lucy's key was
suspended and unlocked the trunk. On the top
lay a pencil sketch of Charles Lovett, that he had
the Sunday before given to Lucy. Ophelia grasped
it, and held it up to Lucy archly. Lucy, trembling
with embarrassment, begged her to give it to her;
and while a little contest ensued between them,
Adle, casting, ever and anon, stolen glances at
Mrs. Hartell, proceeded in her investigations. It
was a short piece of work. There was something
in the neatness and order with which our humble
friend's scanty stores were arranged that would
have appealed even to Adle's heart, if she had
not been intent on self-preservation. You must
excuse me, Lucy, she said, as she shook out
Lucy's frocks and unrolled her stockings; I only
serve you as I serve me myselfit is nearly
finished, and then, as me, you will be tranquil
one thing more, and we have done
look,
madame
!
she took the last article; a cotton petticoat,
from the bottom of the trunk, unfolded, and shook
it. The cape fell from within it! There was a
general exclamation. Adle's reiterated Mon
Dieu! mon Dieu! drowned every other. After
the first burst of surprise Mrs. Hartell seemed
entirely
occupied with examining a zigzag tear in
the cape, which marred her pleasure in her
recovered
property; a pleasure that otherwise would
have engrossed her to the exclusion of all emotion
at the discovery of such guilt in an apparently
innocent young creature; for, in her eyes, Lucy
was
but
a little servant girl; a species of the human
genus with whom she had about as much sympathy
as with the bees and the silkworm, whom she
fancied were created
solely
to make honey for the
table, and spin silk for ladies to wear. Oh,
Lucy! how could you? how could you?
exclaimed
Ophelia, mortified and grieved.
Lucy was near fainting, and pale as death.
Ophelia's
exclamation brought the colour to her face,
and tears and voice to her relief. I did not take
the cape, she said; I don't know how it came
into my trunkAdle must know!
Oh, mon Dieu! mon Dieu! listen, madame!
You have never seen one such bold personone
P
such hypocritedid you not suspect when she
wished not her trunk examined?did you not see
her blush and tremble?did she not turn pale as
one guilty person when the cape dropped?and
now she accuse me! Ah, c'est un horreur!
Quite shocking, indeed! responded Mrs.
Hartell
,
faintly, her eyes still fixed on the rent in her
cape. Do you think, Adle, Justine could darn
this so it would not show?
I believe not, madame.
If she had only stolen it, and not torn it,
resumed
Mrs. Hartell, I could have forgiven her
but she really does deserve the penitentiary.
Adle, bad as she was, started from such a
consequence
;
and affecting to pity Lucy, she said,
Ah, madame, she is very young!
The penitentiary, mamma! exclaimed
Ophelia
;
Lucy shall not go to the penitentiaryI will
ask papahe will be home before dinnershe
shall not go to the penitentiary, if she is ever so
guilty.
Lucy's distress was increased by her
embarrassment
as to what it was best for her to say or do;
her faculties were stunned; she almost lost the
sense of her identity. She felt alone, helpless, and
exposed to judgment without mercy. Ophelia's
affection touched the springs of her heart, and, as
she afterward said, first sent her thoughts to the
right place; and that, having breathed a silent
trust in Him who seeth in darkness as well as in
light, she felt more composed! Still the tears
poured over her cheeks, and little Eugene, sat
on her lap, put up his hand and wiped off first one
cheek and then the other; then put up his lips to
kiss her, and finding all did not to, he too burst into
tears, and hid his face on her bosom. Whatever
becomes of me, thought Lucy, folding her arms
round the little fellow, I will do what I can for
you! and, after a little consideration, she resolved
that she would, if possible, remain in the house till
Mr. Hartell's arrival, and reserve her statement for
his ear. In the mean time Adle whispered to her
mistress, and both retired for a few moments. In
that interval Adle strongly urged sending Lucy
immediately off without other punishment than loss
of character and loss of place. If, she urged,
she stays till Mr. Hartell arrives, she will frame
her own storyshe will put everything upon me
Mr. Hartell will believe hermen always believe
a very pretty young girl against one who has the
misfortune to be not youngmadame will be left
without any French servant, and that dear angel,
master Eugene, would speak English first, just as
the young ladies had.
Convinced by these precious arguments, Mrs.
Hartell returned to the nursery, and announced to
Lucy that she must leave the house within an hour.
Lucy entreated that she might be permitted to stay
till evening, and Ophelia seconded her entreaties,
and then declared she should not go till papa
came. Her mother's reiterated decision only
made her more vehement, till Adle whispered to
her that if she cared for Lucy she had best let her
go at once, for all the servants knew what had
happened, and no one could say how soon a
police-officer
might be in the house. This roused the
common childish terrors of an officer of justice,
and she now urged Lucy to hasten her departure.
Lucy, however, resolved to abide all risks but that
of leaving Eugene before his father was warned
of his danger. Her resolution was, however,
suddenly
changed by the arrival of a letter from Mr.
Hartell, saying that business had unexpectedly
taken him to Richmond, Virginia. Now there
was no reason for delay, but whither go? Though
she had served all with whom she had lived
faithfully
,
and had left them with a spotless character,
they had never manifested that sort of interest in
her that inspired the poor child with confidence to
apply to them in her present stress. Had they
performed their dutyhad they been friends as
well as employers, with what confidence might this
poor girl have appealed to them, sustained as she
was inwardly by that strong-siding champion,
conscience
?
She thought of going to her mother at
once; but though she was sure her mother would
believe her story, others might not, and she could
not bear the thought of returning to her with a
blasted character. She hoped that if she remained
in the city the truth might come out. Her heart
prompted her to go at once to Charles Lovett; there
she was sure of faith and sympathy to the full.
But what could he do for her? nothing; while her
resorting to a young man as her only friend might
render her liable to further and more cruel
imputations
.
What, then, should she do? She had not
a shilling in the world, for two days before she had
sent all her unexpended earnings to dear
Jemmie
.
Again she passed her employers in review,
and among them Mrs. Ardley, always good-natured
and kindly disposed, had made the most favourable
impression, and she had half resolved to go and
tell her story to her, when a recollection of the
lady whom she had seen at Mrs. Ardley's, the Mrs.
Hyde who talked so like mother, darted into
her mind. The reminiscence seemed like a
revelation
from Heaven. She had such feelings for
servants, thought Lucy; she will hear me, and
give me good advice at any rate. Her decision
made, she proceeded to the preparations for her
departure. And first, undaunted by fear of Adle,
she asked to speak alone with Mrs. Hartell. To
this Adle objected, and that lady bade her say
whatever she had to say without any fuss. She
then, in spite of Adle's interruptions and
protestations
,
told the story of the laudanum calmly and
exactly. There are few who give all the weight
that should be allowed to general character against
unfavourable appearances in a single case,
especially
if they have appealed to their own senses.
Certainly Mrs. Hartell was not one of the
exceptions
.
She had seen
with her own eyes
the
cape taken from Lucy's trunk. She had witnessed
Lucy's reluctance to have her trunk examined, and
her confusion afterward; and she readily
acquiesced
in Adle's suggestion, that the story of
the laudanum was an after thought, trumped up
to save herself, and to take revenge on Adle for
the part, innocent and unpremeditated! which she
had in exposing Lucy's guilt. Lucy remembered
the drops on her nightgown, and referring to them
as a corroboration of her testimony, she produced
it, but the stain was effaced! After a little
hesitation
,
after again and again kissing Eugene, who
clung to her as if he understood all that was going
on, she told the story of his shrieks, and showed
P 2
the marks still on his arm. Adle, quick as
thought, exclaimed, Mon Dieu! l'ingrate!
l'ingrate
!
and proceeded to tell a story of Lucy
having
let Eugene fall on his coral bells, and bribed
her to secrecy by many promises of future
carefulness
.
Mrs. Hartell's maternal instincts were
deadened. She listened with credulity to Adle;
and telling Lucy she had no more time to hear
her falsehoods, bade her leave the house
instantly
.
Poor Lucy embraced Eugene for the last time;
and, crying as heartily as he did, she unlocked
his arms from her neck, and gave him to Ophelia,
whispering an entreaty that she would watch over
him till her father's return. Ophelia answered by
a burst of tears and outcries against Adle; and
Lucy, begging her to be quiet, left the room. The
servants, who had heard through Ophelia the
explosion
in the nursery, gathered round her to
express
their sympathy and their detestation of
Adle. They all offered to speak a kind word for
her wherever she went. Lucy was comforted by
their good-will, and she left Mrs. Hartell's with a
composure that, in her circumstances, would seem
wonderful, did we not know the power of calm
endurance
in a soul conscious of integrity, and
therefore
stayed on God. I am sure I have done
right, she repeated to herself, I am sure my
mother will approve. I am sure the time will
come when nobody can make Charles feel like
blushing for me; and, more than all, I am sure that
God, who knows all, is my friend, so I ought
not
to
feel very unhappybut, oh, poor little Eugene!
and she brushed the fast-coming tears from her
eyes as she entered a shop to ask for a directory.
CHAPTER XVIII.
A NEW FRIEND.
Lucy
ran her eye over all the Hydes in the
directory
,
and selecting fortunately the right one, she
went to Hudson Square, and was admitted to one
of the fine houses that overlook St. John's Park.
She asked to speak with Mrs. Hyde, and was
shown into a large room on the second floor.
Mrs. Hyde looked up as she entered, and Lucy at
once recognised the intelligent and benevolent
countenance impressed on her memory. The
recognition was not mutual, for the lady, merely
saying, Sit down, my child, I am busy just now,
proceeded to look over an account-book, while a
girl of fourteen stood by anxiously awaiting the
result. Three of Mrs. Hyde's daughters sat by
the window, one reading aloud a book of travels,
one drawing, and another painting, and near them
a seamstress plying her needle, and listening and
enjoying with the rest. Two little girls of four
and six were sitting beside their mother, hemming
ruffles. We must do them very neatly, Grace,
said the youngest, for mamma says Mrs. Lux
will look at them with her spectacles; and besides,
mamma says it is a shame to do work badly for a
poor woman. Two boys were at a table with
maps and slates, and there seemed to be in this
hive but one unproductive labourer, a busy little
urchin, who, among other miscellaneous mischief,
let fall a glass, which luckily not breaking, the little
Pharisee exclaimed, Was not that careful?
This excited a general laugh, and even our poor
stranger's face relaxed into a smile, which the
little girls, glancing their eyes towards her, caught,
and one said in a low voice, but loud enough for
Lucy to hear, Don't she look sweet when she
smiles? and the other replied, Yes; but I
wonder what she has been crying so for? and
Lucy was relieved when Mrs. Hyde said, returning
the account-book to the girl in waiting, All is
right, Harrietgirls, give Harriet joy!
No, give Mrs. Hyde thanks, said Harriet;
I never could have got on if you had not kept
my courage up, Mrs. Hyde.
Ah, we can only help those who help
themselves
,
Harriet. What do you wish, my child?
to Lucy.
To speak alone with you, ma'am, replied
Lucy, in a tremulous voice, for the dread of asking
trust and employment from a stranger to whom she
must confess she was in disgrace, turned off as a
liar and thief, took possession of her. Mrs. Hyde
led the way to another apartment; when there,
Lucy's brow contracted and her lips quivered.
There is something irresistibly touching in the
distress of the young. We expect storms in
winter
,
but we shrink from the cloud that lowers over
the promise of early summer. What is the
matter, my child? asked Mrs. Hyde, so kindly
that tears came to Lucy's relief, and she was
imboldened
to say, You do not remember me,
ma'am?
No, I do not.
I never saw you but once, Mrs. Hyde, and that
was a great while ago, when I lived at Mrs.
Ardley's. Lucy paused, but Mrs. Hyde shook
her head, and Lucy proceeded to refer to the
conversation
that she had then heard, to the
circumstances
Mrs. Hyde had recounted, and occasionally
to the very words she had uttered, and finally
reminding her of her own exclamation, how
much like mother she does talk! she succeeded
in recalling the image of the little girl, whose
identity
,
though grown a head taller, she perceived.
The most accomplished flatterer could not have
devised a more ingenious mode of approach than
Lucy, in her simplicity, had adopted. I thought
then, ma'am, she resumed, that if ever I should
have to apply to a stranger for advice and help, I
should wish it were you.
But why is it necessary for you to come to a
stranger? You should have made friends before
this time of life.
I have friends, ma'am
real
friends, that I
could go to in any trouble, replied Lucy, her face
brightening with a just pride, but they are all a
great way offall, but one.
Why not go to that one?
I did not feel as if that would be best, ma'am,
she replied, casting down her eyes, and blushing
so deeply that Mrs. Hyde, pitying her
embarassment
,
told her to proceed with her story. Lucy
briefly sketched what the reader already knows:
her mother's troubles, her different service-places,
and finished by relating, fairly, every particular of
the unfortunate affair at Mrs. Hartell's. Mrs.
Hyde listened as a good judge listens to the
testimony
in the case of a prisoner arraigned before
him, anxious to get the truth, and leaning to a
merciful interpretation where it could not be fully
developed. But why, my child, she asked, if
you were conscious of innocence, did you object to
having your trunk opened?
After a little faltering, Lucy replied that there
was a picture on the top of her trunk she did not
wish seen.
A picture!of what? or whom?
Of that one friend, ma'am, I said I had in the
city.
And who is he?and how long have you
known him?
Ever since mother was in the deepest of her
troubles; he was the first person that was kind to
us, and he has been kind ever since.
But you do not tell me who this friend is.
Oh, Charles Lovett, ma'am.
Ah, I understand now; the son of those friends
you are so fond of? After a little more
questioning
,
cross-examination, and deliberation, Mrs. Hyde
asked Lucy if she had any letters from her mother
or from Mrs. Lovett; and finding she had, she said,
if Lucy would let her see them, and if they
corroborated
her statements, she would take her, for
the present, into her family. I will not, she
said, send to inquire your character at the places
where you lived so long ago. Suspicion might be
excited by your not having referred me to the last
place you was at.
That was just what I thought, ma'am; but I
did not suppose that anybody but mother and Mrs.
Lovett would have thought so for me. Lucy was
yet to know in Mrs. Hyde a Christian woman, one
to whom the wants of her fellow-creatures were
claims, and who judged and felt in their affairs as
if they were her own. To her might justly be
applied Wordsworth's beautiful description of the
man of Christian sympathy.
By nature turned
And constant disposition of his thoughts
To sympathy with man, he was alive
To all that was enjoyed where'er he went,
And all that was endured.
Mrs. Hyde saw in Lucy a young creature who,
if her story were true, and truth was stamped on
her countenance, was in most forlorn
circumstances
.
The simplicity of her manner and the
directness and consistency of her statements were
in her favour, and it seemed scarcely possible she
could be guilty of the complicated iniquity in which
a supposition of the falsehood of her story involved
her. At any rate, it was in conformity with Mrs.
Hyde's principles and experience to hope all
things of the young; and, true to her theory, she
sent to Mrs. Hartell's for Lucy's trunk. When
that came she examined Mrs. Lovett's and Mrs.
Lee's letters sufficiently to corroborate Lucy's
statement, and then she permitted her to enter upon
the duties of her new situation. A previous duty,
however, she performed. I cannot, she said to
Mrs. Hyde, rest easy a minute without writing
to Mr. Hartell about the danger poor little Eugene
is in. If you only knew what a sweet little fellow
he is, Mrs. Hyde!
No child, Lucy, should be left in the hands of
such a person as you describe that nurse. Write
yourself to Mr. Hartell at Richmond. Tell your
own story. I will add a postscript. Perhaps he
may yet ferret out the truth for you.
Perhaps so, Mrs. Hyde; but it's little Eugene
that I am anxious about. My conscience is clear,
and that is comfort enough for me.
The girl has the true secret of
comfort
,
thought Mrs. Hyde. As this is a broken day,
Lucy, she said, and I want you to get all
troubles off your mind, let us send for that `one
friend' of yours, and acquaint him with your change
of place. Lucy, at first, feared he would be
instigated
by the injustice she had suffered to some
rash act; but the desire to communicate her good
and evil fortune controlled her; and, with many
thanks, she assented to Mrs. Hyde's proposal.
Charles instantly answered to the summons, and in
an hour's time had heard the whole story from
Lucy's lips; and, with the impetuous resentment
natural to his age, had vowed that he would go
instantly to Mrs. Hartell'sthat he would shoot
Adle if she did not tell the whole truthyes, he
would blow her up sky-high. Lucy, after a while,
convinced him that though this mode of proceeding
might punish Adle, it would not establish her
innocence
,
nor extricate her from the labyrinth in
which Adle's arts had involved her. He still
insisted
that he could not go quietly back to his work
while she was lying under such an imputation.
Why, Lucy, he said, I positively had rather
walk the fiery furnace with Shadrac, Meshac, and
Abednego.
Oh, don't talk soplease, Charles.
It is foolish and wrong, I know, when you are
really the one in the furnace; but then it does not
even scorch you, for your conscience is like the
angel that walked with those men, while mine,
Lucy, will torment me if I go quietly about my
business just as if nothing had happened. Am I
not, Lucy, the only protector you have in the city,
besides being youryouryouronly friend,
Lucy?
No, Charles, not my only one. It would be
wrong to say so, when I have found such a friend
as Mrs. Hyde. Leave all to herplease, Charles.
Charles at first flatly refused, urging that Mrs.
Hyde did not know Lucy enough to judge in the
matter; but at last, subdued by Lucy's gentle
entreaties
,
he yielded, though declaring it was
deused hard; and, in compliance with Mrs. Hyde's
advice, he promised to remain passive till Mr.
Hartell's
return.
Q
CHAPTER XIX.
A HAPPY FAMILY.
Mr. Hyde
, one of the wealthy and busy
merchants
of the city of New-York, was happy in the
confidence, resulting from long experience, that his
home was regulated in the best manner without
his interference or supervision. In all important
matters, such as the proper amount of their annual
expenses, the destiny of their children in life, their
religious, moral, and intellectual education, the father
and mother consulted and co-operated. In his
pecuniary
affairs Mr. Hyde had no secrets from his
wife. He did not cautiously hide from her his
successes, and pour into her troubled ear his losses
and disappointments, nor did he show only the
bright side, and conceal every rising cloud, as if
she were as weak as a sick child, till the storm
burst on her unprepared head, but she was made
perfectly acquainted with his affairs, and conformed
her expenditures thereto. She kept her accounts
accurately. Within the limits she prescribed to
herself she expended liberally, acting nobly up to
that truth which most admit, that in our country
there are manifold reasons against, and none for,
accumulating
fortunes
for children. She never
disturbed her husband with the details of her
domestic
economy. She never bothered him with
complaints of her servants, with consultations about
her table, her furniture, or her childrens' dress; all
these matters she arranged, and he enjoyed the
results. We would not imply that all husbands
who do not adopt this system of noninterference,
and who do not act up to the spirit of a
confidential
and equal matrimonial partnership, are in fault.
We acknowledge, with sorrow and humiliation,
that there are many wives not capable of acting
well their part in their own sphere, and that
few deserve the unqualified confidence Mrs. Hyde
had painfully earned by her self-education. But
since the discovery is made that a woman is
capable
of something besides praying, loving, sewing,
and spinning, or, to cite Molire's own words, that
it is
not
enough
Pour elle  vous en bien parler
,
De savoir prier Dieu, m'aimer coudre et filer
;
her talents should be cultivated with reference to
her whole domestic duty.
[11]
[11]
Talents, says Sir James McIntosh, are the habitual
powers of execution.
It is as consummate
a folly to permit an
American
girl to grow up
ignorant
of household affairs, as it would be to omit
mathematics in the education of an astronomer,
or the use of the needle in the training of a milliner.
But, leaving our theory to the consideration of
mothers, we proceed to the homely details of Mrs.
Hyde's housewifery. This lady had now been
married seventeen years. Her eldest daughter
was sixteen, her youngest less than a year. After
the four years of her novitiate, she has rarely
changed her domestics, preferring (we quote the
words of an admirable mistress of a family) the
trouble of dismissing her servants' faults to the pain
and manifold disadvantage of dismissing them.
She bore in mind that they were the weak and
neglected children of the great family, doomed by
circumstances to be wanderers and aliens, and
subject to wrong biases and bad influences. She
was patient and long suffering with them, willing
to forbear, to toil, and wait, if, in the touching
language
of Scripture, she might thereby save a
brother.
About the time of Lucy's entrance into the
family
,
there had been a general change of
operatives
,
and none of those long proved remained save
Clara Lane, better known by her alias of
mammy
.
Davis, Mrs. Hyde's man, had served her for
fourteen years, and continued to perform his
humble
duties accurately, after the avails of his industry,
fortunately invested by Mr. Hyde, amounted to
three thousand dollars.
[12]
[12]
As I wish to avoid the imputation of exaggeration, I venture
to state a corresponding fact in the family of a gentleman, by
birth, education, and station one of the first men in
Massachusetts
.
I chanced to be dining at his house, when he said to his
wife (we had just returned from a drive to Mount Auburn),
How do you like your new horses? Mine!you surely
have not bought them?we do not want them. No, not
exactly, but Horace (the coachman) took such a fancy to
them I could not deny him. On making some inquiries about
the domestic thus indulged, I found he had served the family
some twenty years; that he was worth between 6 and 7,000
dollars
;
that he was a colonel in the militia; and that, at public
dinners in Boston on gala days, he took precedence of his
employer
and his employer's son, both men of the first consideration
in the city. He waited at table with perfect respectfulness and
propriety. Of course his attachment to the family alone
retained
him in their service. Is not this instance worth a volume
of speculation upon the possible happiness of domestic service,
and the exercise of the virtues in the relation of employers and
employed?
We trespass so far upon private correspondence as to insert
here a tribute to American domestics, contained in a letter
written
by Mrs. Butler after her recent departure for England. I
left all my own household
crying
, and entreating to return to me
whenever I returned; and do you know my heart smote me so
dreadfully for what I had said about American servants, that I
felt as if I must turn round on the threshold of my own door and
beg all their pardons. It must be remembered to the honour
of employer and employed in this case, that attachment, and not
necessity, was the bond. Mrs. Butler's domestics could
probably
command fifty places on the day they left her house. Mrs.
Butler's compunction was more generous than just, for, in her
much-abused journal, she has given an unqualified testimony to
the truth and integrity of American servants.
Then his attachment to the Hydes being
mastered
by a long-ripening attachment to Mrs. Hyde's
seamstress, he married, and removed to the land of
promisethe indefinite
West
. Mrs. Hyde's cook,
a worthy maiden of fifty, and most accomplished
in her art, having succeeded to an inheritance of
some half dozen nieces, was advised by her
mistress
to set up a pastry-cook's establishment. The
young girl whose book of accounts Mrs. Hyde
was overlooking at the moment of Lucy's
introduction
was one of the aforesaid nieces, whom Mrs.
Hyde had rescued from a drunken father some
years before, and who had recently been qualified
for bookkeeper to her aunt by Ella Hyde's
instructions
.
The chambermaid had achieved the
usual destiny of our countrywomen, had married,
and (unlike most persons in her condition) had
completely furnished a snug little house from her
savings, besides reserving something against a wet
day. Now all these virtues and prosperity, to be
transmitted and spread in widening circles, were,
Q 2
for the most part, the result of the fidelity of one
mistress of a family!
Before Lucy retired for the night, Mrs. Hyde
took her aside to give her the necessary
instructions
.
Are you an early riser, my child? she
asked.
I have not been of late, ma'amI used to be;
but I find what mother said is trueit takes a
great while to form good habits, and a very little
while to fall into bad ones.
You will find, too, that it is not difficult to
recover
good habits once formed. In the mean time
my daughter Susan will call you.
Your daughter, ma'am!do your young ladies
rise as early as the servants?
Yesoften earlier. Time, you know, Lucy,
is most precious to those who make the best use
of it. I do not like to see one minute wasted,
and least of all by my children.
I always thought, ma'am, that young ladies
must have more sleep than servants.
No, replied Mrs. Hyde, smiling; I believe
that young persons who live in one part of the
house require just as much sleep as young persons
who live in another part of it. In those families
where there are idle members and working
members
,
the workers, of course, require most.
Ma'am! said Lucy, in a sort of maze. We
believe that Lucy's surprise was owing to her very
limited experience; but certainly, in the three
wealthy families in which she had lived, she had
never seen a practical acknowledgment that all the
members were governed by the same physical
laws. I mean, Lucy, resumed Mrs. Hyde,
that all my family must have as much sleep as
their constitutions require, and no more. It is a
kind of suicide to allow more time than is
necessary
to sleep. When you are up, Lucy, do you
not wish, before you begin your day's work, a little
time to yourself?
I always had it, ma'am, when I lived at home
and at Mrs. Lovett's; but no one else that I have
lived with ever spoke to me about it, or seemed to
remember that a servant might want time to say
her prayers.
Have you lived without them, then?
Indeed I have not, Mrs. Hyde. Mother
always
told us that the heart can rise to God in
prayer at any time, just as a little child, when it
is in the room with its mother, whatever happens,
turns its eyes to her. Sometimes in the thickest
of my work, and always when I feel either very
glad or very sorry Lucy paused, and a blush
overspread her cheek; she was abashed at the
thought of how freely she, who had never spoken
on such subjects but to her mother, was confiding
her spiritual experience. Go on, my child,
said Mrs. Hyde, with a smile so sweet and kind
that Lucy forgot everything but that she was
talking
to one who listened with interest. I was
only going to say, ma'am, that I could always pray,
even at Mrs. Hartell's, where there was no
outward
sign there was a Godexcept little Eugene,
and he seemed to me just like an angel from heaven;
and I felt sometimes, when his head lay on my
bosom, as if we were worshipping together.
Oh, how much better is this true worship,
thought Mrs. Hyde, than formal prayers and set
days. Maintain this spirit, my dear child, she
replied; this is praying without ceasing. Take
a few moments before you leave your room to
consider
your duty to God and your duties in the
family
.
A sense of our responsibility to God will
make us faithful in the discharge of our duties to
one another. I try to make all who live with me
feel that they are working for something besides
the wages I pay themfor something higher than
my favourfar better than my affectionfor the
love of God. In this service we are all
fellow-workers
and fellow-servants. Is not this a bond
strong enough to bind us all together, Lucy?
Oh, yes, ma'am! Lucy wiped away the
tears that poured over her cheeks. If mother
only knew what a place I am in now, I should be
willing she should know all my troubles.
Wait, Lucy, till you have tried usyou young
people are apt to take anticipations for experience.
But I am getting on slowly in my instructions to
you. You will have the waiter's work to do till
my new waiter comes. One thing will perhaps
be new to you in my house, Lucy. I do not
confine
any person to a single department, and I will
tell you why; for I find, if the reason of my
arrangements
is understood, they are apt to be better liked.
In the first place, I wish my domestics to remain
with me as long as it is for our mutual welfare to
live together. I have observed that the jealousies
and bickerings among domestics often arise from
disputes about their work. One says, this is not
my work; and another, that is not mine; and Mary
imposes, and Biddy shirks. Now I wish each one
to be capable of performing the duty of the other,
and to have that spirit of kindness that she will be
willing to do it, and sure that the favour will be
returned. And besides, Lucy, if a woman spends
years in nothing but cooking, when she has a
family of her own how will she know how to take
care of her house, take care of her children, make
their clothes, &c.? or, if she spends ten years in
the nursery, she will not know how to cook her
husband's dinner. My girls all get married after a
while; and I wish that, while they are serving me,
they should have that sort of education that will
enable them to make their own homes prosperous
and happy.
That's very kind of you, ma'ambut does not
changing works so make a great deal of
confusion
?
No confusion arises, Lucy, from your being
my chambermaid this summer and my seamstress
next winterto be sure, I must teach you to sew
well, but the next year that will prove a great gain
to us both. No, Lucy, confusion in families arises
from ignorance, bad temper, jealousy, and
disobligingness
;
never, I believe, from being well qualified
to perform any office, and willing to serve in it.
[13]
[13]
In those countries where the whole life is passed in
servitude
,
the principle of a division of labour is not so objectionable.
It is certainly most convenient to the employer. He who
devotes
all his mind and the whole of his life to making the hinges
of a watch will make them more accurately than he who
constructs
the whole watch. But if by any chance the hingemaker
is ejected from that department, he is good for nothing. An
accomplished
English servant is always found inferior for the
service
of an American family to a well-brought up American
domestic
,
whose faculties are thoroughly developed by our
miscellaneous
service.
I am sure you will find me willing, Mrs. Hyde,
and it will be my fault if I do not become capable.
Who shall I ask to show me where to find the
breakfast things, ma'am?
It is Susan's turn this week to see to such
matters. You will have everything ready at half
past seven precisely. Susan will show you how
to arrange the breakfast-room.
Miss Susan, ma'am!is not that the young
lady who was taking the French lesson?
Yes.
She show me, Mrs. Hyde! she does not seem
older than Miss Ophelia Hartell.
Susan is past nine.
And Miss Ophelia is ten. What a difference!
Lucy did not explain further, nor did Mrs. Hyde
inquire. Poor Ophelia's operative faculties were
as undeveloped as a child's born without hands.
When you go up to bed, Lucy, resumed Mrs.
Hyde, take a pail of water with you. You will
find all conveniences for washing. Wash yourself
from head to foot. This I require of all persons
under my control at least once in twenty-four
hours; it will contribute to your health, and in a
little while you will find it essential to your
comfort
.
She then commended Lucy's very neat
arrangement
of her hair, and enjoined particular
attention
to her teeth; and Lucy, all astonishment at
this maternal interest, was reminded of Mrs.
Broadson
having on a certain occasion said to her, A
fine pass things have come to when even servants
must brush their teethwhy, I had never heard of
a toothbrush at your age!!
She seems just as kind as mother, or Mrs.
Lovett, thought Lucy, as Mrs. Hyde bade her
good-night; and, grateful for the storm that had
driven her into such a harbour, she retired to her
sleeping apartment. This she shared with Martha,
the chambermaid. They had separate beds. A
portable screen divided the room into two parts,
securing to each, if desired, privacy. Martha,
having had sole possession for three or four weeks,
seemed to feel it her part to do the hospitalities of
the apartment. She was, as is obvious, an
American
.
Here, she said, is a tub to wash you,
and plenty of nice soap. Mrs. Hyde is the most
musical
woman about washing, and the whole
family
are like ducksbut every one has notions!
Here is a large closet, with shelves and drawers
no locksand there's none on their own! You
must keep your things in their places; for, when
you least expect it, Mrs. Hyde or one of the girls
goes the rounds, and everything is put in a heap in
the second story entry. I tell you I felt beat when
I found my flannel petticoat there beside one of
the little ladies best bonnets! Is not it a pretty
room? this nice matting is so easy to keep clean,
and blinds, and as good mattresses as any lady
could wish, and everything so tidy about the beds,
and a looking-glass that don't make you look as if
your face was all agee; and only see here! she
added, withdrawing a little green curtain, see
this shelf of books; not the Bible only, but a whole
row, to instruct and entertain you tooand, what is
more, she loves to have you get time to enjoy
yourself
reading; and the long and the short of it is, that
she and all her children seem to have a realizing
sense that their help have minds and hearts as well
as they. I have lived in a great many places, and
with good people that behaved, some of them, I am
free to own it, handsomer to me than I did to them;
but never did I see a family I respected as I do
Mr. Hyde's. It makes you feel like folks to have
such a room as this, instead of a little stived up
place, with just a nail here and there to hang your
gowns on, broken chairs, a tottering table, and a
bed that looks and feels any how. Such things
show which way the wind blows; what rich folks
think of poor folks. The ladies' rooms will be
fixed off with everything, wardrobes, bureaus,
dressing-tables
,
sofas, lounges, looking-glasses of all
shapes and sizes, curtains, and piles of mattresses,
perfumes enough to strangle you, and all sorts of
notions that have no use but just to be taken care
of and make work for ussomething of a contrast
to our sky-rooms! It gives one thoughts to think
of it, and feelings too. Times are changed. It's
no longer lords and ladies in the parlour, and slaves
in the kitchen; but it's a kind of partnership
concern
,
and in this family your share is fairly divided
out to you; and I freely own, that if I could stay
here, I should be contented to be help all my life.
Contented and most thankful, I should think,
said Lucy, availing herself of Martha's very first
pause to express her sentiment.
Why, yes, kind o' and kind o' not thankful,
that, if you must live out, you live in such a place;
but not thankful that you have not a home of your
own
home is home
, and we always hanker after it;
but contentedyesquite contented. How long
Martha's garrulity might have led her on
expressing
,
in her homely way, her not very dim
perceptions
of the present modification of the relation
between
employers and employed, we know not, for
her harangue was cut short by Lucy's adverting to
her vigil of the preceding night; and both, after
duly honouring Mrs. Hyde's
notions
by performing
the prescribed ablutions, retired to bed.
CHAPTER XX.
A DAY AT MRS. HYDE'S.
Wake
up, Lucy! said a kindly voice, and
Lucy opened her eyes, and saw Susan Hyde at
her bedside wrapped in her little dressing-gown.
Mamma told me to wake you as soon as I was
up. By the time you are dressed I shall be ready
to show you about the breakfast.
I am sorry, said Lucy, when they afterward
went down stairs together, to give you this
trouble
,
but I trust once showing will serve.
Oh! it's no trouble at all. We children have
had it all to do ever since Davis was married, three
weeks ago. The only disagreeable thing is asking
Violet, our new cook, to help bring in the table
she is always so cross in the morning.
I should not think your mother would keep her
if she is so cross to you.
Mercy! Mamma never sends away anybody
for one faultat least, not till she has tried, and
we have all tried, our best to cure it. When we
children get provoked, mamma reminds us of what
R
some good man says, that
perfection bears with
imperfection
,
and she says she fears we have a great
many faults ourselves that we are so impatient
with othersand that makes us a
little
ashamed
[14]
[14]
A successful case of forbearance with a very serious fault
occurred in the family of a lady most exemplary in her relation
to her domestics. She met her cook coming from the
storeroom
with her apron full of pilfered tea. After a long
conversation
with the woman, in which she was made to feel her sin
and folly, her mistress offered to retain her in her service, to
keep her trespass a secret, and to trust her as usual. This she
did. The woman continued to live with her for a long time, and
served her most faithfully and gratefully.
take care, Lucyyou have not got the
crumb-cloth
quite straightmamma's eyes are just like a
plumb-linethat will do. Now ask Violetplease
to help you in with the table. Lucy made the
request in the humblest manner; but it was
before
breakfast
with poor Violet, and she was possessed
by the demon of dyspepsy, who does not always
spare the humble, though his visitations be chiefly
to the exalted. She came up stairs grumbling,
I sha'n't stay here if they don't get a manit's
not my work to lug in the tableI wonder what
it's dragged out for?to have me drag it in, I
suppose
.
I am very sorry to trouble you, said Lucy,
but it is Mrs. Hyde's order that the table shall
not be lifted by one alone.
Oh, I dare sayit's easy giving orders.
Don't you feel as well as usual this morning,
Violet? asked Susan.
I feel well enough.
Oh! stop a minute, Violet, called a little girl
who was coming down stairs with a bottle and
glass in her hand.
What's wanted
now?
barked out Violet.
Nothing, replied little Grace, taken aback,
only mamma sent you down a glass of Congress
water, and says, if you will try it every morning
for two or three weeks, she thinks it will make you
as pleasant as anybody.
Violet's colour mounted to the roots of her hair.
Why, Gracie! exclaimed Susan, I am sure
mamma did not say that.
Poor Grace replied, somewhat fluttered, Well,
Susan, she said thatthat is, she saidI mean
oh, I don't know what she saidonly she
meant
, if
Violet was as well, she would be as good-natured
as any of us. Violet's irritability, which was
really merely symptomatic, was overcome by this
view of the case; she was the first to smile, and,
having drank the water, she thanked the little
cupbearer
,
and bade her thank her mother, in so
changed a tone, that one might have fancied the
water had the miraculous virtue of that prescribed
by the prophet.
When Mrs. Hyde appeared she bestowed a kind
word of approbation on Lucy for the prime order
in which she found everything. Lucy transferred
the praise to Susan, who, she said, understood a
waiter's work as well as if she were brought up to
it. Mrs. Hyde's children were brought up to
all the details of housewifery. Before breakfast
the family, every member of it, assembled and
joined in a common supplication and a common
thanksgiving to the Father of all.
During the meal, which was not hurried, as if the
only reason for meeting round the table were to
consume the food and enjoy
that
, Susan told her
father some interesting particulars she had heard
from a country lady of the best mode of rearing
and taking care of silkworms, and how much finer
and more plentiful the silk was if the worm was
well fed, and kept clean and healthy. And don't
you think, papa, said little Grace, she got to
love themlove a wormwasn't that funny?
No, interposed Susan; for how often has
papa told us we should love anything we took
good
care of.
Well, then, Sue, I guess that is the reason
mammy loves us so wellshe takes such
good
care of us.
You have guessed pretty right, Grace, said
her father, smiling at her modest explanation of
her mammy's tenderness; but can you tell me,
Susan, who first found out a mode of unwinding
the silk from the cocoon? No, sir. Can
you, Gifford? No, sir. Can you, Ella?
No, sir. Nor you, mamma? No, sir. A
smile went round with the negative, and as Mrs.
Hyde pronounced hers, her eye met Lucy's. She
saw the girl was listening with lively interest, that
her lips moved as if she were on the point of
speaking
,
but were restrained by modesty. Do you
know, Lucy? she asked. Instead of the
monosyllable
she expected, Lucy answered, diffidently,
I believe, ma'am, it was an Empress of China
called Lou-it-see.
[15]
[15]
Raynal states that Lou-it-see was made a divinity for her
great discovery, and called the spirit of the mulberry and
silkworm
.
Why, who told
you
, Lucy? asked Grace.
Lucy said nothing till Mr. Hyde authorized a reply
by asking where she had learned the fact. She
said her mother was trying to have her brother
learn to take care of silkworms, and that, seeing
the advertisement of a book about them, she had
purchased and read it before she sent it. There's
an example for you, my children, said Mr. Hyde;
you see that, by keeping your eyes and ears open,
you may get knowledge on every hand, and
communicate
it. He then proceeded to state some
facts in relation to the varieties of the worm and
the mulberry, the extent and value of the silk
product
,
and the immense amount of our importation
of the manufactured article. Lucy was better
qualified by her early education than most persons
in her position to profit by such a conversation,
and it seemed to her a great privilege to have the
place of waiter in such a family.
[16]
[16]
There is a volume of poems about to issue from the press
in this city, written by a person whose life has been spent in
domestic
service. Upon some one expressing to the author
surprise
at the knowledge indicated by the poems, and asking
where she obtained it, she replied, I have always lived in the
society of intelligent and cultivated people. And so she had.
Some of these poems would not dishonour
any name
in our land.
We trust their publication will increase the consideration of the
fortunate
for their inferiors only in position.
She naturally
compared the scene before her to corresponding
ones; to the tte--tte breakfast at the
Broadsons'
,
where the steril talk, on the part of the
husband, was of profits projected or achieved; on
the part of his helpmate, a boast of a
bargain
, a
pharisaical vaunt, or some improved plan of
stinting
in domestic economy. The Ardleys did not
suffer so much by the comparison, for there were
the redeeming qualities of good-humour and kind
R 2
ness, and there the children's chattering, and
mamma's
and papa's talk of the ball that was last
evening
,
and the dinner that was to be to-morrow, and
the new dress this lady wore, and the new horses
that gentleman drove, weresomething better than
nothing. At the Hartells' there was worse than a
total loss of this immensely powerful engine in
domestic education, the family meeting at the
social
board, for there the children were abandoned
to the vitiating influence of unprincipled servants;
the father hurried down his coffee to escape as
early as possible from the conjugal atmosphere;
and the wife, at ten or eleven, dawdled alone and
in vacuity over her distasteful breakfast. At the
Simsons' there was simply the gratification of
hungry healthy animals. To the Lovetts, the
dear Lovetts
, Lucy recurred with pride and joy.
There she had seen, under a more homely aspect,
the same intelligence and goodness manifest in
the interchange of domestic offices, and in
imagination
shebut we will not betray her; what girl
or woman does not construct a home for herself,
and weave her own golden fabric of domestic joys?
After breakfast Lucy proceeded to the duties of
her new place, instructed, whenever she needed
instruction, by her little directress Susan, who,
like the divinities of the ancient fable, interposed
at the moment of necessity, and then returned to
her own element.
[17]
[17]
Some may doubt the competency of a child, not ten years
old, to perform the tasks assigned to Susan. We have lately
seen a girl not ten, the daughter of a Polish exile, who seven
years ago lived not only in affluence, but luxury, the sole nurse
of her mother through a lying-in, and performing the duty well,
besides accomplishing various other domestic services. When
some astonishment was expressed to the mother, Ah! she
replied, necessity is a great teacher!
As we have said, Lucy entered Mrs. Hyde's
family at the moment of a general change of the
officers of her household; of course, the domestic
machine did not work without some trifling
impediments
and jars. Martha, asked Mrs. Hyde,
have you any objection to changing works with
Violet for a few weeks? Martha did not appear
to comprehend. You know I stipulated that you
were to change works whenever I requested you.
Oh, yes, ma'amI calculated to be obliging,
and so forth, whenever any of the folks are sick,
and so onbut as to taking up cooking for a
business
I
can't cook anything but boiled victuals
mother couldfather used to say she beat all at a
potpie and a roaster.
Mrs. Hyde smiled at this vaunt of the mother's
skill in what our rustic folk consider the ne plus
ultra of the culinary art. I dare say, Martha,
she resumed, your father thought a great deal of
your mother for her skill in these matters; and
would you not like to increase your value in some
good fellow's eyes by understanding thoroughly
plain cooking? If you mean to have a home of
your own one of these days, Martha, it will be for
your advantage, as well as for mine and Violet's,
that you should go into the kitchen for a month or
soof course you take the cook's wages, and she
yours. Mrs. Hyde had touched the right spring.
No American girl's perspective is without a home
and a good husband, and Martha, after premising
that she should spoil everything she touched,
consented
.
Thank you, Martha, said Mrs. Hyde,
I trust you will spoil nothing. Our every-day
dinner is a simple affairto-day boiled fowls, a
tongue, a beefsteak, potatoes, turnips, and a rice
pudding. My daughter Ella will give you all
necessary
assistance and directions;
observe
them
to-day, and
remember
them to-morrow, Martha.
Martha promised to do her best, and performed her
promise, but her
best
had many imperfections.
She was careless, prodigal, and talkative, but she
had the sterling qualities of truth, honesty,
capacity
,
and attachableness; and, after a thorough trial
of the patience of her instructer and of the
consumers
of her productions, and after much
discouragement
,
some tears, and a little fretting on her part, she
acquired the art of cooking skilfully, neatly, and
frugally
,
and felt that she had gained knowledge which
would be wealth to her. We give her own view
of the case in one of her gossipings with Lucy
some months after. I declare, Lucy, I would
not, if the silver money were offered to me, take a
thousand dollars for what I have learned since I
came to this house. At first I could not feel
reconciled
to chopping and changing works; but
when I came to realize it was for our advantage, I
felt different, for it would be a sight easier for Mrs.
Hyde to let us go round and round in the mill just
as we were used to. It's so seldom ladies think
of anything but their own profit, that it makes us
kind o' jealous. When I came here I did not know
how to do anything well but chamber-work, and
now I would not turn my back upon the king for
any kind of plain cooking, or making broths and
gruels, and such things for sick folks, or any kind
of housework, and sewing, patching, and darning
into the bargain.
But, Martha, you have not made the progress
with your needle that Biddy has.
La, noI guess notbecause I had the start
of her at firstMiss Amy had to begin at the
beginning
with her; she did not know any more
about handling a needle than you do about sailing
a ship. Never did I see anything like Miss Amy's
patience. She was copying that
pictur
of the
Virgin Mary, and she would lay down her brushes
without a wry look, and show Biddy how to fix on
her patch, and, by the time her brush was going
again, Biddy would get it all askew. She does it
by plummet and rule now, but she is the first Irish
person I ever saw that could put a patch on straight,
which shows it's all in teachingthey an't stupid,
but they an't privileged to use their faculties when
they are young.
Miss Amy is a beautiful seamstress, said
Lucy; she even excels my mother.
Oh, they all beat all! resumed Martha. I
don't mind our folks speaking all sorts of outlandish
lingos, and painting, and playing on the
piany
, and
so fortha great many ladies that are of no use in
the worldwhat you may call mere ornamental
furniture, can do that; but what I respect them
for is their understanding business, so that, if Mr.
Hyde were to break to-morrow, they would be as
independent as I am.
Some may smile at Martha's opinion that fortune
and mere accomplishments made an accidental
elevation, but we get the most accurate knowledge
of life by viewing it from every position. Lucy
took another view. I respect them too, Martha,
she said, for what you do, but I love them for
being so kind to everybodynot only do they treat
us as if we belonged to them, but there is not one,
even down to Gracie, that is not teaching some
poor ignorant creature something. Did you ever
see anything prettier than Gracie teaching English
to those little German children, that they have
saved from destruction, as it were? If every
family
were like this, there would be an end to poverty
and misery.
That's the Millennium, child! One swallow
don't make a summer.
But we are anticipating. Violet's co-operation
was essential to the execution of Mrs. Hyde's plan
for the general good. She, like all English
servants
,
had been trained to one department of labour;
she had the suspicion common to foreign servants
(does it arise from experience?) that her employer
would impose on her, and she was anxious to
obtain
the highest wages, being apprehensive, from
the state of her health, that she should soon be cut
off from all labour. But, after a long conversation
with Mrs. Hyde, she was convinced that that lady
had no sinister motivesthat she sacrificed present
convenience to the future advantage of both
employers
and employed, and she gratefully accepted
the opportunity of trying the effect upon her health
of a removal from the heat and steam of the kitchen.
Mrs. Hyde did not hire her domestics for a
month or a season, and therefore she could make
a present sacrifice for a prospective good. Neither
did she expect to retain them always. She knew
that, in this country, where avenues for progress
are open on every side, there must be changes, and
one of her objects was to qualify those she em
ployed for the happier condition that probably
awaited themto be the masters and mistresses of
independent homes.
[18]
[18]
One of those skilful housewives, who have the
luck
of
having
good domestics, said to me, My only trouble is that my
girls will get married.
In short, that axiom of
political
economy, whose illustration should be the
object
of all government, was the rule of hers, the
greatest happiness of the greatest number.
A family fte concluded Lucy's first day at Mrs.
Hyde's. It chanced to be Clara Lane's (mammy's)
birthday. Clara had lived with Mrs. Hyde from
the time of her marriage. She had taken care of
all her children, from her firstborn to the youngling
of the flockthe present little pet and idol of the
house. Mammy had knit herself to the hearts of
the children. She had watched them by night
and by day through the diseases of childhood.
She had been patient and gentle in all their
impatience
and irritability. She had overcome their
little selfishnesses by the example of her generosity
and self-denial. She had shown to all a steady
and equal kindness; in short, she had been a second
mother to them. And on her part she had been
cared for, refreshed when wearied, nursed when
sick, and, when in health, her comfort and
gratification
studied; so that, though now declining from
middle life, so far from being used up, like most
of those who have spent a life in the service of
children, she was vigorous and cheerful, and
looking
forward to a tranquil old age, when the young
plants she had trained should succour and shelter
her. This was her birthday, and Mrs. Hyde hav
ing asked her to invite her friends to tea, the little
girls busied themselves in preparing the nursery
for their reception. Each brought some little
favourite
embellishment, shells, pictures, &c., from
her own apartment to deck mammy's.
Susan was mistress of ceremonies, and little
Grace, and Kate, a child of five years, her
ministers
.
They served the tea, and in due time
tastefully
arranged a supper-table, on the middle of
which they placed a vase of flowers culled for the
occasion from their own cherished plants. When
the fruit, &c., was served, little Kate stole up to
Miss Lane with a plate covered by her silk apron;
and throwing off this screen, and looking archly
from the brightest, most mischievous eyes, No
chicken-salad, no oranges, no grapes for naughty
mammy! she said, and presented her a
breast-pin
enclosing the interwoven hair of the children.
Before mammy could speak or dash off the tear
that trembled in her eye, Susan, holding the
smiling
baby in her arms, repeated the following lines
composed by her sister.
Come Susy, Grace, Jeanie, come Kitty, I say,
And wish your dear mammy a happy birthday:
Come Willie, yes, sweet little baby, come too,
And crow to your mammy a loving `a-goo!'
We have braided and set in a rim of bright gold,
The hair that you've comb'd and you've curl'd times
untold;
'Tis but a small proof of the love that we bear
To her who has watch'd us with unceasing care.
[19]
[19]
These simple lines were written and presented on a
similar
occasion by a girl of twelve years.
CHAPTER XXI.
TRUTH WILL PREVAIL.
Lucy
, in her new sphere, which she felt to
be a high and happy one, was daily acquiring
knowledge in the domestic arts, and daily gaining
on the faults she had contracted in her various
service-places
.
Never was there an eye more
vigilant
than Mrs. Hyde's; never a quicker perception
of the faults of those of whom she had the
supervision
.
But hers was the keen perception of the
parent, and the admonition that followed it was
gentle; for, in imitation of Him whom she served,
love was her motive and reformation her object.
Lucy received long letters from her mother,
assuring
her of her welfare, telling her that her
sisters
were well placed, and that Jemmie was
profiting
by her remittances. We insert a postscript
written by himself. The first letter that ever I
write, I long ago said should be to dear,
dear
Lucy;
and here it is. Can you read it? It's pretty
crooked
,
but that is because my hand trembles, thinking
I am writing to you. Dear Lucy, do leave off
working, and come here to live. The money you
have sent me is enough to pay my master a whole
year, and by that time, he says, I shall write and
cipher as well as anybody. When I think of
what you are doing for me, I try so hard to improve
that my heart beats like a drum, and then mother
S
stops me. Oh, it is so beautiful here, Lucy; you
can see so much sky, clear from mountain to
mountain. Sometimes the girls draw me along
the river bank, and we stop under the willows and
talk of you and Charlie. Give my best love to
Charlie, and tell him I dreamedthen followed
two effaced linesmother has blotted over this,
because she says you would not like to tell him;
so good-by, dear Lucy.
So happy was Lucy, that she would scarcely
have remembered the miserable affair at Mrs.
Hartell's, if Charles had not called daily to ask if
she had heard nothing more from that infamous
wretch, the gentlest name he vouchsafed Adle;
and each day she repeated her entreaties that he
would be more patient, and wait till sufficient time
had elapsed for Mr. Hartell's return; if justice is
not done you then, Lucy, don't preach patience
to me any longer, said Charles; patience may be
very Christian in you, but in my opinion it's very
poltronish
in me, besides being impossible. Well,
wait, Charles, till to-morrow, Lucy replied to his
last outbreak; Mrs. Hyde says it is possible Mr.
Hartell may be here to-morrow. The next
morning
,
at dawn, Mrs. Hyde's door-bell was rung
violently
,
and a message came to Lucy, entreating her
to go immediately to Mr. Hartell's, for Eugene
was dying; when she entered Mrs. Hartell's
nursery
,
she found Eugene in his father's arms in a
deathlike stupor. Mr. Hartell, half distracted, was
walking up and down the room. The physician,
who had done all his art could do, was anxiously
watching the child's rigid features. Mrs. Hartell
was wrapped in her shawl, shivering and sighing,
and Adle wringing her hands, crying violently, and
exclaiming at every breath,
Mon Dieu! mon Dieu!
Dieu me pardonne! pauvre enfant! Ah, mon
Dieu, que j'etois morte
.
God forgive me, poor child!
would that I were dead!
Lucy gazed around her
in grief and amazement. No one seemed to see her,
till Ophelia, looking up from the apron in which she
had buried her face, ran to her, sobbing, Oh,
Lucy! I and papa sent for you; he came home
about an hour ago, and came right into the nursery
to see Eugene, for ever since he got your letterhe
got a letter from you, Lucyhe thought he never
should see him again; and don't you think he found
him going into a fit, and Adle asleep, and the vial
of laudanum standing there on the table! Only
think! he has thrown up once, and the doctor says,
if he can only be roused again, but, oh dear! oh
dear! see how he lies in papa's arms. Lucy
threw aside her cloak and bonnet, and went up
to Mr. Hartell. Pray, sir, she said, let me
speak to him.
God bless you, Lucy, is it you? Oh, my boy,
Lucy! he's going!
Eugene! darling Eugene! cried Lucy,
kissing
his lips; Eugene, don't you know me? The
voice penetrated to the little fellow's spirit. He
opened his eyes; a faint ray of joy shot through
his heart and eyes; he made a feeble effort to
extend his hands. Lucy caught him in her arms,
and throwing up the window, and setting wide open
the door, she tossed him up and down in the draught
of fresh air, repeating his name in her natural
tone of playful tenderness. Every voice but hers
was hushed till Ophelia exclaimed, Father, he
smiles! he certainly does smile! The violent
motion, the fresh air, and the moral excitement of
the voice of that friend, whom the little fellow
loved better than anything else on earth, roused
the energies of nature. The desired physical
effect
followed; there was a free ejection from the
stomach, and in half an hour the physician
pronounced
him safe. That's right! said Mr.
Hartell to Eugene, who, resting his drooping head
on Lucy's bosom, kept one arm fast round her
neck; that's right! cling to her, she has saved
your life; God for ever bless her. How dared you,
he added, turning to his wife, who had been as
immoveable and as impotent as a statue, how
dared you neglect the warning she gave you? You
had every reason to confide in her, and none in
that she-devil! Mrs. Hartell began, in her own
justification, and finished, in spite of her husband's
repeated exclamations, the story of the theft.
A damnable contrivance! cried Hartell, a
diabolical
lie! I am sure of it. Here! he continued,
dragging Adle forth from the corner into which
she had slunk, stand before this innocent girl, and,
as ye hope for any mercy from me, tell the whole
truth.
Oh monsieur! oh madame! said Adle,
falling
on her knees,
je suis coupable, mais si
malheureuse
.
I am guilty, but so wretched!
None of your French jabber; speak
English
,
so that Lucy can understand every word you say.
God bless him! he's putting his lips up to kiss you,
Lucy.
Adle rolled up her eyes, made a deprecating
gesture to madame, and proceeded, I had
unfortunately
,
by a little mistake
None of your `unfortunately's' and `mistakes;'
tell a plain story.
Mon Dieu! I had worn madame's cape to one
society, and torn it unforah, mon Dieu!
waltzing
andandmerci,
monsieur! my head is in
one such confusion.
Tell the truth, that will unsnarl it.
Adle, finding there was no use in attempting to
weave any sort of self-defence or exculpation into
her relation, proceeded to confess, that, partly to
guard against the communication of Lucy's
detection
of the laudanum, and partly to conceal her
abuse of the cape from her mistress, she had stolen
Lucy's key while she slept, and deposited the cape
in her trunk. I was sure of it! cried Ophelia,
hardly able to restrain herself till Adle had
finished
,
I told you so, mamma.
And anybody might have told you so, said
Hartell, too much exasperated at his wife's folly
to keep any terms, even in the presence of his
daughter; anybody that had common sense might
have known that this good girl was innocent, and
that tawdry piece of French trumpery was fit for
just such a piece of iniquity.
That's always the way, said Mrs. Hartell,
half crying and half indignant; if there is
anything
the matter with the servants, the fault is
always
laid on my shoulders.
And, in Heaven's name, on whose shoulders
should it be laid if not on yours? When you took
upon yourself to be the mistress of a family, you
assumed responsibility; you virtually promised such
S 2
supervision of your servants as should be best for
them, best for me, and best for your children.
Bless your soul, Mr. Hartell, I never promised
I never thought of any such thing.
I
believe
you, he replied, turning away with
ineffable disgust, and with the desperate
conviction
that, save by a miracle, the blind could not be
made to see. In the mean time, Adle,
perceiving
blame laid elsewhere, felt her shoulders
somewhat
lightened, and she was thunderstruck when
Mr. Hartell said to her, Are you ready for
Bridewell
?
Oh, monsieur! she exclaimed, clasping her
hands and almost rolling her eyes out of their
sockets.
Be silent; no punishment is severe enough
for you. You have sent out this innocent girl
disgraced
and suffering, and all but murdered my
child.
Mr. Hartell, interposed Lucy, I have not
suffered, and I never felt disgracedpray do not
punish her on my account. She is dreadfully
punished already; I do not believe she meant to
give Eugene enough to hurt him.
That is the true truth, if monsieur will let me
tell it.
Dieu te benit, ma chere fille, vous avez un
si bon cur
.
God bless you, my dear! you have
such a good heart
. There are few hearts so
indurated
as not to be softened by such generosity
as Lucy's, and Adle for the first time felt
something
like real penitence, and wept tears of
gratitude
and honest grief. Mr. Hartell stooped to kiss
his boy, and Lucy whispered, Adle has had such
an awful lesson, that, maybe, if you would let her
off, it would do her more good than punishing
her.
I will do anything you ask, my child. Since
Lucy asks it, Adle, you may go away; I'll not
molest you. Paek up, and be off immediately. But
don't attempt to get another service-place; I'll send
your bad name after you. This was something
like the mercy to the dog, I'll not kill thee, but
I'll turn thee out and call thee mad. Such mercy
as it was, Adle was glad to profit by it; and,
without
waiting to express one of the
sentiments
she
had professed for madame, she prepared her
luggage and was off. There can be no
attachment
between the employer and the employed
where no virtue on either side has been brought
into action.
Lucy was now beset by Mr. Hartell, who
offered
her enormous wages, and used every
persuasive
argument to induce her to remain and take
the sole charge of his child. Eugene himself
urged his cause almost irresistibly by the mute
eloquence of his tender eye, and his arm fixed
lovingly over her shoulder. But Lucy was
inexorable
.
She felt too deeply the advantages of her
position at Mrs. Hyde's to relinquish them even for
such entreaties, and she could only be induced to
promise that, with Mrs. Hyde's permission, she
would remain till a good nurse could be procured.
This matter being settled, she modestly asked Mr.
Hartell's leave to send for her friend, Mrs. Lovett's
son, that he might hear Adle's explanation from
his lips. Charles came on the instant, and
listened
to the explanation coolly and as a matter of
course; but when Mr. Hartell came to the
expression
of his gratitude to Lucy, and his estimation of
her virtues, Charles's cheek glowed and his eye
moistened. Ophelia whispered to Lucy, Do look
at him, Lucy!
Why
don't you look at him! you
are not half so glad as he is!
CHAPTER XXII.
THE CONCLUSION.
We
feel sure of pleasing all but our
very
young
readers, who always want
a little more
even of a
dull story, by abruptly concluding our book with a
letter from Lucy to her mother, written four years
subsequent to Adle's expulsion from Mr. Hartell's.
Dear Mother
,
After deliberating and advising with Mrs. Hyde,
who has been like the kindest of mothers to us,
we have come to a decision which only waits for
your approbation. The bakery is sold to Mr.
Werner, a German, who, when a stranger and quite
destitute, came to the Lovetts, as it seemed,
accidentally
.
Werner was honest and industrious; he
understood the business thoroughly, and introduced
some improvements. For the last two years he
has been a partner, and now he has bought out
Charles. His two sisters and their old parents
arrived a few weeks since, and a happier family
I never saw. How strange that such a train of
consequences should come from Werner just
coming
in to breakfast with us one morning at Mr.
Lovett's. This is what Mrs. Hyde says we should
call
providential
. Our Father in heaven provides
the opportunity for doing good, and his faithful
children improve it. But to our own affairs: it is
not five years since Mr. Lovett went to Ohio, and
there are already four thousand inhabitants in the
village. The people, he says, are very anxious to
have the bakery going; the bakehouse is built on
the lot Mr. Lovett set off to Charles for his
services
when he was apprentice to him. Our house
is nearly done, and large enough for us all. The
ladies in the village will have plenty of work for
the girls' millinery and dressmaking establishment,
and dear Jemmie will keep Charles's books, and
all of us will be in a way to earn an honourable
living; all but you, dear mother; the remainder of
your life must be
rest
. You shall be our
queen-bee
,
and we will be your workers. Mrs. Hyde wishes
you to consent to the wedding being here; she
says it will save time (as we must return here on
our way to Pittsburgh) and save the expense of
a journey to Massachusetts. Charles likes this
plan, and I want you to know our family before I
leave it. Mrs. Hyde says she will provide
lodgings
for you all at a boarding-house near to us. Is
not this most kind? Oh, mother, you will like her so
much! She has such beautiful manners, not only
in the drawing-room and to ladies, but to all, down to
the man that sweeps off the flagging, and the poor
that beg at her door. She truly seems to see the
image of God in every human creature; it makes
people civil to speak to her; her manners inspire
them with self-respect. She never lowers herself,
but raises them. If some people looked as
differently
as they act to those above and those below
them, they would sometimes appear like the
loathly
ladie in the ballad.
How very kind of you, dear mother, to offer fifty
dollars from your little pittance towards furnishing
our house; but, indeed, I have no occasion for it.
You remember my declining Mr. Hartell's gift at the
time of that horrid affair of Adle's; you and I both
felt, and so did Charles, as if there was something
discouraging and degrading to servants in
paying
their heart-service as well as their body-service.
But Mr. Hartell could not take this view of it, so
he gave Mr. Hyde one hundred dollars in trust
for me, to be paid on my coming of age or at my
marriage. I wonder he should have thought that
could take place before I was twenty-one; but I
believe he suspected, even then, that Charles and
I had thoughts of one another. Well, out of the
one hundred Mr. Hyde has made two, which, with
my savings, is quite enough to furnish our house
with comforts. Perhaps you will be surprised to
know that I have saved anything more than I have
sent to Jemmie. You first, dear mother, taught
me to be content with a little, and that the
best
quality in dress is its adaptation to the wearer
.
When I came to live with Mrs. Hyde, she gave
me an account-book, in which I set down every
penny I earned and spent. She purchases her
cotton and flannel at wholesale, and gives it to us
at the same price; and if she or the family make
us presents, it is not of their old clothes, which
would not be serviceable for us, but some good
article a little better than we should buy, a fur cape,
an umbrealla, or parasol. In all respects Mrs.
Hyde has been a mother to me. She has
qualified
me to take charge of a family of my own, so
that, with the blessing of God, I hope to perform
my part well, and to contribute to Charles's
prosperity
as well as his happiness. Oh, mother, what
a happy world this would be if there were plenty
such as you and Mrs. Hydeif the rich and the
poor, in their respective stations,
felt
and
acted
right. How foolish and wicked are those who try
to set one against the other; when, by being
friends, and acting in agreement, so much good
could be done, so much happiness gained. It
seems to me as if it were necessary there should
be rich and poor, to make all those seeds of virtue
which God has planted in our hearts spring up and
grow. If Mrs. Hyde was not rich, how could she
manifest such humility and self-denial, such wise
generosity and such wise economy? and, dear
mother
,
had you not been poor,
very
poor, could you
have given us an example of such gentleness,
longsuffering
,
patience, and self-reliance? Some think
the rich can only be generous in giving; what a
mistake! Mrs. Hyde does not give the half that
Mrs. Ardley does in presents or in charity, but she
gives her time, she imparts her knowledge, she
infuses her spirit, and oh! none but those who
live with her know how faithfully she tries to
lay the foundation of religion. To do all this,
she must, it is true, have other riches than the
poor riches of money. I have done; if I were to
write for ever, I could not tell what a blessing I
esteem
it to serve in the humblest place in such a
family as this.
Charles sends much love. Mother, are not
words very poor to express our strongest feelings?
I seem always to be struck dumb when my heart is
fullest, and now, when the time has come when I
may suitably tell you how dearly I love Charles,
how truly I have loved him ever since the cold
morning he left us the loaf of bread, it seems as if
the words I use every day, and in relation to other
persons, were not strong enough to express a
feeling
so much stronger than any other.
Don't read this to Jemmiethe love I feel for
him is not any less because I love Charles more
but he might think it so. You won't think so,
mother, for every woman knows that there is one
love that masters all othersGod has ordained it,
and how can we help it?
Here is Charles looking over my shoulder, and
singing `Haste to the wedding.' Answer our
request
by coming next Tuesday, dear mother, with
Jemmie and the girls, and believe me
Your affectionate child,
Lucy Lee
.
P.S. I forgot to mention that Mr. Hartell is
married again. I felt sorry when I heard the
children
were going to have a stepmotherit seemed
too much after having such a poor motherbut
Mrs. Hyde knows the new lady, and she says it
is one of the rare cases where the second mother
will be a great deal better than the first. Dear
little Eugene is as fond of me as ever. His father
has never failed to send him to see me once a
month, and yesterday he gave me, with his own
dear little hand, a dozen silver teaspoons. How
very thoughtful of Mr. Hartell! and the little fellow
seemed to take as much delight in it as if it were
his own thought. Mother, how can people
complain
so much of ingratitude? Every kindness I
have ever done has been returned fourfold. Even
poor Adle came not long since to thank me, as she
said, for my
mercy
to herpoor thing, she looks as
if she were in great misery.
THE END.Dear Mother
,
After deliberating and advising with Mrs. Hyde,
who has been like the kindest of mothers to us,
we have come to a decision which only waits for
your approbation. The bakery is sold to Mr.
Werner, a German, who, when a stranger and quite
destitute, came to the Lovetts, as it seemed,
accidentally
.
Werner was honest and industrious; he
understood the business thoroughly, and introduced
some improvements. For the last two years he
has been a partner, and now he has bought out
Charles. His two sisters and their old parents
arrived a few weeks since, and a happier family
I never saw. How strange that such a train of
consequences should come from Werner just
coming
in to breakfast with us one morning at Mr.
Lovett's. This is what Mrs. Hyde says we should
call
providential
. Our Father in heaven provides
the opportunity for doing good, and his faithful
children improve it. But to our own affairs: it is
not five years since Mr. Lovett went to Ohio, and
there are already four thousand inhabitants in the
village. The people, he says, are very anxious to
have the bakery going; the bakehouse is built on
the lot Mr. Lovett set off to Charles for his
services
when he was apprentice to him. Our house
is nearly done, and large enough for us all. The
ladies in the village will have plenty of work for
the girls' millinery and dressmaking establishment,
and dear Jemmie will keep Charles's books, and
all of us will be in a way to earn an honourable
living; all but you, dear mother; the remainder of
your life must be
rest
. You shall be our
queen-bee
,
and we will be your workers. Mrs. Hyde wishes
you to consent to the wedding being here; she
says it will save time (as we must return here on
our way to Pittsburgh) and save the expense of
a journey to Massachusetts. Charles likes this
plan, and I want you to know our family before I
leave it. Mrs. Hyde says she will provide
lodgings
for you all at a boarding-house near to us. Is
not this most kind? Oh, mother, you will like her so
much! She has such beautiful manners, not only
in the drawing-room and to ladies, but to all, down to
the man that sweeps off the flagging, and the poor
that beg at her door. She truly seems to see the
image of God in every human creature; it makes
people civil to speak to her; her manners inspire
them with self-respect. She never lowers herself,
but raises them. If some people looked as
differently
as they act to those above and those below
them, they would sometimes appear like the
loathly
ladie in the ballad.
How very kind of you, dear mother, to offer fifty
dollars from your little pittance towards furnishing
our house; but, indeed, I have no occasion for it.
You remember my declining Mr. Hartell's gift at the
time of that horrid affair of Adle's; you and I both
felt, and so did Charles, as if there was something
discouraging and degrading to servants in
paying
their heart-service as well as their body-service.
But Mr. Hartell could not take this view of it, so
he gave Mr. Hyde one hundred dollars in trust
for me, to be paid on my coming of age or at my
marriage. I wonder he should have thought that
could take place before I was twenty-one; but I
believe he suspected, even then, that Charles and
I had thoughts of one another. Well, out of the
one hundred Mr. Hyde has made two, which, with
my savings, is quite enough to furnish our house
with comforts. Perhaps you will be surprised to
know that I have saved anything more than I have
sent to Jemmie. You first, dear mother, taught
me to be content with a little, and that the
best
quality in dress is its adaptation to the wearer
.
When I came to live with Mrs. Hyde, she gave
me an account-book, in which I set down every
penny I earned and spent. She purchases her
cotton and flannel at wholesale, and gives it to us
at the same price; and if she or the family make
us presents, it is not of their old clothes, which
would not be serviceable for us, but some good
article a little better than we should buy, a fur cape,
an umbrealla, or parasol. In all respects Mrs.
Hyde has been a mother to me. She has
qualified
me to take charge of a family of my own, so
that, with the blessing of God, I hope to perform
my part well, and to contribute to Charles's
prosperity
as well as his happiness. Oh, mother, what
a happy world this would be if there were plenty
such as you and Mrs. Hydeif the rich and the
poor, in their respective stations,
felt
and
acted
right. How foolish and wicked are those who try
to set one against the other; when, by being
friends, and acting in agreement, so much good
could be done, so much happiness gained. It
seems to me as if it were necessary there should
be rich and poor, to make all those seeds of virtue
which God has planted in our hearts spring up and
grow. If Mrs. Hyde was not rich, how could she
manifest such humility and self-denial, such wise
generosity and such wise economy? and, dear
mother
,
had you not been poor,
very
poor, could you
have given us an example of such gentleness,
longsuffering
,
patience, and self-reliance? Some think
the rich can only be generous in giving; what a
mistake! Mrs. Hyde does not give the half that
Mrs. Ardley does in presents or in charity, but she
gives her time, she imparts her knowledge, she
infuses her spirit, and oh! none but those who
live with her know how faithfully she tries to
lay the foundation of religion. To do all this,
she must, it is true, have other riches than the
poor riches of money. I have done; if I were to
write for ever, I could not tell what a blessing I
esteem
it to serve in the humblest place in such a
family as this.
Charles sends much love. Mother, are not
words very poor to express our strongest feelings?
I seem always to be struck dumb when my heart is
fullest, and now, when the time has come when I
may suitably tell you how dearly I love Charles,
how truly I have loved him ever since the cold
morning he left us the loaf of bread, it seems as if
the words I use every day, and in relation to other
persons, were not strong enough to express a
feeling
so much stronger than any other.
Don't read this to Jemmiethe love I feel for
him is not any less because I love Charles more
but he might think it so. You won't think so,
mother, for every woman knows that there is one
love that masters all othersGod has ordained it,
and how can we help it?
Here is Charles looking over my shoulder, and
singing `Haste to the wedding.' Answer our
request
by coming next Tuesday, dear mother, with
Jemmie and the girls, and believe me
Your affectionate child,
Lucy Lee
.
P.S. I forgot to mention that Mr. Hartell is
married again. I felt sorry when I heard the
children
were going to have a stepmotherit seemed
too much after having such a poor motherbut
Mrs. Hyde knows the new lady, and she says it
is one of the rare cases where the second mother
will be a great deal better than the first. Dear
little Eugene is as fond of me as ever. His father
has never failed to send him to see me once a
month, and yesterday he gave me, with his own
dear little hand, a dozen silver teaspoons. How
very thoughtful of Mr. Hartell! and the little fellow
seemed to take as much delight in it as if it were
his own thought. Mother, how can people
complain
so much of ingratitude? Every kindness I
have ever done has been returned fourfold. Even
poor Adle came not long since to thank me, as she
said, for my
mercy
to herpoor thing, she looks as
if she were in great misery.